   #Quillette » Feed Quillette » Comments Feed Quillette » Why Renewables
   Can’t Save the Planet Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * Home
     * About
     * Subscribe
     * Donate
     * Quillette Circle

Quillette

Free Thought Lives

   Menu

     * Features
     * Science / Tech
     * Politics
     * Review
     * Podcast
     * Narrated

   Close Menu

   Recommended
   Published on February 27, 2019

Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet

   written by Michael Shellenberger

   When I was a boy, my parents would sometimes take my sister and me
   camping in the desert. A lot of people think deserts are empty, but my
   parents taught us to see the wildlife all around us, including hawks,
   eagles, and tortoises.

   After college, I moved to California to work on environmental
   campaigns. I helped save the state’s last ancient redwood forest and
   blocked a proposed radioactive waste repository set for the desert.

   In 2002, shortly after I turned 30, I decided I wanted to dedicate
   myself to addressing climate change. I was worried that global warming
   would end up destroying many of the natural environments that people
   had worked so hard to protect.

   I thought the solutions were pretty straightforward: solar panels on
   every roof, electric cars in every driveway, etc. The main obstacles, I
   believed, were political. And so I helped organize a coalition of
   America’s largest labor unions and environmental groups. Our proposal
   was for a $300 billion dollar investment in renewables. We would not
   only prevent climate change but also create millions of new jobs in a
   fast-growing high-tech sector.

   Our efforts paid off in 2007 when then-presidential candidate Barack
   Obama embraced our vision. Between 2009–15, the U.S. invested $150
   billion dollars in renewables and other forms of clean tech. But right
   away we ran into trouble.

   The first was around land use. Electricity from solar roofs costs about
   twice as much as electricity from solar farms, but solar and wind farms
   require huge amounts of land. That, along with the fact that solar and
   wind farms require long new transmissions lines, and are opposed by
   local communities and conservationists trying to preserve wildlife,
   particularly birds.

   Another challenge was the intermittent nature of solar and wind
   energies. When the sun stops shining and the wind stops blowing, you
   have to quickly be able to ramp up another source of energy.

   Happily, there were a lot of people working on solutions. One solution
   was to convert California’s dams into big batteries. The idea was that,
   when the sun was shining and the wind was blowing, you could pump water
   uphill, store it for later, and then run it over the turbines to make
   electricity when you needed it.

   Other problems didn’t seem like such a big deal, on closer examination.
   For example, after I learned that house cats kill billions of birds
   every year it put into perspective the nearly one million birds killed
   by wind turbines.

   It seemed to me that most, if not all, of the problems from scaling up
   solar and wind energies could be solved through more technological
   innovation.

   But, as the years went by, the problems persisted and in some cases
   grew worse. For example, California is a world leader when it comes to
   renewables but we haven’t converted our dams into batteries, partly for
   geographic reasons. You need the right kind of dam and reservoirs, and
   even then it’s an expensive retrofit.

   A bigger problem is that there are many other uses for the water that
   accumulates behind dams, namely irrigation and cities. And because the
   water in our rivers and reservoirs is scarce and unreliable, the water
   from dams for those other purposes is becoming ever-more precious.

   Without large-scale ways to back-up solar energy California has had to
   block electricity coming from solar farms when it’s extremely sunny, or
   pay neighboring states to take it from us so we can avoid blowing-out
   our grid.

   Despite what you’ve heard, there is no “battery revolution” on the way,
   for well-understood technical and economic reasons.

   As for house cats, they don’t kill big, rare, threatened birds. What
   house cats kill are small, common birds, like sparrows, robins and
   jays. What kills big, threatened, and endangered birds—birds that could
   go extinct—like hawks, eagles, owls, and condors, are wind turbines.

   In fact, wind turbines are the most serious new threat to important
   bird species to emerge in decades. The rapidly spinning turbines act
   like an apex predator which big birds never evolved to deal with.

   Solar farms have similarly large ecological impacts. Building a solar
   farm is a lot like building any other kind of farm. You have to clear
   the whole area of wildlife.

   In order to build one of the biggest solar farms in California the
   developers hired biologists to pull threatened desert tortoises from
   their burrows, put them on the back of pickup trucks, transport them,
   and cage them in pens where many ended up dying.

   As we were learning of these impacts, it gradually dawned on me that
   there was no amount of technological innovation that could solve the
   fundamental problem with renewables.

   You can make solar panels cheaper and wind turbines bigger, but you
   can’t make the sun shine more regularly or the wind blow more reliably.
   I came to understand the environmental implications of the physics of
   energy. In order to produce significant amounts of electricity from
   weak energy flows, you just have to spread them over enormous areas. In
   other words, the trouble with renewables isn’t fundamentally
   technical—it’s natural.

   Dealing with energy sources that are inherently unreliable, and require
   large amounts of land, comes at a high economic cost.

   There’s been a lot of publicity about how solar panels and wind
   turbines have come down in cost. But those one-time cost savings from
   making them in big Chinese factories have been outweighed by the high
   cost of dealing with their unreliability.

   Consider California. Between 2011–17 the cost of solar panels declined
   about 75 percent, and yet our electricity prices rose five times more
   than they did in the rest of the U.S. It’s the same story in Germany,
   the world leader in solar and wind energy. Its electricity prices
   increased 50 percent between 2006–17, as it scaled up renewables.

   I used to think that dealing with climate change was going to be
   expensive. But I could no longer believe this after looking at Germany
   and France.

   Germany’s carbon emissions have been flat since 2009, despite an
   investment of $580 billion by 2025 in a renewables-heavy electrical
   grid, a 50 percent rise in electricity cost.

   Meanwhile, France produces one-tenth the carbon emissions per unit of
   electricity as Germany and pays little more than half for its
   electricity. How? Through nuclear power.

   Then, under pressure from Germany, France spent $33 billion on
   renewables, over the last decade. What was the result? A rise in the
   carbon intensity of its electricity supply, and higher electricity
   prices, too.

   What about all the headlines about expensive nuclear and cheap solar
   and wind? They are largely an illusion resulting from the fact that 70
   to 80 percent of the costs of building nuclear plants are up-front,
   whereas the costs given for solar and wind don’t include the high cost
   of transmission lines, new dams, or other forms of battery.

   It’s reasonable to ask whether nuclear power is safe, and what happens
   with its waste.

   It turns out that scientists have studied the health and safety of
   different energy sources since the 1960s. Every major study, including
   a recent one by the British medical journal Lancet, finds the same
   thing: nuclear is the safest way to make reliable electricity.

   Strange as it sounds, nuclear power plants are so safe for the same
   reason nuclear weapons are so dangerous. The uranium used as fuel in
   power plants and as material for bombs can create one million times
   more heat per its mass than its fossil fuel and gunpowder equivalents.

     Danger’s Deliverance | @ShellenbergerMD https://t.co/nTezEeWejR

     — Quillette (@Quillette) August 23, 2018

   It’s not so much about the fuel as the process. We release more energy
   breaking atoms than breaking chemical bonds. What’s special about
   uranium atoms is that they are easy to split.

   Because nuclear plants produce heat without fire, they emit no air
   pollution in the form of smoke. By contrast, the smoke from burning
   fossil fuels and biomass results in the premature deaths of seven
   million people per year, according to the World Health Organization.

   Even during the worst accidents, nuclear plants release small amounts
   of radioactive particulate matter from the tiny quantities of uranium
   atoms split apart to make heat.

   Over an 80-year lifespan, fewer than 200 people will die from the
   radiation from the worst nuclear accident, Chernobyl, and zero will die
   from the small amounts of radiant particulate matter that escaped from
   Fukushima.

   As a result, the climate scientist James Hanson and a colleague found
   that nuclear plants have actually saved nearly two million lives to
   date that would have been lost to air pollution.

   Thanks to its energy density, nuclear plants require far less land than
   renewables. Even in sunny California, a solar farm requires 450 times
   more land to produce the same amount of energy as a nuclear plant.

   Energy-dense nuclear requires far less in the way of materials, and
   produces far less in the way of waste compared to energy-dilute solar
   and wind.

   A single Coke can’s worth of uranium provides all of the energy that
   the most gluttonous American or Australian lifestyle requires. At the
   end of the process, the high-level radioactive waste that nuclear
   plants produce is the very same Coke can of (used) uranium fuel. The
   reason nuclear is the best energy from an environmental perspective is
   because it produces so little waste and none enters the environment as
   pollution.

   All of the waste fuel from 45 years of the Swiss nuclear program can
   fit, in canisters, on a basketball court-like warehouse, where like all
   spent nuclear fuel, it has never hurt a fly.

   By contrast, solar panels require 17 times more materials in the form
   of cement, glass, concrete, and steel than do nuclear plants, and
   create over 200 times more waste.

   We tend to think of solar panels as clean, but the truth is that there
   is no plan anywhere to deal with solar panels at the end of their 20 to
   25 year lifespan.

   Experts fear solar panels will be shipped, along with other forms of
   electronic waste, to be disassembled—or, more often, smashed with
   hammers—by poor communities in Africa and Asia, whose residents will be
   exposed to the dust from toxic heavy metals including lead, cadmium,
   and chromium.

   Wherever I travel in the world I ask ordinary people what they think
   about nuclear and renewable energies. After saying they know next to
   nothing, they admit that nuclear is strong and renewables are weak.
   Their intuitions are correct. What most of us get
   wrong—understandably—is that weak energies are safer.

   But aren’t renewables safer? The answer is no. Wind turbines,
   surprisingly, kill more people than nuclear plants.

   In other words, the energy density of the fuel determines its
   environmental and health impacts. Spreading more mines and more
   equipment over larger areas of land is going to have larger
   environmental and human safety impacts.

   It’s true that you can stand next to a solar panel without much harm
   while if you stand next to a nuclear reactor at full power you’ll die.

   But when it comes to generating power for billions of people, it turns
   out that producing solar and wind collectors, and spreading them over
   large areas, has vastly worse impacts on humans and wildlife alike.

   Our intuitive sense that sunlight is dilute sometimes shows up in
   films. That’s why nobody was shocked when the recent sequel of the
   dystopian sci-fi flick, “Blade Runner,” opened with a dystopian scene
   of California’s deserts paved with solar farms identical to the one
   that decimated desert tortoises.

   Over the last several hundred years, human beings have been moving away
   from matter-dense fuels towards energy-dense ones. First we move from
   renewable fuels like wood, dung, and windmills, and towards the fossil
   fuels of coal, oil, and natural gas, and eventually to uranium.

   Energy progress is overwhelmingly positive for people and nature. As we
   stop using wood for fuel we allow grasslands and forests to grow back,
   and the wildlife to return.

   As we stop burning wood and dung in our homes, we no longer must
   breathe toxic indoor smoke. And as we move from fossil fuels to uranium
   we clear the outdoor air of pollution, and reduce how much we’ll heat
   up the planet.

   Nuclear plants are thus a revolutionary technology—a grand historical
   break from fossil fuels as significant as the industrial transition
   from wood to fossil fuels before it.

   The problem with nuclear is that it is unpopular, a victim of a 50
   year-long concerted effort by fossil fuel, renewable energy,
   anti-nuclear weapons campaigners, and misanthropic environmentalists to
   ban the technology.

   In response, the nuclear industry suffers battered wife syndrome, and
   constantly apologizes for its best attributes, from its waste to its
   safety.

   Lately, the nuclear industry has promoted the idea that, in order to
   deal with climate change, “we need a mix of clean energy sources,”
   including solar, wind and nuclear. It was something I used to believe,
   and say, in part because it’s what people want to hear. The problem is
   that it’s not true.

   France shows that moving from mostly nuclear electricity to a mix of
   nuclear and renewables results in more carbon emissions, due to using
   more natural gas, and higher prices, to the unreliability of solar and
   wind.

   Oil and gas investors know this, which is why they made a political
   alliance with renewables companies, and why oil and gas companies have
   been spending millions of dollars on advertisements promoting solar,
   and funneling millions of dollars to said environmental groups to
   provide public relations cover.

   What is to be done? The most important thing is for scientists and
   conservationists to start telling the truth about renewables and
   nuclear, and the relationship between energy density and environmental
   impact.

   Bat scientists recently warned that wind turbines are on the verge of
   making one species, the Hoary bat, a migratory bat species, go extinct.

   Another scientist who worked to build that gigantic solar farm in the
   California desert told High Country News, “Everybody knows that
   translocation of desert tortoises doesn’t work. When you’re walking in
   front of a bulldozer, crying, and moving animals, and cacti out of the
   way, it’s hard to think that the project is a good idea.”

   I think it’s natural that those of us who became active on climate
   change gravitated toward renewables. They seemed like a way to
   harmonize human society with the natural world. Collectively, we have
   been suffering from an appeal-to-nature fallacy no different from the
   one that leads us to buy products at the supermarket labeled “all
   natural.” But it’s high time that those of us who appointed ourselves
   Earth’s guardians should take a second look at the science, and start
   questioning the impacts of our actions.

   Now that we know that renewables can’t save the planet, are we really
   going to stand by and let them destroy it?

   Michael Shellenberger is a Time Magazine “Hero of the Environment,” and
   president of Environmental Progress, an independent research and policy
   organization. Follow him on Twitter @ShellenbergerMD

Share this:

     * Pocket
     * WhatsApp
     *
     * Email
     * Print
     *

Related

   Filed under: Recommended
   Tagged with: energy, environment

575 Comments

    1.
   johntshea says
          + February 28, 2019
       Interesting. ‘Blade Runner 2049’ is a sequel, not a remake.
          +
        Brittany says
               o February 28, 2019
            That was literally the one content-related statement I also
            wished to address. Priorities.
          +
        Saw file says
               o February 28, 2019
            I give the author a great deal of credit ( assuming what he
            has written is honest). He put himself out there, from that
            ‘sphere’. He’ll become a excommunicated heretic to most of
            them now. Stepping out of the ideological narrative is a big
            no-no. In this day and age, that takes guts.
            I work in the downstream energy industry in facilities
            construction. My chosen career. I have worked in almost every
            branch of it. A variety of: hydrocarbon, geothermal,
            hydroelectric, nuclear, wind, solar, inertial.
            It’s been my career passion for over three decades.
            Not a dreamer. I am a doer.
            (excuse the righteous rant, thx).
            I put my $ where my mouth is, and it is very difficult at
            times.
            Imagine going to work every day building a state of the art
            “new generation” power facility (with less: pollution/carbon
            etc emissions/environmental impact,/etc) and having a bunch of
            irrational lunatics, like the author may have been, using any
            foul method they can think of to try to stop you from doing
            your work and advancing the technology. It’s disheartening,
            but the only way that these barbarian’s will pass this gate,
            is by stomping across my corpse.
               o
             G Saw says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 I recently replied to a Slate article regarding global
                 climate change suggesting that I believe the science of
                 climate change and support actions to reduce our CO2
                 emissions but I took exception to the over the top claims
                 of mass extinctions predicted to occur within the next
                 decade or less. Part of my rational was we have been
                 bombarded by claims of ice free poles by 2017, 20ft rise
                 in sea levels by 2015 etc, etc. and these things have not
                 come to pass, so be careful in future claims for sake of
                 credibility.
                 My mailbox was flooded with vile comments, F-bombs,
                 obscene GIFs, responders would have physically attacked
                 me if they could. Not one responder gave me any support.
                 This guy has taken a huge risk in writing this.
                    #
                  Fernando Leza says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Go to the REMSS site, and find the webpage where
                      they compare the temperature measurements they make
                      with NASA satellites with model forecasts prepared
                      during the Fifth Model Intercomparison Project
                      (CMIP5). These models were run forward in 2007 and
                      by now we are seeing a significant drift, with the
                      actual temperature running lower than the forecast.
                      REMSS is one of two NASA contractors publishing
                      satellite data, the other is the University of
                      Alabama at Huntsville. They tend to agree, but REMSS
                      has better graphics.
                      I’m retired, so I have time to look at the actual
                      data, compare it with the models, and I assure you
                      the so called “Business as Usual” case used for most
                      impact studies is a wild exaggeration. I won’t get
                      into the technical reasons here, suffice it to say
                      that it includes exaggerated CO2 concentration and
                      the model structure and code itself is clearly
                      exaggerating future warming.
                         @
                       Ardy says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Fernando L: It is the data where all the
                           problems lie!!! Cooling the past and
                           homogenization. Deletion of cooler stations and
                           including warmer ones. In Australia they have
                           recently deleted the record from Charlotte’s
                           Pass in the snowy mountains and included extra
                           ones in western Sydney where it is hot.
                           About 2/3rds of all recent land warming is due
                           to adjustments of the data.
                         @
                       brettmcs says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           I don’t think Steve McIntyre ever got the code
                           from Michael Mann that he used to generate the
                           Hockey Stick graph. Climate Science is the
                           antithesis of Open Science.
                         @
                       netprophet says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           Yes, spot on. Going back even earlier, James
                           Hansen testified in 1988 that we would need to
                           eliminate fossil fuels by 2000 to stop and
                           “runaway greenhouse” effect of a 4 deg C (7 deg
                           F) increase in temperature by 2060. Hansen
                           revealed two other scenarios, a modest cutback
                           and a zero emission scenario. What has occurred
                           since from the UAH data precisely follows the
                           zero emission scenario in spite of the fact
                           that is not the scenario that has been
                           followed.
                         @
                       postkey says
                              - March 12, 2019
                           ‘This’ is an ‘exaggeration’?
                           “The long-term warming trend has continued in
                           2018, with the average global temperature set
                           to be the fourth highest on record. The 20
                           warmest years on record have been in the past
                           22 years, with the top four in the past four
                           years, according to the World Meteorological
                           Organization (WMO).”
                           https://public.wmo.int/en/media/press-release/w
                           mo-climate-statement-past-4-years-warmest-recor
                           d
                    #
                  Paolo says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      To reassure a bit, they wouldn’t have attacked you
                      physically, in person. It turns out that people are
                      much less vile and hostile in person. Online
                      environment brings up the worse.
                         @
                       Bob Walker says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Unless you happen to be on a college campus.
                           https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/20
                           19/02/22/us/conservative-activist-assault-uc-be
                           rkeley/index.html
                    #
                  Robert Reynolds says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      You may be interested in delving deeper into the
                      global warming issue by reading Joseph E Postma, a
                      physicist, at
                      https://climateofsophistry.com/author/sophistryslaye
                      r/
                      He has 2 essential points. The first is that the use
                      of the term ‘greenhouse effect’ is essentially
                      deceitful. The function of an actual greenhouse,
                      what he calls the ‘physical greenhouse effect’ is
                      fundamentally different than the global warming
                      greenhouse effect. He terms the latter the
                      ‘radiative greenhouse effect.’ The physical
                      greenhouse effect is the result of preventing
                      natural convection so that air warmed by sun heated
                      surfaces is not replaced by cool air. Needless to
                      say, the atmosphere is not contained in a glass box.
                      His second point is that the physics (mathematics)
                      of the radiative greenhouse effect is simply wrong.
                      To start with it assumes, for so-called
                      simplification reasons, that the earth is flat.
                      Consequently, the energy of the sun is spread over
                      the total area of the globe, both day and night,
                      with the result that the solar energy has a heating
                      capability to only -18C. This is the heating
                      capacity of the sun if the earth were situated much
                      farther out in the solar system.
                      But physics based on a distorted reality is only the
                      beginning of the problem. When the sun heats the
                      surface of the earth, the earth emits heat in
                      infrared waves which interact with the atmosphere
                      warming it. So far so good but the Global Warmers
                      have a problem; how do you account for summer if
                      -18C is the limit of the sun’s warming capacity.
                      They have two solutions; (A) the warmed atmosphere
                      radiates heat back to the earth warming it more,
                      and/or (B) greenhouse gases block the emission of
                      heat from the earth.
                      Answer A violates the laws of thermodynamics, cool
                      objects cannot warm warmer objects. The Warmers
                      concept of back radiation or back inductions
                      confuses heat and energy. Proposition B violates the
                      Stefan-Boltzman law which derives the energy flux at
                      the boundary of an object given its temperature.
                      Energy flux is spontaneous and isn’t ‘blocked’ by
                      externalities.
                      There is a bit in his reasoning that I found quite
                      humorous; besides water vapour, oxygen and nitrogen
                      make up the bulk of the atmosphere. They are
                      relatively poor emitters of heat. On the other hand,
                      carbon dioxide and methane are high heat emitters so
                      they would have a cooling effect. Too funny.
                      Hope this is of use.
                         @
                       Dan Appleton says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Where have you been for the last 15 years of
                           brainless banter about solar and wind saving
                           the planet? The nuclear solution is so
                           obvious!!!… But, nuclear powered grids alone
                           won’t save the planet since 80% of the planet’s
                           energy demand is for heat and transportation,
                           ergo, fossil power. I loved the Coke can
                           metaphor, but until we can get nuclear power
                           into a thimble, i.e., “personal nuclear power,”
                           our struggle to save the planet will remain
                           futile. Someone needs to kick our quantum
                           physicists in the butt and tell them to stop
                           worrying about the Higgs Boson and start
                           inventing personal nuclear energy.
                         @
                       Chad Jessup says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           (A) is true, and does not violate any of the
                           laws of thermodynamics. “…cool objects cannot
                           warm warmer objects.” That is not what
                           scientists claim. The science states that
                           cooler objects can impede the loss of heat from
                           a warmer object, a fact of life one witnesses
                           at every moment, i.e. coats, housing
                           insulation, socks, slippers, etc.
                           (B) The LWIR is absorbed primarily by water
                           vapor and significantly less by CO2, emitted
                           back toward the earth, slowing the outbound
                           heat, and thus causing a rise in temperature.
                           No where does anyone claim greenhouse gases
                           block the emission of heat from the earth.
                         @
                       Peter says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Why is it that the only peer-reviewed research
                           papers by Mr. Postma have to deal with
                           telescope calibration and not climate science?
                         @
                       DrZ says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           @Robert Reynolds: I will see your interesting
                           points and raise you one, the idea that CO2
                           leads warming has yet to be proven. Indeed,
                           there are strong data that show just the
                           opposite: It can be shown over more than one
                           cycle that the earth’s temperature rises and
                           then CO2 follows and it follows in
                           mulit-century lags. If CO2 is the cause of
                           global warming how could this be? Wouldn’t CO2
                           have to lead a warming trend?
                           This concept backed by real data, temperatures
                           and past CO2 concentrations extracted from ice
                           cores, can be seen at
                           https://youtu.be/oYhCQv5tNsQ
                           I have presented this video to the rabid
                           Chicken Little crowd and have politely ask them
                           to refute the ideas put forth in this video to
                           help me understand (some fake naivety on my
                           part). I have yet to receive a response.
                           If any of the points in this video ring wrong,
                           please write about it so I can be informed
                           (really).
                         @
                       DrZ says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           @Dan Appleton. I agree that we will always need
                           liquid petroleum in the future. When you write
                           that 80% of the planet’s energy demand is for
                           heat and transportation are you factoring in
                           that *if* nuclear becomes prevalent *and*
                           electric rates drop that gasoline cars and
                           hydrocarbon heating should be greatly reduced
                           which would lower that 80% demand?
                           I agree though that we will always need
                           lubricating oil, airplanes will need jet-A,
                           ocean freighters will need diesel and land
                           shippers will also need diesel. But if
                           electricity production through nuclear fission
                           becomes cheaper, and we know it’s the cleanest,
                           then the use of more things electric start to
                           make sense such as home heating, water heating
                           and perhaps more electric autos (assuming that
                           front and back-end battery pollution is
                           manageable and in-auto storage is adequate.
                         @
                       Lisa says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Thank you for your post. Is it possible we
                           engage in too much speculation and “overthink”
                           regarding the concept of climate change? The
                           climate will change…with or without humans.
                           What’s our plan of action when a volcano erupts
                           and spews ash into the atmosphere? How will we
                           protect the environment and minimize impact on
                           climate? Multiple volcanoes? A subsequent giant
                           meteor that impacts the planet? I’m tired of
                           thinking in terms of gloom and doom and
                           speculation of what “might” happen. Could we
                           have prevented the last ice age as human
                           beings? Everyone thinks they are experts and
                           have crystal balls into the planet’s future.
                           We’re ants. We imagine we have more control
                           over some outcome that’s not certain in any
                           way. There’s freedom in ignorance! Where did
                           our world view come from? Mad Max and
                           Thunderdome? The 2654 apocalypse movies that
                           entered our subconscious in the last fifty
                           years that influenced our thinking? The book of
                           Revelation in the Holy Bible? Perhaps Byron
                           Katie is correct and life is just a projection.
                           What if environmentalism is political control
                           over the masses..designed to bankrupt you out
                           of billions of your hard earned dollars and
                           take away your land, property rights, public
                           use of parks, and ultimately your country? What
                           if it is a form of control based on FEAR? What
                           if It is propaganda? Brilliant propaganda?
                           Impassioned anger and resentment for those who
                           dare question the popular consensus makes it
                           so. Is HAARP real and is the environmentalist
                           movement a cover for the testing of such a
                           program? A way to fund the program in secret?
                           Is it possible that much of the EPA’s stricter
                           laws came as a result of the implementation of
                           Agenda 21? Is environmentalism a way to enforce
                           Agenda 21 world view and subsequent One World
                           Order? If you agree with the concept of One
                           World Order – why do you agree? If we’re all so
                           emotionally attached to our thought processes
                           regarding our world view is that not the basic
                           tenet of propaganda? To accept without
                           question? We all come to a thought that
                           EVERYONE ELSE is a victim of indoctrination.
                           Would we ever recognize indoctrination in
                           ourselves?
                           https://www.forbes.com/sites/startswithabang/20
                           17/11/22/scientific-proof-is-a-myth/#665d53af2f
                           b1
                         @
                       Ardy says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Dan Appleton, there is a young American kid who
                           built a nuclear fusion engine in his garage at
                           14, about 20 now I guess.
                           He wants to build micro nuclear devices to
                           power homes, cars etc. I think this is the way
                           forward.
                         @
                       Rick Jefferson says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           Dan — With plenty of clean energy from nuclear
                           power, it is very easy to produce liquid fuels.
                           The hydrogen can be taken from water and the
                           carbon from CO2 and/or coal.
                         @
                       Amanda Wilson says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           Thank you for the link! It sounds like a good
                           read. I just wish people really “read”
                           anything. Most people just skim headlines and
                           don’t even scroll down. Then they spout off as
                           if they know everything there is to know from
                           the headlines. I worry about our future,….soon,
                           no one will actually know anything. We’ll have
                           to “Google” everything.
                    #
                  Hunter K Praywell says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      There’s certainly a range of predictions on the
                      timing of the earth’s warming, as well as the
                      corresponding rate of atrophy of our polar caps and
                      rise in sea levels. However, there is no credible
                      dispute of the measurements of the earth’s warming
                      and its consequences. There’s also no dispute about
                      the human disruptions it’s causing, as we see entire
                      island nations depopulate. The US is the top
                      contributor to these problems, and needs act
                      responsibly.
                      Please post the source of the prediction of the 20′
                      rise in sea level by 2015, and ice free poles by
                      2017.
                         @
                       Fernando Leza says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           We are not seeing whole islands depopulate.
                         @
                       JR says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           “However, there is no credible research on the
                           measurements of the earth’s warming and its
                           consequences.” Fixed it for you.
                         @
                       Serge Wright says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           This link contains the sources from James
                           Hansen’s wild claims of a drowned New York
                           City, heat and drought ravaged mid-west and ice
                           free Artic. These predictions were made by
                           Hansen as far back at 1988, obviously in an
                           attempt to gain funding and help push his green
                           socialist cause. Today, all of the outcomes
                           have completely failed to eventuate. Sea level
                           rose by a few mm and temperatures in the
                           mid-west have fallen, due to increasing
                           rainfall, instead of the predicted drought.
                           https://realclimatescience.com/2018/06/hansen-g
                           ot-it-right/
                           There is one error in this link. Hansen said
                           the west side would be under water, but in 40
                           years, not 20 years. Of couse in 8 years and 9
                           months the wather will only have risen
                           slightly.
                         @
                       RickG says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Your sentence on polar caps and sea level rise
                           is confusing. What do you mean by atrophy?
                           Also, by lumping both polar caps into one
                           sentence with ‘sea level rise’, are you
                           implying that melting ice in the Arctic is
                           contributing to sea level rise? Repeat after
                           me, “All Arctic Ice is SEA ICE.” That means it
                           is floating so if it melts it has exactly zero
                           effect on sea level rise. If you are and you
                           graduated high school you should return your
                           diploma – if you have a college degree you
                           should demand a refund.
                           How is the US the ‘top contributor’ to these
                           problems? If your measure is CO2 emissions you
                           are incorrect as China already emits more than
                           the US by a rather large margin.
                           And finally, to close the trifecta of “Huh?” in
                           response to your post…which island nations have
                           been depopulated? Heck, which island nations
                           have been shrinking? Even Tuvalu – the once
                           poster child for the ‘doomed Pacific islands’
                           is expanding.
                           https://www.thenewamerican.com/tech/environment
                           /item/28258-the-curious-case-of-the-growing-isl
                           and-nation
                         @
                       hunter says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Please tell us what island is depopulating due
                           to climate change.
                           And, by the way, there are substantial credible
                           reasons to doubt the significance and
                           reliability of the data and especially the
                           claims of the climate consensus.
                         @
                       David Doran says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           The US is not the top contributor, by far, as
                           its CO & CO2 levels are far surpassed by China
                           – and both on levels are on downward trends
                           over the past 2 decades. Though no island
                           nations are depopulating.
                    #
                  goldminor says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      I am a sceptic. Many alarmists react that way. They
                      are fully committed to their biases, and do not like
                      being disturbed. I do not see any need for CO2
                      reduction in society. The warming will be proven as
                      a natural event in another 10 years when global
                      temps do not continue to rise, imo.
                      It is interesting to see somelike like this author
                      state the above. Bill Gates has also recently come
                      up to speak about the futility of placing hope in
                      solar/wind. Google gave up on trying to go 100%
                      renewable several years ago. If they backed out
                      despite the big money in their pockets, then that
                      should be a clue.
                    #
                  Marilyn Krzus says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Maybe it makes you question, then, the legitimacy of
                      your AGW beliefs…? They’ve already lied about so
                      very much. When we were growing up, we satat dinner
                      listening to my dad. He taught physics and was a
                      navigator (shot down over Germany, became a POW
                      there) in a WWII bomber. A most interesting man.
                      One time he read Stephen Hawking’s book and wrote to
                      him about an error he discovered—we all saved the
                      letter; Hawking thanked him for his input (without
                      actually admitting to his error, LOL). Dad attended
                      all the U of Chicago physics lectures.
                      At any rate, back in the 1970s and 1980s when it was
                      all about global cooling, all Dad could do was
                      chuckle. The environmentalists wanted all the CFCs
                      removed from hairsprays and other propelled
                      chemicals. That was accomplished, yet the hole in
                      the ozone continued to wax and wane. Imagine the
                      environmentalists’ surprise, when Dad had been
                      saying allalong that’s the way the ozone hole
                      worked. After all, we were still in a period of
                      glaciation (we still had glaciers), so we were
                      already in a cooled period.
                      But when it got nasty and became AGW, Dad went
                      ballistic. He would talk about all the factors they
                      weren’t even looking at. And that’s not science…in
                      the least. Science is not settled until there is
                      definitive proof it is—but there is no settled
                      science in AGW, just the ravings of a lunatic
                      fringe. After all, it wasn’t scientists who started
                      the big tage—it was AlGore, the guy who got a “D” in
                      Natural Sciences at Harvard! He led the chase.
                      Then the EPA poisoned the Snake River, I believe it
                      was, in CO. Not a peep from the environmentalists!
                      That made me realize that AGW is a religion—no proof
                      will be accepted to prove their god doesn’t exist.
                      They believe on faith alone.
                      Yes, some scientists (nowhere near all or even 97%)
                      also believed. And, of course, those researchers who
                      were supportedbybthe government believed…or said
                      they did. Those that openly admitted they did not
                      list their research funding. Wouldn’t YOU “believe”?
                      And THAT isn’t science either.
                      It’s a shame we have fallen prey to the political
                      rulers—we should have always remained free thinkers
                      and people of science. I am ashamed at Americans who
                      fell so hard and ignored all the scientists who said
                      the AGW folks were wrong. When they will not discuss
                      it and call you a denier (of their god), that is not
                      science. Science REQUIRES debate; in the AGW
                      religion, debate is not allowed.
                      It makes me very sad for America and how the true
                      intellectuals could long ago debate (think our
                      Founding Fathers), while today debate on a
                      difference of opinion is considered heresy. Sad, sad
                      days indeed… Intellectualism has died, and in its
                      place is groupthink.😢
                         @
                       DrZ says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           @Marilyn Krzus: you wrote “That made me realize
                           that AGW is a religion—no proof will be
                           accepted to prove their god doesn’t exist. They
                           believe on faith alone”
                           Some good points in your comment, but I have a
                           quibble with the above that you wrote.
                           My experience with the very religious,
                           evangelists, has been favorable and I have had
                           no bad experiences. I will look one in the eyes
                           and say I support your right to believe what
                           you believe, but it’s just that I don’t believe
                           in what you believe and the evangelistic part
                           of the conversation comes to an end.
                           Every time this has happened, I have never had
                           a religious person assail me like the AGW crowd
                           would do. Most evangelists may not like they
                           did not convert me, but they understand I have
                           no wish to be converted, but not so for the
                           “climate change crowd” who will insult me with
                           words and possibly become violent towards me as
                           others have pointed out.
                           So, to me the CCC movement is not a religion,
                           it is a political movement hell bent on
                           changing the world into whatever it is they
                           want and their pseudo scientific climate change
                           claim is a tool for making that change. It is a
                           weapon they are using to bludgeon industry,
                           politicians and the rest of us into a “we have
                           to do something now” state. Certainly, in the
                           U.S., the religion has been adopted by too many
                           politicians who see votes, not science.
                           The part that makes me especially sad, perhaps
                           depressed, is that this pseudo science is being
                           taught in public schools in the guise of
                           “environmental science”. What kind of
                           scientists will our schools turn out given that
                           students are not exposed to the scientific
                           rigor that you mentioned in your comment.
                         @
                       Jay MacDonald says
                              - March 3, 2019
                           EPA spill was into the Animas River.
                         @
                       Mike Hanson says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           The greatest tool governments and institutions
                           have is fear, look at history, I believe it
                           will prove out my statement. Thank you for your
                           insightful and enlightened observations. I was
                           impressed by your succinct observations.
                    #
                  Ruth Henriquez Lyon says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Actually the mass extinctions have already begun,
                      and we’re in what is being called “the sixth
                      extinction” (you can google that). The normal rate
                      has been to lose 1 to 5 species per year, and we’re
                      now losing 10 or so every day. There is data to back
                      this up coming from field biologists. It’s good to
                      be skeptical, but in deciding what to believe one
                      needs the facts. The hard part is getting all the
                      facts, though.
                      Also, I’ve been reading about climate change since
                      the ’80s in science magazines, and never did I once
                      read about ice free poles by 2017 or 20 foot sea
                      level rise by 2015. I’m not sure where you’re
                      getting your info but you might want to stick to
                      peer-reviewed scientific journals when learning
                      about climate matters (or any other scientific
                      topic). The news media is really bad at doing
                      science journalism.
                         @
                       hunter says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Please show us the evidence of extinction stats
                           you refer to.
                    #
                  S Snell says
                         @ March 4, 2019
                      Sorry about your experience. But that’s what you get
                      for challenging The Narrative.
                      At least they didn’t shoot at you, like they did
                      with John Christy, of the University of Alabama, who
                      had the sheer audacity to suggest that actual data
                      does not align with scary predictions of imminent
                      planetary immolation.
                      Oh, you never heard about that?
                      Here’s the link:
                      https://www.breitbart.com/politics/2017/04/24/shots-
                      fired-at-climate-skeptics-office-during-march-for-sc
                      ience/
                      Yeah, yeah, I know. Breitbart. But it and the UAH
                      blog were about the only ones to actually run the
                      story. Imagine the reaction had those shots been
                      fired at Al Gore instead.
                    #
                  Riceinwa says
                         @ March 6, 2019
                      I sincerely doubt that any of those flooding your
                      mailbox were brave enough to actually confront you
                      face-to-face. The anonymity of the internet makes
                      fierce sounding warriors out of scared,
                      piddle-in-their pants, little children. I wouldn’t
                      worry about anyone screaming via ALL CAPS!
                    #
                  Francis Figliola says
                         @ March 7, 2019
                      Slate is a “liberal” site and a misnomer! What you
                      experienced is to be expected.
               o
             Kevin Schmidt says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Yes, it takes guts to be so willfully ignorant and
                 scientifically illiterate.
                    #
                  MAURO PORZELT says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      As you so eloquently displayed.
               o
             Marilyn Krzus says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 I am so proud ofyou for the courage of your convictions.
                 We are all being herded into groupthink and must relearn
                 how to think for ourselves. Happy to see others doing the
                 same—that is, thinking for themselves after doing their
                 own research.
               o
             Ardy says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Saw file: I was surprised to learn that coal fired
                 electricity generation, wind and solar were developed at
                 the same time – in the 1890’s. Solar and wind were not
                 used much due to intermittancy issues.
                 I have no interest in going backwards in powering our
                 life and nuclear is the only way forward at this time.
                 The new Nuclear generators (4th generation?) trialing in
                 China and India will be interesting. The problem is the
                 approval processes, battles in the courts and population
                 concern, stops many of them being built. The costs become
                 prohibitive and the time wasted to get them started and
                 then fighting to get them built is too much for most. The
                 UK just had one cancelled due to huge cost blowouts.
                 We are heading back to the dark ages – litereally!
               o
             Jay MacDonald says
                    # March 3, 2019
                 Saw File, I identify with your characterization of
                 “irrational lunatics.” An engineer for 30 years in Oil &
                 Gas, my last project was a clean cogen gas turbine unit
                 to make power and lots of steam for process heat.
                 Unfortunately, the lunatics scuttled the project because
                 they rarely understand the realities of efficiency,
                 safety and lower emissions brought by modern engineering
                 and equipment vs. 70 year-old equipment. They convinced a
                 judge that we were scary. We didn’t even get to order the
                 turbine.
               o
             Micha Casazza says
                    # March 6, 2019
                 The article author commits many sins of omission and
                 distortion. Did you notice he didn’t mention the German
                 removal of nuclear, or the lignite/brown coal German
                 powerplants that had to be restarted due to nuclear fear
                 after Fukushima?
                 He makes tortoise deaths seem inevitable after describing
                 the very mistakes that made it so.
                 Almost all species that ever lived on earth are extinct.
                 It’s a sham concern.
                 I’m degreed in physics. I’m in favor of nuclear power.
                 Nuke waste? I don’t plan for 10.000 years down the
                 line–that’s dopey.
                 Look at a satellite view of the deserts–solar farms are a
                 trivial speck on the landscape.
                 Battery tech is advancing rapidly. See Australia and
                 Tesla PowerPacks, inertial storage, hot sulfur flow
                 batteries, etc.
                 Read some of the industry journals, hydropower,
                 cleantech, etc.
                 This guy is just virtue signaling, mostly. No numbers,
                 bad comparisons.
               o
             Robert Hochstadt says
                    # March 6, 2019
                 You didn’t say what kind of facility you work in. I am
                 inferring it’s a nuclear power plant. If so good for you.
                 What is your take on SALT Reactors?
          +
        Saw file says
               o February 28, 2019
            The big miss by the author (purposefully) is: the energy
            (renewable?) end resource costs ( $ ) of creating the giant
            wind turbines, solar panels, etc.
            How long does it take for a giant wind turbine to actualize
            it’s own cost, before it becomes profitable?
            What is the real carbon and environmental cost of the
            manufacturing of the turbine?
            Is it better to take those tens of billions of dollars, and
            put them into research for hydrocarbon pollution remittance?
            Yes, the answer to our future power needs are a network of
            city sized nuclear powered electric generating plants.The
            technology is here now. The electrical transfer infrastructure
            is already in place.
            Example:if you need water to use for urban and agricultural
            use, ala, ” A bigger problem is that there are many other uses
            for the water that accumulates behind dams, namely irrigation
            and cities. And because the water in our rivers and reservoirs
            is scarce and unreliable, the water from dams for those other
            purposes is becoming ever-more precious”.
            Agree
            Build a ‘nuclear electricity generating facility’ at some
            ‘engineeringly’ safe place a bit downstream and off to the
            side. Feed into the existing power grid.
            In the mean time, invest in technology to capture and
            rationally dispose of the omissions from hydrocarbon fueled
            electricity generation.
               o
             Walter Horsting says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Net Zero will cost $127 Trillion for Massively
                 unsustainable RE:
                 https://wattsupwiththat.com/2017/07/05/monumental-unsusta
                 inable-environmental-impacts/
                 Save nature building the MSR. The Case for the Good
                 Reactor https://spark.adobe.com/page/1nzbgqE9xtUZF/
                    #
                  G. Gora says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      Thanks for the presentation!
          +
        Stephan B Feibish says
               o February 28, 2019
            This is old by now. They had a thorium reactor in
            Shippingport, Pennsylvania, USA over a half century ago. You
            don’t have to use uranium. And you can use a molten salt
            reactor where if the temperature gets too high the particles
            separate from each other and the reaction stops.
               o
             Sally Green says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Good to hear somebody speaking about Thorium, when my son
                 was an apprentice electrician about 20 yrs ago, they had
                 to do a project on alternative energy and he chose
                 Thorium. I had to print it out for him as there were not
                 many colour printers around then, so I read bits and
                 pieces & thought that it would not be long before this
                 type of electricity production would be happening. Boy
                 was I wrong, you hardly ever hear about it.
               o
             J Brooke says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Show me a Thorium reactor making commercial power. Show
                 me the liability insurance policy. Show me the bond
                 assuring storage, recycle, or remediation of spent fuels.
                 In a huge world of nuclear advocates and industry, they
                 have not built one that a banker can finance. If you find
                 it I will invest my money too. There is a world full of
                 brilliant venture capitalists ready for this “sure deal”.
                    #
                  Sally Green says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      From memory I think thorium is used in conjunction
                      with nuclear waste & it lasts for quite a long time.
                      I may well be wrong as it was a long time ago when
                      my son did his project on this, but here is an
                      article about the process.
                      http://www.mining.com/why-not-thorium/
                    #
                  Duane says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Thorium is just a nuclear fuel source, like uranium,
                      or plutonium – it is not a “reactor”. The reactor
                      power plant technologies that work with uranium work
                      just as well with thorium. Thorium is actually much
                      more abundant on earth than uranium.
                      Gen four reactors are already a reality – they are
                      already in development and will be producing power
                      commercially within just a few years. Several
                      technologies are involved with the Gen Four reactors
                      – including fast reactors, and molten salt reactors,
                      and small modular light water reactors.
                      Molten salt reactors are not “new” – they were first
                      developed by DOE way back in the 60s and 70s, then
                      forgotten when the world turned against everything
                      “nuclear” in the late 1970s and 1980s after Three
                      Mile Island and Chernobyl. MSR solve all of the
                      safety problems associated with the common light
                      water reactor, including the fact that they are fail
                      safe and cannot melt down and they do not create
                      long lived nuclear waste .. indeed MSRs use
                      liquified nuclear waste as a fuel, so they actually
                      eliminate existing stored nuclear waste. They also
                      are impossible to convert the fuel into highly
                      enriched nuclear weapons grade material, so do not
                      pose a proliferation threat.
                      In any case, the licensing is already underway,
                      Congress just enacted two laws last fall and in
                      January of this year that streamline and simplify
                      and reduce the cost of licensing new reactor plans.
                      Within a decade there will be a much larger base of
                      nuclear power reactors in the United States.
                    #
                  Ardy says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      @J Brooke, a test system is running in the
                      Netherlands and the Indians are building one and
                      also have a 800Mw fast breeder system that is
                      expected to be able to burn Thorium as well.
                      Your questions are axiomatic, but would kill any
                      innovation the human race has ever produced. There
                      is a lot very devious about your post. The ‘world of
                      venture capitalists’ would never go against all
                      western world governments current group think, even
                      they are not that risk receptive.
                      You must admit that you appear a Luddite.
               o
             J Brook says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Show me a Thorium reactor making commercial power. Show
                 me the liability insurance policy. Show me the bond
                 assuring storage, recycle, or remediation of spent fuels.
                 In a huge world of nuclear advocates and industry, they
                 have not built one that a banker can finance. If you find
                 it I will invest my money too. There is a world full of
                 brilliant venture capitalists ready for this “sure deal”.
                    #
                  Alasdair says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Check out Terrestrial Energy in Canada and their
                      Integral Molten Salt reactor. It doesn’t run on
                      Thorium but the breakthrough isn’t the fuel it’s the
                      reactor design. They have won various government
                      grants and got through the first phase of licensing.
                      It is a real technology, people are working on it.
                         @
                       Matt says
                              - March 6, 2019
                           There’s this experimental device called a
                           “mirror”. It is a real technology, people are
                           working on it. When aligned properly, the
                           “mirror” reflects sunlight onto an object, say
                           tower filled with a fluid, heating it to
                           extreme temperatures. The fluid can then be
                           used to drive a turbine and produce
                           electricity. Someday soon maybe there will be
                           breakthrough in this new “mirror” technology.
                    #
                  J Rilo says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      https://www.forbes.com/sites/energysource/2012/02/16
                      /the-thing-about-thorium-why-the-better-nuclear-fuel
                      -may-not-get-a-chance/#79b4d1451d80
                    #
                  196ski says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      The Price-Anderson Act is designed to ensure the
                      availability of adequate funds to satisfy liability
                      claims of members of the public for personal injury
                      and property damage in the unlikely event of a
                      nuclear accident. Through this program, the U.S.
                      nuclear power industry has roughly $12 billion in
                      liability insurance protection to compensate the
                      public in the event of a nuclear accident. The Act
                      was first passed in 1957 and has been extended by
                      Congress several times and now won’t expire until
                      2025.
                      Note, the Price-Anderson Act has never been invoked.
                      For the wildfire PG&E is taking responsibility in
                      California, they have booked 10.5 Billion potential
                      losses and driven the company into bankruptcy.
                      New nuclear designs will be using spent fuel for
                      fuel.
                      J Brook, if you want to see where venture
                      capitalists make their cash, look no further than
                      wind farms.
                      “We get a tax credit if we build a lot of wind
                      farms. That’s the only reason to build them. They
                      don’t make sense without the tax credit.” – Warren
                      Buffett
               o
             John PAK says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 The obvious issue with molten salts is separating out the
                 daughter radio-active products at the end. No-one has yet
                 come to terms with the complex chemistry of separating
                 these molten components other than building the reactors
                 as small modules in rock holes in the ground and simply
                 concreting over them afterwards.
                 My preference would be to build a more conventional
                 fuel-rod reactor for the Thorium fuel and use other r/a
                 sources to get it fissioning. At the end you have
                 separate fuel rods of depleted Thorium and your seeding
                 fuels which can be cooled and dissolved in acids so it
                 can be centrifuged out to reclaim all those potentially
                 useful elements.
                    #
                  Duane says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      The fission products left from MSRs are short lived,
                      requiring only a few hundred years of isolation to
                      decay away to negligible activity … as compared to
                      tens of thousands to hundreds of thousand for LWR
                      fission products to decay away. This is a huge
                      benefit of MSRs, in addition to all the other huge
                      benefits of this technology over LWRs.
               o
             Steve says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 And if we go with a standardized plant design like the
                 French instead of the one off boutique designs by GE et
                 al the cost of construction would be greatly reduced.
                    #
                  augustine says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      @Steve, quite right. I read about the French designs
                      back in the 1980s and their approach seemed
                      eminently sensible. A replicable design as you note,
                      also smaller size, and a failsafe (by gravity I
                      think) cooling system.
                      How did we ever end up with a quilt work in the U.S.
                      where every plant is its own custom design? Whatever
                      the causes I doubt the nuclear supporters had the
                      present outcome in mind.
                      We have to care and think over things that matter
                      because funders and investors absolutely do not care
                      if the return comes from rods or panels in the
                      desert.
               o
             Craig WIllms says
                    # March 4, 2019
                 I read about thorium recently (brand new to me) and
                 thought what the hell, isn’t this the answer staring us
                 right in the face?
                 What was the rub against thorium reactors? We all know
                 why uranium is considered scary.
          +
        The other white meat says
               o March 1, 2019
            Really? That’s all you got from this article?
          +
        Jim says
               o March 1, 2019
            A very relevant and important detail???
          +
        Growler says
               o March 3, 2019
            Interesting. This is what you took away from this article?
          +
        Amanda Wilson says
               o March 4, 2019
            Whatever. Did you get the point of the article???????
          +
        Samuel Clarke says
               o March 4, 2019
            Thank you!!! Glad almost dismissed this article. Jk. Great
            read though.
    2.
   zoolian (@zoolian33) says
          + February 28, 2019
       As someone who is rather skeptical of the whole global warming
       idea, I’ve never been able to reconcile the fact that those who
       claim the world is going to end in 12 years are also so
       anti-nuclear power. It’s the most obvious solution to cutting down
       large scale carbon emissions, and if the world is going to end in
       slightly more than a decade anyways, the possible side effects of
       another Fukishima would be a wash, no?
       The other issue seems to be that most carbon released comes from
       developing economies in China and India, not western countries.
       However, both China and India are already nuclear powers, so as a
       grim bonus, we wouldn’t have to worry about nuclear proliferation
       in order to cut down on their emissions.
          +
        ghoul says
               o February 28, 2019
            Actually US is the second largest CO2 emitter in the world
            (after China), far surpassing India in total emissions. And
            neither China nor India are anywhere close to US by emissions
            per capita (only oil producing countries in the Persian Gulf
            emit more per capita then US, but with tiny population their
            total emissions are negligible). And EU is the third largest
            emitter in the world.
               o
             openloop51 says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Interestingly Canada has a slightly higher per capita CO2
                 emmissions than the US. Travel distance and cold weather
                 trump sentiment.
                    #
                  maxmbj says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Why blame Trump?
                      🤔
               o
             Saw file says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @ghoal
                 I’m curious. Why would you babble such nonsense?
                 Is it because that is all you have been told, or because
                 that’s all you know?
                 I am asking because you are factually wrong and you
                 obviously need more knowledge.
                 Total co2 emissions (or anything else) are a total. A per
                 capita calculation is based on factors.
                 The volume is what ‘counts’.
                 China produces almost twice the volume as the USA.
                 My country (CDN) is high on percapita, but very low on
                 the total volume.
                 How is who, what and why for.,… let’s reservd that for a
                 different thrrad
                 List_of_countries_by_carbon_dioxide_emissions
                    #
                  geoffrey says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @Saw file and zoolian
                      You guys should not forget that China’s high
                      emissions is due to products they produce for the
                      western countries. Please imagine what would be the
                      US emissions if Apple and all these US companies
                      where actually making stuff in US soil. It makes me
                      sick when you blame the Chinese for emissions at the
                      same time that you take advantage of them for cheap
                      labor. How hypocritical…
                         @
                       Saw file says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           @Geoffrey
                           There is nothing to “forget”.
                           China’s “high omissions” (and catastrophic
                           current plution problems) are not the product
                           of western countries doing busy with/them.
                           In fact, the West doing business with China is
                           what has raised the atypical communist serf
                           there out of poverty.
                           Business agreements require co-/subcontractors
                           to adhere to regulatory standards. Such is
                           required within the trade agreements between
                           the countries. China imports.raw materials that
                           are generated with minimal impact. If the
                           government of the supplier
                           country lafs at the contractual regulations and
                           refuses to legally enforce them, how is that
                           resulting the fault of the receiving company?
                           China (CCP) is willfully shitting in it’s own
                           communiist back yard to funnel cash to the
                           upper cadre.
                           Just thinking about the filthy authoritarian
                           autocratic repressive regime that the CCP has
                           in China maked my head swell. and pissed off!
                           Which reminds me….
                           why isn’t there on running articles on Qullette
                           about China? It is the poster child. I can’t
                           recall a single post!
                           Ok….done.
                           I’ll apologize right now.
                           Fkn CCP…….
                         @
                       Saw file says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           Apology, y’all
                         @
                       Jay Salhi says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           @geoffrey
                           “You guys should not forget that China’s high
                           emissions is due to products they produce for
                           the western countries.”
                           Partially valid point. It is due mainly to
                           having a massive population whose energy
                           demands have grown with its economy over the
                           past 40 years. A majority of that energy comes
                           from coal, and their coal is dirtier than what
                           we burn in the US.
                           In a similar vein to your comment about
                           manufacturing, China is heavily involved in
                           manufacturing solar panels for export t the
                           West and in mining the earth for rare earth
                           minerals used in wind turbines. Both processes
                           due considerable environmental damage.
                         @
                       stevengregg says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           How hypocritical is it to transfer blame from
                           China to the US if any of our companies operate
                           there? This is the old lefty rhetoric that
                           blames America first for any problem, anywhere.
                         @
                       Paolo says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           @geoffrey
                           Well you get sick a bit too fast. I agree that
                           buyers of products are part responsible, in
                           some indirect way, for the production and its
                           externalities. But you shouldn’t be too fast in
                           forgetting that producers and sellers reap
                           their fair benefits from the deal, so cannot be
                           assumed to be the ‘innocent’ party in the game!
                         @
                       Peter Schaeffer says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           @ geoffrey, Alas life for the ‘factually
                           challenged’. Check out “Mapped: The world’s
                           largest CO2 importers and exporters”. According
                           to this source, 13% of China’s CO2 output is
                           from exports. So much for “You guys should not
                           forget that China’s high emissions is due to
                           products they produce for the western
                           countries”. Note that imports reduce U.S.
                           emissions by 6% according to the same source.
                    #
                  AJ says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      China is building a large number of nuclear power
                      plants (i.e. they are investing heavily to reduce
                      their emissions). We are not.
                         @
                       Craig WIllms says
                              - March 5, 2019
                           @AJ
                           I’ll take the U.S. pollution and emissions
                           stance over China’s any day. The U.S. has been
                           reducing carbon emissions per capita better
                           than any other large industrial country. Our
                           lakes, rivers and air are cleaner now than they
                           were 25 years ago. China, not so much. It’s a
                           literal environmental disaster. China has
                           reaped massive rewards from dealing with
                           Western countries, if they shit in their own
                           backyard the blame is not on the West.
                    #
                  WD says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      Very convenient to pick the lower of two numbers and
                      say that the lower one is the one that “matters”
                      ;-). We could lower your per capita volume by just
                      bringing all of the Big Three automotive work back
                      here to the USA :-). Problem solved :-).
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @ghoul
                 The US emits 15% of the total. So even if we eliminated
                 our emissions altogether (an impossibility), the world
                 would still have an issue. India is only 7% of the total
                 but it is a developing country with a massive population.
                 As developing countries develop, they are going to emit
                 more CO2.
               o
             Paul Roundy (@PaulRoundy1) says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 The difficulty with places like India and Brazil is that
                 their growth rate will eventually lead them to outpace
                 the US and China in emissions. It’s a huge future
                 problem. Plus, it would be immoral to stop them from
                 advancing themselves out of poverty.
                    #
                  Peter Schaeffer says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @PaulRoundyt, India yes, Brazil no. Brazil does not
                      have enough people to (eventually) pass the U.S. in
                      CO2 output. India does. India also has substantial
                      coal resources whereas Brazil has essentially none.
                      India will pass the U.S. in CO2 output roughly 15
                      years from now. Might be a bit sooner. Might be a
                      bit later. Note that China’s emissions grew
                      spectacularly after 2005. This was unexpected (in
                      the US at least) at the time. Could a CO2 growth
                      spurt occur in India? Unclear (at least to me).
                      Could the reverse happen? Unclear (at least to me).
                    #
                  Jimbino says
                         @ March 4, 2019
                      Brazil has roughly 2/3 the population density of the
                      USSA. An Amerikan baby promises future pollution far
                      greater than that of a Brazilian or even Indian
                      baby. What we need to do is put a stop to all the
                      Amerikan breeding, especially since it is the
                      progeny of the breeders who stand to gain most from
                      any sacrifices made by current populations, and
                      especially by us non-breeders.
               o
             david of Kirkland says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @ghoul – Per capita may make you feel better, but try
                 breathing the air and drinking the water in the big
                 cities of the USA vs. China or India. Just because you
                 have a billion desperately poor rural folks and slums to
                 aid your per-capita calculation doesn’t mean they are
                 even close to being as clean per capita as we are.
               o
             Peter Schaeffer says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 ghoul, the U.S. isn’t even close to being the largest CO2
                 emitter (per-capita). According to Wikipedia, the U.S.
                 ranked 11th in 2014 (least year available from
                 Wikipedia). U.S. emissions were around 1/3rd of Qatar
                 (number 1). China is (by far) the largest CO2 emitter in
                 the world (around double the USA) and emits more CO2
                 per-capita than Europe.
                 However, the most important statistic is that developing
                 countries account for 63% of global CO2 emissions (and
                 all of the growth). GHG debates in the U.S and Europe
                 amount to conflicts about the number of angels on the
                 head of a pin.
                    #
                  geoffrey says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @ Peter Schaeffer
                      You either do not know how to read a table or you
                      deliberately lie and hope we will not notice. You
                      start talking about per capita emissions and when
                      you are about to compare USA and China you switch to
                      total emissions.
                      To get the important thing straight, USA is 11th in
                      CO2 emissions per capita and China is 42nd.
                         @
                       Peter Schaeffer says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           @geoffrey, you have accused me of either lying
                           or not being able to read a table. Alas, can
                           you find any actual errors in my statistics?
                           Probably not, because my numbers are correct.
                           As for the China being 42nd in per-capita CO2…
                           The atmosphere doesn’t care. Total CO2 output
                           is what matters and China is #1 (by far) with
                           fossil fuel CO2 emissions more than double the
                           U.S. (Wikipedia 2015 data).
                           Of course, we could include non-fossil fuel CO2
                           emissions (mostly from concrete production).
                           That would make China’s lead considerably
                           greater.
                           We could also look at CO2 per-unit of GDP.
                           China ranks 6th. The U.S. is not even in the
                           top 30.
                         @
                       goldminor says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           The important point about total emissions is
                           that per capita/emissions mean nothing to
                           nature.
                    #
                  geoffrey says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @ Peter Schaeffer
                      I see.. So the atmosphere does not care about the
                      per capita emissions, but it cares about how big in
                      size and population each country is (which is the
                      most important factor for the total emissions) or
                      what is the GDP of each country, right? Oh please..
               o
             Peter Schaeffer says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 @ghoul, I want to thank you for teaching me that Curacao,
                 Trinidad and Tobago, Sint Maarten and Luxembourg are
                 really in the Middle East. I didn’t know that. My
                 ignorance was total. I am so ashamed.
               o
             Fernando Leza says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Per capita emissions are irrelevant when we estimate the
                 impact of a country’s CO2 emissions reduction policies.
                 The US could ruin its economy adopting socialism as
                 suggested by Democrats and that would indeed reduce its
                 emissions. It would also create a worldwide economic
                 crisis, and reduce emissions even more. But the world
                 economy would not be able to afford the investment in new
                 energy sources, so it would continue to burn coal, and of
                 course the poverty caused by the economic ruin would lead
                 to starvation in poor countries and huge refugee
                 flows…caused by the adoption of socialism.
                    #
                  hunter says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Actually, if history is a guide, socialism
                      correlates very highly to degraded environment and
                      health.
               o
             George Steele says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Yes, but we’re efficient. We consume less energy per unit
                 of productivity than these countries – so a rational
                 analysis would say that all energy should be consumed by
                 the US, for the good of the planet. The difference is
                 that our emissions are decreasing faster than anywhere
                 else in the world, whereas the two countries you cited
                 are leading the world in emissions increases. Nothing the
                 US can do would stop an increase in world CO2 emissions;
                 nothing.
               o
             Tim says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Not sure why per capita emissions matter, it is total
                 emissions that matter. A two person country could
                 theoretically lead the world in per capita emissions but
                 rank last in total emissions.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            “the possible side effects of another Fukishima would be a
            wash, no?”
            Misinformation about Fukishima is widespread, based largely on
            ignorance, fear mongering and the overreaction of politicians.
            An earthquake and a tsunami killed around 16,000 people. The
            nuclear reactor was not the cause of death.
               o
             Doctor Locketopus says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Yes. At Fukushima, you had:
                 1) Outdated reactor,
                 2) Massive earthquake (magnitude 9!)
                 3) Devastating tsunami.
                 4) Fire that took all reactor control systems offline.
                 Number of deaths from radiation exposure? Zero.
                 Imagine what would happen if a similar scenario played
                 out at (say) the Three Gorges Dam in China.
                    #
                  hunter says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Don’t forget that Tokyo Electric had been warned
                      about the under-need seawall. It was too short by
                      multiple meters, and backup generators we’re low,
                      where tsunami surge could ruin them easily.
                    #
                  Steven says
                         @ March 5, 2019
                      0 ? even the officials says its about 20
                      And they think 2000 irradiates, some “cleaners” are
                      right now in court case agaisnt the state
                      Check your facts.
               o
             Steven says
                    # March 5, 2019
                 but part of japan is empty from people for decades….
                 imagine if it went to tokyo ( and there was a for it ) ?
                 I heard the ex prime minister of japan 3 days ago in a
                 long interview, he was ultra pro nuclear before Fukushima
                 accident.
                 He has changed his mind when he understood what could
                 have happen with a little less luck.
          +
        geoffrey says
               o February 28, 2019
            @ Saw file
            Dude, China has a civilization of thousands of years and you
            tell me that the “Western businessmen” saved them by
            transferring there the production of f**g iphones?
               o
             Doctor Locketopus says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 At least 15 million people starved to death in China
                 between 1959 and 1960, “ancient civilization” or not.
                 That’s if you believe the official government statistics,
                 which no one does. Scholarly estimates are in the 30-45
                 million range.
                 Marxism kills, dude.
          +
        Paul Roundy (@PaulRoundy1) says
               o February 28, 2019
            It’s true that many people who support the anthropogenic
            warming hypothesis have political biases in the direction you
            describe, but this point says nothing about the truth of the
            global warming claim.
               o
             Christopher Dizon says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 …. AGW has been tested more than pretty much any other
                 theory. It’s as much a theory as gravity. It stopped
                 being a ‘hypothesis’ ~100 years ago.
                    #
                  D-Rex says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @ Christopher
                      Apart from scandalously flawed computer models,
                      please inform us how AGW has been actually tested?
                      In empirical terms, it hasn’t even started being an
                      actual ‘hypothesis’ let alone a theory.
                    #
                  BrianB says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      As I noted regarding your other comment below, so
                      what?
                      The question is not so much does a thing happen, but
                      what is its magnitude, is it detrimental or
                      beneficial, what would it cost to militate, etc?
                      The evidence more CO2 causes higher temperatures is
                      relatively strong. After that the science and our
                      understanding of the climate system, its feedbacks
                      and mechanisms are incomplete and rudimentary, often
                      politically driven, often of appalling quality,
                      often very difficult to even measure [hence the
                      reliance on models rather than repeatable experiment
                      and direct observation] and subject inevitably to
                      margins of error so great that often no reasonable
                      conclusion can even be drawn from what numbers they
                      do churn out.
                      There is a great deal of evidence AGW is real. There
                      is almost none that we are facing a catastrophe. But
                      there is an entire planet full of arm waving,
                      conjectures, politically and economically driven
                      hysteria and propaganda and rent seeking.
                      Until that changes the theory of AGW is interesting
                      but of little to no concern to rational people.
                         @
                       S Snell says
                              - March 4, 2019
                           Global warming is real in that the planet has
                           clearly warmed some in the last 150 years.
                           However, how much of that is due to rebound
                           from the Little Ice Age, and how much is due to
                           a thirty-percent increase in the concentration
                           of a rather minor greenhouse gas? IMO the
                           former, not the latter is likely the dominant
                           factor.
                    #
                  hunter says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Christopher, you are not merely wrong.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > I’ve never been able to reconcile the fact that those who
            claim the world is going to end in 12 years are also so
            anti-nuclear power.
            That is because their agenda was largely written by the
            disinformation section of the KGB, way back in the Cold War.
            It’s not designed to make things better. It’s designed to make
            things worse.
            You can make a 100% reliable prediction as to whether
            “leftists” will support any given idea by simply asking
            yourself whether that idea will damage the United States, or
            the West at large.
            Most who support such ideas are simply gullible dupes, but the
            origin of nearly every “leftist” agenda item can be traced
            straight back to Dzerhzhinsky Square.
               o
             Christopher Dizon says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Nuclear is ~4x the cost of wind and solar. How is it
                 understandable that an EV that is ~4x the cost of other
                 cars is too expensive but it’s somehow acceptable for
                 nuclear to be 4x the cost of other sources of clean
                 energy? Nuclear is RIDICULOUSLY overpriced. ~10x more per
                 kW and ~4x more per kWh!
                    #
                  BrianB says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Granting your assertions for the sake of argument,
                      so what?
                      Because solar and wind are intermittent we still
                      require an entire infrastructure of base load power
                      plants to take up the slack when the sun doesn’t
                      shine and the wind doesn’t blow. So as an inevitable
                      part of a renewable energy system we get the cost of
                      non renewables and on top of that the cost of
                      renewables. When you then compare costs I’m thinking
                      your figures no longer work, right?
                      The typical answer is filling up dams or some
                      magical battery innovation just around the bend that
                      either eliminate the supposed cost differential,
                      don’t exist or simply can’t be done.
                      Here’s the basic problem with your argument;
                      utilities like to make money. If solar and wind are
                      actually that much cheaper they would be
                      decommissioning all their old plants and putting up
                      renewables. Energy costs would decline and they’d
                      still make more money.
                      But in fact, everywhere on the planet renewables
                      increase as a share of energy production energy
                      prices skyrocket.
                         @
                       Ardy says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           Brian B: In Australia the energy companies make
                           more money out of renewables due to government
                           subsidies. This has resulted in many coal fired
                           generators being closed down or blown up as in
                           one stupid South Australian piece of political
                           madness.
                    #
                  augustine says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Because the way we do nuclear in the U.S. has been
                      horribly inefficient (possibly deliberately):
                      absence of a national system of replicable,
                      manageable size plants, failsafes, effective
                      education and publicity campaigns, etc. (See the
                      French idea, above comments).
                      P.S. No one ever questioned the theory of gravity.
          +
        Alan Gore says
               o March 1, 2019
            Because weather is the result of a vast complex of
            interlocking feedback loops, it is not easy to correlate
            weather with climate. But to me the most convincing evidence
            for the greenhouse hypothesis is the melting of long-term ice.
            I have seen this happening in the far north, at Svinajokull,
            and in the deep south at Franz Josef Glacier.
            The US could lead in getting to zero net carbon emission by
            2050. And the only way to do so in a country with large cities
            and heavy industries is to go nuclear.
               o
             Ardy says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Alan Gore: Have a read of some papers from the 1930s
                 talking about the loss of sea ice in the arctic. Then in
                 the 70’s we had global cooling and the solution presented
                 by some scientists was to burn more fossil fuels!
                 Scientific prognostications are rarely if ever correct.
                 Re CO2 it is a heating gas and nobody can argue against
                 that as proven in the 1800’s. Then coal generation, wind
                 and solar electricity generation was developed in the
                 1890’s and the stupid are trying to make solar and wind
                 work today after they were dismissed as a major supplier
                 of electricity over 100 years ago.
                 Let’s move forwards not backwards!
          +
        S Snell says
               o March 1, 2019
            Hard-core greens don’t care that a full implementation of
            their grand plan would basically take us back to the 17th
            century, with a great deal of avoidable death and general
            misery along the way. That’s the whole point.They really don’t
            like their fellow humans very much at all.
            Here’s the plan:
            (1) Kill their energy supply, (2) let their societies
            collapse, (3) pesky humans go back to being just another life
            form struggling for survival. (4) Gaia’s happy. It’s
            eco-rainbow Utopia!
               o
             Ardy says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 S.Snell you should listen to ‘Nothing but Flowers’ by
                 talking heads. They are talking about a post modern
                 world. ‘Caught a rattle snake, now we have something for
                 dinner’.
          +
        S Snell says
               o March 4, 2019
            Now which version of “the world will end in X years” is this?
            I cannot keep them all straight. Here’s another from 1989.
            https://www.apnews.com/bd45c372caf118ec99964ea547880cd0
            The more things change . . .
               o
             Ardy says
                    # March 4, 2019
                 S.Snell: noted that article was written 30 years ago!
                 Most of today’s drum bangers were not alive when that was
                 written So they have no context of how stupid they are..
                 The Greens are still banging the same drum today.
                 Eventually they will be right but we may have to wait
                 until our sun goes nova or a large meteor strikes and
                 sends it out of orbit.
    3.
   George. says
          + February 28, 2019
       Ironically environmental fundamentalism is rapidly becoming a major
       threat to the environment.
          +
        Simon Johnson says
               o February 28, 2019
            “Ironically environmental fundamentalism is rapidly becoming a
            major threat to the environment.”
            How so?
               o
             Saw file says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @Simon J.
                 You didn’t read the article?
               o
             cirsium says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Facts
               o
             cirsium says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Very simple. Facts.
               o
             George. says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Through the law of unintended consequences that results
                 from the emotion inherent in years of unrestrained
                 hyperbole. The rainforests, just like birds and bats,
                 have already copped a hiding from these scare tactics but
                 that’s nothing compared to the fallout that’s likely if
                 they manage to collapse the global economy.
                 “The ugly reality is that “green” fuels are destroying
                 rainforests, accelerating climate change and condemning
                 millions to poverty and hunger. … Skyrocketing demand is
                 destroying delicate ecosystems as rainforest land is
                 slashed and burned to make room for oil palm, soy and
                 sugar cane monocultures.”
                 https://www.rainforest-rescue.org/topics/biofuel
                    #
                  Saw file says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @Georgethr
                      The borial forests in Canada are doing fine
                         @
                       Doctor Locketopus says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           They won’t be if Western civilization abandons
                           coal and oil for “renewables”.
                           Note that, despite the constant propaganda
                           about “vanishing forests”, there is more
                           forested land in the Lower 48 now than there
                           was at the turn of the 20th Century.
                           One reason for that is that wood heating went
                           from a commonplace to a niche over that period
                           of time.
                           One need merely look at the denuded landscapes
                           in countries where wood fuel is still the norm
                           to see a picture of the future if we go to
                           “renewables”.
               o
             George says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Not just birds and bats as in the article but
                 unprecedented destruction of rainforests has occured on
                 the altar of global warming. Unfortunately when you to
                 the hyperbole to an hysterical extent as is happening at
                 the moment the law of unintended consequences tends to
                 kick in
                 “The ugly reality is that “green” fuels are destroying
                 rainforests, accelerating climate change and condemning
                 millions to poverty and hunger. … Skyrocketing demand is
                 destroying delicate ecosystems as rainforest land is
                 slashed and burned to make room for oil palm, soy and
                 sugar cane monocultures.”
                 https://www.rainforest-rescue.org/topics/biofuel
                    #
                  dirk says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      Why are rainforests dwindling? In the Amazon, mainly
                      because cattle owners are expanding and even get
                      subsidies to plant grass instead of maintaining
                      those rich forests, in SE Asia, it is the expansion
                      of the oilpalm plantations. These processes simply
                      are going on and on, I wonder whether there is any
                      influence of climate change programs or manifests,
                      though, investments in oilpalm for biofuel could be
                      a factor (and this would be a big shame,
                      unbelievable, unpardonable).
                    #
                  Peter Schaeffer says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @Doctor Locketopus, Wow is that ever true. Without
                      fossil fuels the environmental devastation from the
                      cutting of trees would have been overwhelming. As
                      early as 1500 AD, the UK was mining coal on a large
                      scale to save its forests (that was the practical
                      effect of coal production, not the intent).
                      In Switzerland, the cutting of trees was moving to
                      progressively steeper slopes in the 19th century.
                      The Swiss weren’t stupid or crazy. They knew that
                      cutting trees on steep slopes would result in
                      devastating erosion. However, given Switzerland’s
                      climate and growing population (back then), they
                      didn’t know what else to do.
                      As it turns out, the Swiss eco-catastrophe never
                      happened. Switzerland found that it could import
                      coal from Germany (and the USA) instead. The forests
                      of Switzerland were saved. However, they were saved
                      by fossil fuels (later Switzerland dammed its rivers
                      for power).
                      Note that I am not Swiss, but have lived and worked
                      in Switzerland a bit.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @Simon Johnson
                 The State of Vermont retired its only nuclear reactor
                 several years ago. Bernie and the usual suspect cheered.
                 The plan was to replace nuclear with wind. At the moment,
                 there is litigation in the courts trying to block a wind
                 “farm” because the farm will be in the heart of black
                 bear habitat. It would take 59 wind farms to generate the
                 same electricity as the retired nuclear plant once
                 generated. And retiring the nuclear plant has resulted in
                 higher CO2 emissions and higher electricity prices.
                 So in the name of saving the planet, the citizens of
                 Vermont are killing bears, emitting more CO2 and paying
                 higher energy bills.
                    #
                  stevengregg says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      The SJWs had to destroy Vermont to save it.
               o
             hunter says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Fly over the vast areas littered with windmills or solar
                 cells and ask how that is possibly good for the
                 environment.
    4.
   PtCNT says
          + February 28, 2019
       Agree with most of this but the initial $ cost of nuclear builds Is
       simply too high. >$3k/kW with long build times just doesn’t attract
       investors (even scares off public funding).
       The industry needs to focus on their small modular reactor
       technology, that will allow faster return on investment and more
       grid compatibility through flexible capacity and demand/supply
       matching.
       And stop bloody closing down nuclear plants before their time, it’s
       one of the stupidest energy policies imaginable (happens in US and
       parts of EU).
       Australia could smarten up immediately by repealing the ban on
       nuclear energy and properly assess its low emissions options.
          +
        david of Kirkland says
               o February 28, 2019
            Most of the construction cost is due to government regulations
            over the fears they instilled in the citizenry.
               o
             augustine says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Maybe, but the fact that each U.S. plant is designed from
                 scratch has a lot to do with high costs also.
    5.
   PtCNT says
          + February 28, 2019
       Agree with most of this but the initial $ cost of nuclear builds Is
       simply too high. >$3k/kW with long build times just doesn’t attract
       investors (even scares off public funding).
       The industry needs to focus on their small modular reactor
       technology, that will allow faster return on investment and more
       grid compatibility through flexible capacity and supply.
       And stop bloody closing down nuclear plants before their time, it’s
       one of the stupidest energy policies imaginable (happens in US and
       parts of EU).
       Australia could smarten up immediately by repealing the ban on
       nuclear energy and properly assess its low emissions options.
          +
        mike87122 says
               o February 28, 2019
            The reason nuclear energy is so expensive is because of all
            the opposition from anti-nuclear environmentalists. There’s no
            reason it has to be so expensive.
          +
        Pacy says
               o February 28, 2019
            As a nuclear-trained engineer no longer working in the
            industry, I can attest that the majority of nuclear plant
            construction costs (and operating costs) are
            regulatory-driven. None of these regulations improve safety,
            but have been imposed through the years as a sacrifice to the
            anti-nuclear activists. Smarter regulation (i.e., constructive
            not punitive) would dramatically bring down the cost of
            building and operating the next generation nuclear plants.
            As a side note, nuclear waste is a problem in the US but not
            France or Switzerland because Jimmy Carter banned the
            reprocessing of spent fuel. This increases the volume of waste
            by orders of magnitude.
    6.
   Amin says
          + February 28, 2019
       Good article. There are downsides for sure. But it is unclear how
       limited the author wants renewables to be. Clearly, there is no one
       solution and even with Nuclear energy.
          +
        Steve says
               o February 28, 2019
            “But it is unclear how limited the author wants renewables to
            be.”
            Perfectly clear: none.
            “Clearly, there is no one solution and even with Nuclear
            energy.”
            His entire point was that there’s one solution: nuclear
            energy.
               o
             JFM says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 I don’t think the author meant none, just that there are
                 limits that technology can’t bridge in the short term,
                 hence using nuclear to accelerate the transition. Saying
                 no PV is as nonsensical as saying no nukes.
                    #
                  AJ says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      I heard an interview with Mike. His answer to the
                      optimal number of PV farms I think would be “zero”.
                      He noted that the best grid would be nuclear and
                      hydro only. PV farms take up far too much land and
                      are reliably unreliable–no power generation when
                      it’s dark, which happens every day.
                         @
                       Fluffy Buffalo says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           “No power generation when it’s night” as a
                           reason to completely reject PV? Really? That
                           would be a daft point of view for anyone who
                           realizes that electricity consumption during
                           daytime is much higher than at night.
               o
             Tersitus says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Maybe-/ but I still want a transportation bridge fuel—
                 natgas. Cleaner relative to present tense, cheaper,
                 energy dense, so abundant we’re wasting it, refitted
                 internal combustion technologies current, storage and
                 delivery technologies as well, recycled waste sourcing
                 too. And the jobs & skills tie-in to current oil
                 production, so much less restructuring disruption to
                 businesses and lives.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @Tersitus
                      “but I still want a transportation bridge fuel—
                      natgas”
                      The shale revolution is the best thing to happen to
                      the US in decades. Cheap energy, economic growth and
                      lower CO2 emissions.
                      New York state sits on top of vast reserves that
                      could be tapped. But the politicians say no. No to
                      fracking, no to pipelines. Instead these green
                      geniuses are encouraging freezing residents to stay
                      warm by burning wood. Yes, wood which is worse than
                      coal but somehow qualifies as renewable in green
                      insanity land and gets marketed as “biomass” to
                      confuse the public who might have been previously
                      been informed that cutting down trees is bad.
               o
             Amin says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @ Steve
                 It isn’t clear. He brings up good points. But the article
                 is low in actual evidence. We have built massive amounts
                 of infrastructure – so why is putting down solar farms
                 all of a sudden such a massive no-no?
                 Imagine if you are in country near the equator where sun
                 shows its face regularly… how is sticking solar panels to
                 produce electricity is all that harmful to animals.
                 US might not have such large-scale energy problems but
                 many countries do. I don’t think putting solar farms in
                 Indian dessert is all that damaging. Sure, in some places
                 like UK, wind farms can only go so far.
                 “His entire point was that there’s one solution: nuclear
                 energy.”
                 Well that is then outright silly. There is no one
                 solution and never will be.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @Amin
                      “I don’t think putting solar farms in Indian dessert
                      is all that damaging”
                      Desserts are not good locations for solar farms. Too
                      much dust, which has to be cleaned from the panels
                      on a regular basis, which requires lots of water and
                      energy.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            “There are downsides for sure.”
            All energy technology has downsides. We need to do cost
            benefit analysis and chose the best options. Nuclear is the
            best option. Solar and wind are wasteful distractions.
    7.
   interguru says
          + February 28, 2019
       I would not count batteries out. There has been great progress in
       reducing their cost, and there is no reason that this progress will
       not continue in the future.
       Every nuclear project runs into horrendous cost overruns. There are
       two half built nuclear plants abandoned when their contractor,
       Westinghouse, went bankrupt over the overruns. This is not just an
       American problem, projects in Great Britain and Finland have run
       into the same issue.
       See
       https://www.forbes.com/sites/michaelshellenberger/2018/06/21/if-inn
       ovation-makes-everything-cheaper-why-does-it-make-nuclear-power-mor
       e-expensive/#535bd322d7d9
          +
        ga gamba says
               o February 28, 2019
            No, you can’t count batteries out, but you have to acknowledge
            that without recharge you’re screwed. You experience an
            extended period of cloudy days or little wind and your
            emission-free power generation sources aren’t recharging those
            batteries.
            Further, look at how lithium is gathered for lithium-ion
            batteries. A lot of the mineral is to be gathered at the
            10,582 km² (4,100 miles², about 70 per cent of size of
            Connecticut) Uyuni salt flat in Bolivia – about 70 per cent of
            the world’s lithium is there if you accept the most optimistic
            estimated of 100 million tonnes, though the US Geologic Survey
            states 9 million. Bolivia hopes to be the Saudi Arabia of
            lithium, but it’s also a country that natlonalises businesses;
            it’s tough to attract investors who fear that their plants may
            be appropriated by the government once they’re built and
            running. Argentina and Chile are the two other major producers
            of salt-flat produced lithium. Australia is a top producer
            using conventional strip mining.
            The process requires the salt plain to be flooded, but this is
            an arid area with little water – 141 mm (5.5 inches) of
            rainfall on average annually. It takes approximately 500,000
            gallons of water per tonne of lithium. Extraction vehicles cut
            horizontally through the salt crust to expose the lithium and
            other minerals found mixed in a salty mud sitting. To extract
            it, mining equipment pump the brine into massive ponds, where
            it is left to evaporate for months. Then a series of chemical
            processes, for example using lime and hydrochloric acid, are
            performed to separate the minerals and refine the lithium. For
            export it needs to be transported 500 miles to the nearest
            port.
            This is the next gotcha; Bolivia wants to be the centre of
            battery production too. Most batteries are presently
            manufactured in East Asia and the US.
            Two other key battery ingredients, cobalt and nickel, also
            pose a significant risk of creating a bottleneck in the move
            towards electrifying everything. Cobalt is found almost
            exclusively in the Democratic Republic of Congo. It is very
            toxic.
            Ironically, the environmentalists now complain about the
            destruction of the salt plain and the pollution created as
            well as how cobalt miners are poisoning themselves and their
            land.
            All these problems may be overcome, but will it happen in the
            12 years before the climate irrecoverably changes and we,
            together with the planet, all die? Unlikely. But if that
            happens, we won’t need to worry about challenges of black
            starting emission-free power plants performed to bootstrap the
            power grid into operation. There’s always an upside, even with
            the downsides.
               o
             Menicholas says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Batteries also wear out. They have a limited life span,
                 so after paying up hugely for them it needs to be spent
                 again. And again, And again…forever.
                 And what to do with those batteries?
                 Few have stopped to consider the scale that a battery
                 reserve of grid-scale power would have to be.
                 All of the batteries made in the world last year would
                 not store enough to power a single state for a day.
          +
        reader says
               o March 1, 2019
            hydrogen electrolysis is quite viable by now to store energy,
            tech wise. Cost is still not competitive for general purpose,
            but quite viable in many applications already.
    8.
   Amin says
          + February 28, 2019
       Good article. There are many downsides for sure. It is unclear how
       limited the author wishes renewables to be. Clearly, there is no
       one solution to the world energy needs, even with Nuclear.
          +
        Michael Robb says
               o March 6, 2019
            I hope someone has by now corrected the disinformation that
            atomic powered is so many times more expensive that
            alternatives. It is not more expensive.
            Atomic powered electricity can be produced for one cent pkwh
            and sold fora 3 cents plus.
            This price more than adequate to repay construction and
            investment costs and amortize the capital investment according
            to relevant acceptable accounting standards.
            References upon request.
    9.
   gda says
          + February 28, 2019
       You can always tell those which “greenies” are serious, and
       possibly worth having a conversation with, by their attitude to
       nuclear.
       My understanding is that molten-salt reactors may possibly hold the
       key to dissipating the arguments regarding cost, size, meltdown
       risk and storage of nuclear waste.
       So why aren’t we committing vast sums to making those happen? They
       aren’t like fusion reactors – always 40 years in the future. Or
       false hopes, like solar and wind.
       Call me when the so-called Paris Accord incorporates those ideas;
       gets serious about who exactly is the problem, demands they take
       necessary steps NOW; and stops with the nonsense about forcing the
       West to surrender their oil, gas and coal within 10 years (else the
       sky will fall) – or is that just the “New Green Deal”?
       But scaremongering to achieve certain socialist goals is what
       “climate change” is all about. They don’t need to achieve those
       goals in the worst polluter of them all, so no need to bug China
       etc. about their emissions.
       Funny that none of these folk mention the FACT that even if the US
       switched to using renewables ONLY for the next 60 years, even their
       over-egged climate models predict it would make an unnoticeable 0.1
       degree difference to world temperatures by 2080.
          +
        Ellar S says
               o February 28, 2019
            Conspiracy theorist loon.
               o
             hunter says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Ellar.S,
                 Please show us the conspiracy ideation.
                 You seem more like a reactionary dismissing something you
                 don’t want to addtrss.
          +
        Rendall says
               o February 28, 2019
            @gda
            Thanks for this, and thanks to Quillette for allowing me/us to
            hear your perspective. It is the first time I have ever read a
            succinct, adult and rational explanation of what arguably
            could align with “climate-change denial”.
            I hear you saying that the current climate change discussion
            has an element of hysteria that is designed, not to solve the
            coming problems, but to push a specific political agenda.
            Alternative solutions are pushed out of the discussion.
   10.
   Screw the Ruling Class says
          + February 28, 2019
       Even if nuclear power is a faster, cheaper, better, and safer
       source of carbon-neutral electricity than solar and wind, fission
       fails to solve all our problems. For one thing the supply of
       uranium is limited–it may last till the end of the century at the
       present rate of consumption–less as we use more. (And true, there
       are fixes for that too — breeder reactors, thorium reactors etc.,
       each with their own set of problems.)
       But whether we use sun, wind, nuclear, coal, gas, bullshit, or
       nothing, there is LESS in our future than we will like.
       There is no magic energy supply. Extracting our sustenance from the
       earth takes energy, disrupts environments, and will, if we aren’t
       very careful, totally degrade the soil, air, and/or oceans. We will
       produce waste which will refuse to disappear, and no matter what,
       we can not supply any amount of goods to an ever-growing
       population.
       Less people, less energy, less production, less consumption, less
       waste. Less is not more, and it will be all we will get. Stepping
       off the whizzy carousel of consumption will be a terribly jolting
       experience, but if we stay on it, the merry-go-round will
       eventually fly apart, and that will be worse than merely terrible.
          +
        Saw file says
               o February 28, 2019
            @screw the working class
            ” the supply of uranium is limited–it may last till the end of
            the century at the present rate of consumption–less”
            That’s what was said about “peak oil”. So how did that
            declaration turn out?
            More resources are just awaiting to be found. Nobody knows
            what is all out there.
            Waste can be minimized and controlled. Safely and
            environmentally soundly.
            “Less people, less energy, less production, less consumption,
            less waste. Less is not more, and it will be all we will get.
            Stepping off the whizzy carousel of consumption will be a
            terribly jolting experience, but if we stay on it, the
            merry-go-round will eventually fly apart, and that will be
            worse than merely terrible.”
            Ok then, you can lead the parade of lemming’s. There’s a cliff
            near you…
               o
             Screw the Ruling Class says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @”saw file”
                 “That’s what was said about “peak oil”. So how did that
                 declaration turn out?”
                 It turned out as expected. We passed peak oil maybe… 2 or
                 3 decades ago. So why haven’t we run out of oil? “Peak
                 oil” doesn’t mean “dry well”. The curve of the trailing
                 edge of oil extraction resembles the leading edge. This
                 profile of oil supply was worked out as part of the
                 petroleum industry’s long range planning — before we
                 started worrying about global warming.
                 We probably have a century of oil supply that is
                 obtainable at less energy than the oil itself contains.
                 After we have drawn that out of the earth, oil will
                 remain in the ground but it will not be worth the energy
                 expenditure to pull it up, because the extraction energy
                 will exceed the energy of the oil obtained, never mind
                 cost in dollars.
                 “Peak oil” means a diminishing yield as time passes. The
                 ‘easy’ oil (in many areas) has been tapped out. The more
                 difficult shale oil is extracted by fracking when the
                 price of oil is high enough to justify the added cost.
                 North Dakota’s oil economy has boomed and busted several
                 times as the price has risen and fallen. Saudi Arabia, on
                 the other hand, still has a pretty large supply of ‘easy
                 oil’.
                 As for uranium, it has never been an abundant element,
                 and it takes about 27 tons of refined uranium a year for
                 a 1000 megawatt power plant
                 “Ok then, you can lead the parade of lemming’s. There’s a
                 cliff near you…”
                 Sorry, but the cliff will come to you; deprivation will
                 be obligatory.
                    #
                  Saw file says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      So what exists in the earth’s crust is all known
                      now.
                      The science is settled.
                      I now kowtow. (/sarc)
                      “We passed peak oil maybe… 2 or 3 decades ago. So
                      why haven’t we run out of oil? “Peak oil” doesn’t
                      mean “dry well”. The curve of the trailing edge of
                      oil extraction resembles the leading edge. This
                      profile of oil supply was worked out as part of the
                      petroleum industry’s long range planning — before we
                      started worrying about global warming.”
                      There is no “maybe” about it. We didn’t.
                      New hydrocarbon reserves are being found
                      continually,all over the world.
                      Plz post your graphs, and your conspiracy evidence.
                    #
                  Glenn Pollock says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      You could use Thorium in a molten salt reactor.
                    #
                  Surreptitious Evil says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      it takes it take about 27 tonnes of refined uranium
                      a year
                      About 25 time less than that.
                    #
                  hinhun says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      Screw,
                      No, peak oil did not turn out as expected at all.
                      Just like the gresg fraudster, Ehrlich, it was a
                      false prediction.
                      Your defending it by repearing the deceitful
                      platitudes and claptrap of eventually blah blah does
                      not make you look brighter.
                    #
                  Ftrftr Nd says
                         @ March 6, 2019
                      “It turned out as expected. We passed peak oil
                      maybe… 2 or 3 decades ago.”
                      False.
                      1987 world oil production: 56.7 million barrels per
                      day
                      1997 world oil production: 65.8 million barrels per
                      day
                      2007 world oil production: 73.3 million barrels per
                      day
                      2017 world oil production: 81.1 million barrels per
                      day
                      https://www.eia.gov/totalenergy/data/browser/?tbl=T1
                      1.01B#/?f=A&start=1973&end=2017&charted=0-11-12
                      “We probably have a century of oil supply that is
                      obtainable at less energy than the oil itself
                      contains.”
                      Uh huh, sure. You obviously aren’t familiar with the
                      readily-available history of world oil production,
                      so I’m sure we can take your apocalyptic predictions
                      about future production trends and economics
                      straight to the bank.
                      “Sorry, but the cliff will come to you; deprivation
                      will be obligatory.”
                      I hear cats and dogs will be living together too.
               o
             Screw the Ruling Class says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @”saw file” That’s what was said about “peak oil”. So how
                 did that declaration turn out?
                 It is working out the way they said it would when it was
                 predicted about 30 or 40 years ago. The profile of oil
                 production is more or less a normal distribution. The
                 leading and trailing profile are similar. It took 140
                 years to go from zero to peak production (a couple
                 decades ago), and it will take another 140 years to go
                 from peak production to zero. We will reach zero
                 production when the oil left in the ground is too
                 difficult to extract — that is, it will take more energy
                 to get it out than the oil itself contains.
                 In the post-peak meantime, oil production will decline
                 over the coming century, everything else being equal).
                 Peak oil NEVER meant “dry well”. Again, everything else
                 being equal, the price of oil will tend to rise.
                 “Ok then, you can lead the parade of lemming’s. There’s a
                 cliff near you…”
                 You will not need a leader because the cliff will come to
                 you. Material deprivation will not be optional…
                    #
                  Saw file says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      ,@screw everything
                      I’m not asking you to prove it , but at least show
                      something to back up your opinion.
                    #
                  Tersitus says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Screw— I’m broadly in agreement with you on much
                      here— we’re on the declining side of peak fossil,
                      our energy future looks to be more constrained, our
                      current resources and technologies are inadeqste to
                      long term future needs. Not sure that leads to the
                      Malthusian scenario so many since him have long
                      anticipated. I suspect a sensible “all forms
                      practicable” approach and advancing ideas and
                      technologies will stretch out the time frame far
                      beyond my capacity to prefigure human social
                      existence. But since all life is will to power in
                      some form and fashion, I expect to be on my way to
                      being someone or thing’s eventual fuel source myself
                      by then. In the meantime, whenever I feel the warmth
                      of the sun I’m reminded that the universe is
                      energy-abundant, that all mass is energy-form, that
                      even our little sun is a massive producer — and I
                      imagine someone much smarter than myself finding a
                      way to efficiently capture and channel it. It kind
                      of a “space and time” problem.
               o
             Bill says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Exactly. If the “found” reserves will last 80 years then
                 there is no financial incentive to find any more right
                 now, maybe in 50 years they’ll start looking. Meanwhile,
                 the “threat” of running out of oil saw the US turn into
                 the world’s leading oil exporter due to capital
                 investment in research and extraction technologies.
               o
             Grant says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 You don’t need a lot of uranium. Bill Gates reactor
                 design uses urainium for start up, but can burn existing
                 waste, weapons etc. of which there are hundreds of years
                 worth. Thorium can also be used which is quite abundant.
               o
             Ellar S says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Saw file, I’d be interested to know where this
                 inexhaustible supply of uranium may be found.
                    #
                  Saw file says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @Ellar Es
                      Isn’t “inexhaustible” kind of the same as
                      ‘infinity’?
                      Get serious, if you want to have a reasonable
                      discourse.
                      You obviously aren’t proficient at math and basic
                      physics. Or geology.
                      So your crystal ball has told you that all that can
                      be found has been found.
                      OK..I conceed. You win.
                      You should be able to become a millionaire in the
                      market now.
                    #
                  Doctor Locketopus says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      There are 4.5 billion metric tons of uranium in the
                      ocean, which can be harvested at a net energy gain
                      using today’s technology. No one bothers, because
                      mined uranium is cheaper. But it will be there when
                      we need it.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Screw the Ruling Class
            “Less people, less energy, less production, less consumption,
            less waste. Less is not more, and it will be all we will get.”
            Thank you Chairman Mao for giving the plot away. A few
            questions:
            1. Less people. Who decides which of us gets to live. The
            enlightened ones like you I imagine.
            2. Less energy. Are you aware that less energy = more poverty?
            Billions of poor people live in energy poverty. Perhaps we
            should just exterminate them less they try to escape poverty
            and consume more energy. Helps out with question no. 1.
            3. Less consumption. Less consumption is a trojan horse for
            less freedom. Difficult to achieve other than by authoritarian
            means. But I guess that’s the whole point.
               o
             Ellar S says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @Jay Salhi
                 Do you actually think reducing the population necessarily
                 requires tyranny and mass murder, or do you just prefer
                 silly strawmen arguments to reasonable debate?
                 If the former, perhaps you should look into the trend
                 towards reduced fertility in developed nations.
                    #
                  Ellar S says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      Presumably Saw file is aware of an inexhaustible
                      supply of uranium somewhere.
                         @
                       Saw file says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           @Ellsd S
                           Yawn.,…you smarmy turd..
                           https://www.nrcan.gc.ca/energy/facts/uranium/20
                           070
                    #
                  DeplorableDude says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @Ellar S You should look into birth rates in
                      “developing” countries. They keep having kids even
                      when they have no idea how to feed them. Let me
                      guess. it’s ok if there are bunch of poverty
                      stricken people living in grass huts as long as they
                      don’t consume a resource that’s bad for the
                      environment?
                         @
                       Craken says
                              - February 28, 2019
                           Nuclear is a renewable energy source:
                           https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_power_pro
                           posed_as_renewable_energy
                           Eventually, we will need to develop fast or
                           thermal reactors to burn the uranium more
                           efficiently. But, there is certainly no looming
                           shortage in the next few centuries. And the
                           supply is extractable at affordable prices.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      @ Ellar S
                      “Do you actually think reducing the population
                      necessarily requires tyranny and mass murder,”
                      No, I agree with you that fertility rates reduce
                      when poor people get wealthier. A necessary
                      condition for that to happen is cheap, abundant
                      reliable energy. If you want to ban all the sources
                      of energy that have been proven to work (like the
                      Green New Deal contemplates), you will get the
                      opposite result – increased poverty and higher
                      population growth.
                      The world’s population is expected to grow from
                      about 7 billion to 10 or 11 billion before
                      stabilizing. It is not going to be reduced in the
                      lifetime of anyone reading this article.
                      Moreover, some leading environmentalists are on
                      record as saying the world should have no more than
                      2 billion people. There is no way to get to that
                      number without Pol Pot-like tactics.
               o
             Phil Major says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 “1. Less people. Who decides which of us gets to live.
                 The enlightened ones like you I imagine.”
                 There are whole populations with no economic basis for
                 their own survival, who live wholly off of foreign
                 charity.
                 Stop subsidizing them, and blam… a big chunk of the human
                 population vanishes in a few years.
                 Now, maybe they aren’t the big polluters, but if you want
                 fewer people, there is a way to get fewer people without
                 executions or war. Just stop giving them money.
               o
             Phil Major says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 “1. Less people. Who decides which of us gets to live.
                 The enlightened ones like you I imagine.”
                 There are whole populations with no economic basis for
                 their survival, who are wholly supported by foreign
                 charity. If you want fewer people, simply stop giving
                 them money.
                 Now they might not be the big polluters, but if you want
                 fewer people just stop giving them money and a massive
                 chunk of the human population will disappear in a few
                 years.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @Phil Major
                      “There are whole populations with no economic basis
                      for their survival, who are wholly supported by
                      foreign charity. If you want fewer people, simply
                      stop giving them money.”
                      The poorest countries on earth have the highest
                      birth rates. Whether or not foreign aid does more
                      harm than good is open to debate, but the idea that
                      you can starve off billions of people is ludicrous.
                      Increased poverty will lead to higher birth rates.
          +
        Jesse Otto says
               o February 28, 2019
            Perhaps you missed that there have been successful
            demonstrations of extracting uranium from seawater. They have
            made yellowcake from seawater. The supply is many times that
            from land mining. Where there is a will there is a way. Human
            ingenuity is our greatest resource.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > For one thing the supply of uranium is limited–it may last
            till the end of the century at the present rate of
            consumption–less as we use more.
            Not true. With breeder reactors, there is sufficient uranium
            for billions-with-a-b of years.
            And that’s just with the uranium cycle. There are also thorium
            cycles.
          +
        Farris says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Screw
            “Peak Oil” is based upon fossil fuel estimates using current
            extraction methods. Some reservoirs are considered as cost
            prohibitive and are not considered in oil supply calculations.
            When technology improves the estimates of “Peak Oil” are
            altered. Typically natural gas is not calculated in “Peak Oil”
            but if engine designs change or CNG or LNG becomes practical
            “Peak Oil” estimates would have to be recalculated. Coal
            gasification could become cost efficient. “Peak Oil” may exist
            but attaching a date to it requires Nostradamus type
            calculations.
            Fossil fuels are utilized not because oil companies are evil
            but because they are the most reliable, cost efficient energy
            source available. Nuclear power may supplant fossil fuels for
            electricity production. Electric cars charged with power from
            nuclear or hydroelectric plants may supplant fuel burning
            vehicles but then we may be discussing “Peak Cobalt or
            Lithium” which will once again be predicated upon stagnant
            technology.
            Regarding your statement: “There is no magic energy supply.”
            That depends on if one believes cold fusion is a realistic
            possibility or a pipe dream.
          +
        Sean Michael Bearly says
               o March 1, 2019
            Nonsense. From any point in time it always looks like we are
            running out of something. Have you noticed that weird capacity
            humans have to figure out solutions to problems? Remember when
            we were going to run out of food? Oil? The answer is to boldly
            move forward using the most cost effective fuels we can at the
            present time and adapt as needed. We must ignore false fears
            of running out of resources, of ruining the planet. The world
            is not full of evil people wanting to ruin the planet. It is
            full of people who want to live and live fuller lives and are
            willing to work hard for that possibility.
          +
        Stephanie says
               o March 2, 2019
            @Screw the Working class
            There’s a ton of hydrocarbons in space, and likely all kinds
            of mineral resources on other planets. As long as we don’t
            destroy our economy with socialism, there’s no reason to think
            our innovation and exploration won’t match our needs.
               o
             claude@balloune.tk says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Sounds great! Now all we have to do bring them back to
                 Earth and burn them! Of course we’ll have to pump lots
                 more, TONS of Oxygen from our Oxygen wells!
                 And, also- those stars out there are full of HYDROGEN! We
                 can use this to refill all our hydrogen-powered cars!
                 BTW, I’m still waiting for my 2008 hydrogen-powered car
                 that BMW promised me fifteen years ago!
          +
        claude says
               o March 4, 2019
            No one has mentioned the real solution to our energy problem.
            The answer in three words: Fusion, Fusion, Fusion. We need to
            be fast tracking the development of a workable fusion reactor.
            Fusion reactors have minimal nuclear waste and are fail safe
            in case of an earthquake. It is my understanding that the
            fusion reactor stops working if the plasma hits the reactor
            wall.
   11.
   Iron says
          + February 28, 2019
       Given nuclear power’s enormously safe record, I think nuclear costs
       could be significantly reduced by lowering the regulatory burden.
       Why is an industry safer than wind have high regulatory costs?
          +
        david of Kirkland says
               o February 28, 2019
            And all that regulation focuses on solving to the regulation
            rather than improving performance. A market never got
            established so competing ideas and novel solutions that only
            occur under liberty, not central planning.
   12.
   Jimmy says
          + February 28, 2019
       You know what’s reliable? The tides. If the united states invested
       in the development of tidal power stations it could provide
       consistent renewable energy to its costal states. Incidentally
       California, Florida, Texas and new York, the 4 most populous states
       are coastal.
          +
        Screw the Ruling Class says
               o February 28, 2019
            Unfortunately, most of Florida won’t be coastal for too much
            longer. As New York City drowns, I guess we could probably put
            tidal generators between the buildings on the E-W streets. I
            don’t know what can be done for the low lying Texas coast. The
            Central Valley of California is below sea level. They’ll be
            able to make lots of power by putting generators under the
            Golden Gate Bridge and opening up a channel to fill the
            Central Valley. Death Valley is 282 feet below sea level.
               o
             Doctor Locketopus says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 > As New York City drowns
                 Oh, please. Even the most extreme predictions (by actual
                 scientists, not by Internet communists) estimate
                 something like a six inch rise over the course of a
                 century. OMG! It’s rising at 0.06″ year! Run! It’s a
                 tsunami!
               o
             Farris says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 @Screw
                 “Unfortunately, most of Florida won’t be coastal for too
                 much longer. As New York City drowns, ….”
                 Predictions such as you are making would be amusing, if
                 they didn’t lead to harmful policies.
                 “During the 2011-16 California drought, politicians and
                 experts claimed that global warming had permanently
                 altered the climate, and that snow and rain would become
                 increasingly rare in California. As a result,
                 long-planned low-elevation reservoirs, designed to store
                 water during exceptionally wet years, were considered all
                 but useless and thus were never built.
                 Then, in 2016 and 2017, California received record snow
                 and rainfall — and the windfall of millions of acre-feet
                 of runoff was mostly let out to sea. Nothing since has
                 been learned.”
                 VDH
                    #
                  Grant says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I had conversations with people who told me ‘well
                      now that we’re in a permanent drought’. They same
                      people 3 years later are saying that we’re going to
                      gave permanent flooding. Unfortunately you can’t
                      easily convince people who think any weather event
                      slightly out of the ordinary is climate change. They
                      will be, by the way, to toss a fit when their
                      electricity bills triple and demand other people pay
                      it.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 “most of Florida won’t be coastal for too much longer.”
                 In 1988, James Hanson predicted parts of NYC would be
                 underwater by 2008. Funny how failed predictions like
                 that do no damage to a man’s reputation. Nor do they
                 cause the press to show any skepticism about the latest
                 doomsday predictions.
               o
             JWatts says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 “Unfortunately, most of Florida won’t be coastal for too
                 much longer. ”
                 That’s a ridiculous comment. Current worst case
                 projections are for sea levels to rise around 10 feet in
                 the next century. Mid level predictions are roughly 3
                 feet. Florida isn’t disappearing.
                    #
                  CL says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      @Jwatts
                      The average elevation of Florida is 6 feet, at a
                      three foot increase that is roughly a quarter of the
                      state underwater within the century. Not exactly an
                      end to coasts but likely dangerous for a number of
                      coastal cities
          +
        Saw file says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Jimmy
            I agree.
            The the potential of energy from the ocean is enormous.
            Transportation of the energy is the problem.
               o
             Jimmy says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Most of the population of many countries is concentrated
                 on the coasts. 23 US states have ocean coastline. even if
                 its only used for coastal cities and settlements it
                 should be able to make an enormous impact. And due to the
                 article mentioning California already sends power to
                 other states the infrastructure is likely already in
                 place to serve many more inland communities.
                    #
                  david of Kirkland says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      Indeed, most big business is around ports. And those
                      wishing for a single magical solution should give it
                      a rest and realize it will be a suite of solutions
                      just as we have a suite of solutions for energy
                      today.
   13.
   Screw the Ruling Class says
          + February 28, 2019
       Two quibbles with the article: The wind mills I have seen are
       generally sited in the middle of fields with a small margin around
       each mast. I don’t see that as terribly disruptive land use.
       Granted, solar takes up more space. Transmission wires? No matter
       what form of generation is used, there will be — there must be —
       transmission lines from source to user, and interconnecting lines
       to even out supply and demand.
       A point Michael Shellenberger didn’t make: It is too late to avoid
       some consequences of global warming. It may be too late to avoid
       worse consequences. If we don’t get our collective carbon-reduction
       acts together pretty damn quick, it will be too late to avoid the
       worst consequences of global warming. In which case, sic transit
       gloria mundi.
          +
        RadixLecti says
               o February 28, 2019
            The more distributed the sources, the more power lines
            necessary. Think of several hundred wind turbines replacing
            one power station. They will also require a comprehensive
            switching and distribution system for capacity control and
            isolation.
            As for your point about land use, I don’t know which country
            you live in, but chances are that wind produces a tiny
            percentage of your power. I believe the author is making the
            point that generating all or even a significant amount of the
            national requirement will require the commandeering of an area
            of land which most people would find unacceptable. This
            applies to both wind and solar.
            https://youtu.be/E0W1ZZYIV8o
            This video is a brilliant summary of the issues with an
            all-renewables plan.
               o
             david of Kirkland says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 That’s one point of solar is that you keep power
                 generation local. No, it can’t provide it all, but then
                 electricity doesn’t provide all our power needs, nor does
                 fuel. We can also use the power from other sources to
                 fill in the gaps.
   14.
   Farris says
          + February 28, 2019
       Can the American taxpayers get their $150 billion back. The vast
       majority of these problems were forecast long before 2009.
   15.
   jimhaz says
          + February 28, 2019
       To even up the score here are some arguments against the author’s
       view.
       “Why nuclear power will never supply the world’s energy needs”
       https://phys.org/news/2011-05-nuclear-power-world-energy.html
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            That article is quite a find–the absolute worst article I’ve
            ever seen on phys.org.
            Every single bullet point is false (except the one on
            proliferation). That Professor Abbott can’t possibly be that
            stupid. He’s a shill, probably for fossil fuels. It’s beneath
            rebuttal.
            Either we will achieve some energy miracle this century (like
            fusion or cheap energy storage) or we will massively scale up
            fission power or we will see CO2 in the atmosphere continue to
            rise rapidly. To oppose fission is to gamble on a miracle.
               o
             hunter says
                    # March 3, 2019
                 Abbott is much more like to be shill for so-called
                 renewables.
   16.
   Optional says
          + February 28, 2019
       You can almost always tell you are dealing with a leftist (the
       author) because they believe “the answer” exists somewhere (and
       often God has already told it to them and they will then scream it
       at you, as the author used to.)
       And “the truth” is that life doesn’t come with any pat answers.
       Nuclear or otherwise.
       Because of transmission costs, nuclear typically is near where it
       is used, and that means near people. And it is no fun to live next
       to. I have. I like nuclear fine – but not near me. I was very happy
       when it closed.
       Wind can be put offshore to save all the bats and most of the
       birds, and all of the land.
       Maybe solar as well. Solar can be put in space. But it would have
       to built there and not carried up.
       Load leveling is a real issue. Nuclear takes days to start up. It
       is useless for supplying the variable daily load. And renewable is
       almost just as useless, because it is unreliable.
       Coal is probably the best of the bunch,in terms of ability to
       supply what is demanded, at reasonable cost. And we used to use it
       a ton (literally). But it is very much in the environmentalist
       doghouse with the nuclear. Even though it is possible to clean a
       fair amount of it now.
       There are no perfect answers. But one thing that is historically
       proven is that the more the Federal Government is “involved” in the
       solutions – the worse they will be.
          +
        Daniel says
               o February 28, 2019
            Optional,
            Why didn’t you like living next to a nuclear plant? I imagine
            it was probably ugly, but were there other reasons?
          +
        Daniel says
               o February 28, 2019
            Optional,
            Why didn’t you like living next to a nuclear plant? I imagine
            it was ugly, but were there other reasons?
          +
        DumbNuke says
               o February 28, 2019
            As I work on a nuclear powered ship that varies its load
            constantly underway with swings of RX power all over the map
            based off of operation, I’m highly confused by the statement
            “It is useless for supplying the variable daily load”. Also
            though they “could” take days to start up once they’re up they
            stay up other than for maintenance takedowns and things as
            such. During such evolution in the case of a carrier the other
            reactor carries the load. So thats not much of a strong point.
          +
        JustADumbNuke says
               o February 28, 2019
            I’m fairly confused by the statement “It is useless for
            supplying the variable daily load” as I currently operate on a
            nuclear powered aircraft carrier that has swings of power all
            over its ability to meet operational demands in minutes. Also
            as a statement of “days to start up” that could be true for
            commercial plants but as in the case of the ship. If you take
            down one plant we have the other carry the load. Which is
            highly achievable in a commercial atmosphere.
          +
        Grant says
               o February 28, 2019
            Eh? Nuclear is ideal because it is reliable and constant, it’s
            perfect for base load. Electricity is transported long
            distances and can be situated in rural areas, although it’s
            not necessary.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > Because of transmission costs, nuclear typically is near
            where it is used, and that means near people.
            This is patent nonsense. Nuclear plants produce electricity,
            which is routinely (and with high transmission efficiency)
            used many hundreds of miles away from where it is generated.
          +
        Obscure Canuck says
               o March 2, 2019
            “Wind can be put offshore to save all the bats and most of the
            birds”
            There are plenty of birds offshore. Sea ducks; seabirds such
            as gannets, auks, petrels, shearwaters, and albatrosses;
            migrating sandpipers, plovers, gulls, terns, and jaegers. Many
            of these are already declining due to overfishing or habitat
            destruction on their breeding grounds.
            People are doing research on this, such as Marbled Murrelets
            off the coast of Washington and California; the flight
            patterns of White-winged Scoters, Common Terns, and Piping
            Plovers off the coast of southern New England; and trying to
            determine how high different species of seabirds fly, so
            hopefully we’ll have some understanding of the risks soon.
   17.
   Karthik Karthik says
          + February 28, 2019
       I believe the most important step would be to lower our need for
       electricity in the first place. Not sure where the world is heading
       by consuming so much energy for little useful activities.
          +
        Steve says
               o February 28, 2019
            Yeah you go first, KK. Maybe your activities aren’t useful,
            but for most people heating and lighting their homes and
            transporting goods are the very definition of useful.
          +
        Left or right, if you're stupid I hate you says
               o February 28, 2019
            Yes, let’s all go back to the dark ages. That’s the answer.
          +
        Morgan Foster says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Karthik Karthik
            We all seem to be doing our best to ensure that the people of
            the developing world have MORE electricity, not less.
            Do you want us to stop helping them?
               o
             dirk says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Are you serious Morgan? Do you want the Africans (now
                 producing an average of less than 1 ton CO2/p/yr) to also
                 that ridiculous 10 ton or more of the West and China? You
                 may say, why shouldn,t they have the same rich life as we
                 have! But, isn,t that a little bit old fashioned, out
                 moded, is it the idea that we all go together (soon some
                 10 or 12 billion) faster and faster towards the
                 apocalypse?? You can’t mean that!
                    #
                  Doctor Locketopus says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      There is no looming apocalypse.
                      Not unless the Marxists and Marxist dupes get their
                      way.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @dirk
                      “Do you want the Africans (now producing an average
                      of less than 1 ton CO2/p/yr) to also that ridiculous
                      10 ton or more of the West and China?”
                      It is an interesting question because if we answer
                      “no”, it means we favor keeping them in poverty to
                      lower energy consumption. This is the logic of the
                      green movement no matter how much they might profess
                      to care about the poor and the most vulnerable. It’s
                      an elitist movement.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           – keeping them in poverty-, of course, that’s
                           how almost everybody looks at it, Jay, but is
                           that correct? I have worked 10 yrs of my life
                           in development projects (meaning: more
                           mechanisation, electricity, irrigation, import
                           of inputs, transports, in short, much more fuel
                           and CO2 emission), and long thought that this
                           was the only way to take (as a Hegelian).
                           Funny thing always: we did that not because we
                           were asked by the people or the politicians,
                           but because of something else, missionary
                           ideology I think it was, and western finance
                           available for the purpose. The people
                           themselves often told us: why run so fast, put
                           everything in an agenda, talk so succinct on
                           thechnical details, plant crops in rows with
                           fertilizer etc etc. Now, I still don’t know
                           whether we were, or still are elitist. Doesn’t
                           matter anymore, I’m old now, and only good
                           enough to reflect and write here on Quillette.
                           What I realise reflecting: overpopulation is
                           for 95% our western fault.
          +
        dirk says
               o February 28, 2019
            There you are so right Karthik, all these completely useless
            (though comfortable) activities: very common here, premises
            heating their terrraces, even where it is just above (or
            below) zero, doors open allday even at freezing, etc etc. In
            fact, whereever I look around, I don’t see any effort or
            tendency to do a first step towards saving energy, it’s just
            going on and on and on, it’s too ridiculous! Where is this
            ending??
          +
        Tersitus says
               o March 1, 2019
            I’m not particularly useful myself, but I sure like warm toes
            in the winter as a read the “comments” section.
               o
             dirk says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 I have a suggestion there, Tersitus, put on warm socks,
                 and don’t heat large rooms just to have your toes warm.
                 Same thing for airco: once, people built houses with
                 natural cooling, natural breeze by strategic openings (
                 I’ve lived 15 yrs in such houses, very nice), now every
                 car, mall, office, room or even complete palace is
                 airconditioned at almost freezing temperature. It’s
                 really too bad.
          +
        hunter says
               o March 2, 2019
            KK, who appointed you tsar of determining what’s useful?
            Life, health, education are all up.
            Famine, disease, destruction are all down.
            Energy increase correlates directly to better life.
            The elephant in the room is the social mania obsessed either
            sciencey sounding apocalyptic claptrap.
            Crush the claptrap.
   18.
   370H55V says
          + February 28, 2019
       I remember my first trip to the desert too, after growing up in a
       large urban area. There were plants and birds and rocks and things
       and sand and hills. It was really hot and the ground was dry, but
       it felt good to be out of the rain.
          +
        FuzzyLogic says
               o February 28, 2019
            You must have been on a horse with no name.
   19.
   sestamibi says
          + February 28, 2019
       test
   20.
   Don O'Leary says
          + February 28, 2019
       being seeing sane articles like this since the 70’s, but the
       loopy-doops just get louder and louder.
   21.
   Daniel says
          + February 28, 2019
       Thank goodness for this article. Any energy “solution” involves a
       trade-off, and the benefits of nuclear outweigh the potential
       problems so much it’s not even funny.
       One clarification question: “a Coke can’s worth of fuel”… Is that a
       measure of volume? Or the same weight as an empty Coke can? A full
       Coke can?
       I suspect it is the weight of an empty Coke can because I saw an
       exhibit at the visitor’s center at the Liebstadt nuclear power
       plant in Switzerland. The yearly electricity requirements of a
       family of four are such that, if generated using coal, would
       require a stack of coal crates totaling the size of about four
       full-size refrigerators. In terms of enriched uranium, it would be
       two pellets, each the size and dimension of a mechanical pencil
       eraser. Tiny. The visual discrepancy between the two was stunning.
       One thing the author didn’t address enough was the radiation
       emissions from nuclear power plants. There are essentially none.
       They’re so safe and so shielded from radiation that coal plants
       emit more radiation than nuclear plants. Think about that for a
       minute. Wow.
       The problem with nuclear plants is consequences of dispersing
       nuclear technology. There are bad guys in the world who would make
       terrible use of their power if they had a nuclear bomb.
       But as far as the developed, politically stable countries go —
       especially those who already have nuclear technology — build them
       power plants! Slash carbon emissions! Make energy cheaper, safer,
       and more reliable! This is a solution to the problem, and one in
       which the trade-off is worth it.
          +
        Peter Litwin says
               o March 1, 2019
            Thanks for sharing, Daniel!
   22.
   Doug F says
          + February 28, 2019
       I truly am not trying to be mean or flippant, but this has been
       obvious for over 50 years. See if you can find a very old book
       named “The Health Hazards of Not Going Nuclear”. It been evident
       for a long time that renewables would only make up a small portion
       of the solution and that they would carry with them their own
       unintended negative consequences – especially as they were scaled
       to economic viability. They rely heavily on battery technology
       which continues to progress incrementally with indications that
       this is just the nature of power storage. On an actuarial
       assessment of damage per kilowatt nuclear outperforms renewables by
       a wide margin.
       It is sad that the emotional responses and fears so far out-weigh
       the facts. This has been sitting in front of our faces for a very
       long time.
          +
        Tersitus says
               o February 28, 2019
            Doug— you’re right, we’ve made sorting this out harder, more
            fraught with conflict than it needs to be. Maybe our greatest
            inefficiency is in our public information and education
            institutions.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Doug F
            “this has been obvious for over 50 years.”
            You are correct. The Paul Ehrlich “population bomb” crowd
            opposed nuclear precisely because they feared it would work
            too well, increase prosperity and make the world’s population
            too large for their liking. They had the economics completely
            backwards (increased wealth = lower birth rates not the other
            way around) but they understood that nuclear would work and
            didn’t want that.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            Nuclear is the simple and sane solution.
            But, the Left wants a solution that they can use for political
            purposes.
            Also, the elite as a whole is paid off by groups (fossil fuel
            and “renewables” companies) that have a financial interest in
            eliminating the nuclear industry.
          +
        Lorna Salzman says
               o March 7, 2019
            Petr Beckmann, author of the above-mentioned book, send me a
            free copy, which includes several quotes from my writings
            about nuclear power. I was surprised and flattered that he
            felt compelled to include me in his book despite my critical
            stance on nuclear power. Unfortunately his book falls far
            short of rebutting my criticism. He self-published it, not
            surprisingly. The reference to the book above is the first
            time I have
            actually heard about it since I received the book back in
            1976. This is also not surprising inasmuch as the intervening
            years have produced numerous books by qualified credible
            scientists, journalists and activists such as Daniel Ford, Dr.
            John Gofman, Harvey Wasserman, Karl Grossman, to cite only a
            few. Today self-styled
            experts like most of the commenters on this blog gush over
            nukes in a loud display of self-importance and what they
            consider irrefutable facts, otherwise known as
            opinions and wishful thinking. If anyone is as open-minded as
            to consider reading
            dissenting opinions they can consult my web site
            (www.lornasalzman), some of whose articles were published in
            leading journals years ago.My most amusing story is about a
            radio debate on nuclear power (Sherry Henry Show) with a
            scientist from Scientists and Engineers for Secure Energy
            (SE2). After it was over, walking to the elevator, he said to
            me: You are very good. Why don’t you come and work for us?
            Apparently he couldnt conceive of the possibility that was
            sincere.
   23.
   jimhaz says
          + February 28, 2019
       We need limits on energy production mainly to force us to limit the
       population of the human race and robots. The latter requires
       generated energy, we don’t.
       Bring on higher and higher energy prices ASAP.
   24.
   Clark Magnuson says
          + February 28, 2019
       I was designing and building solar and wind power in the late 1970s
       and early 1980s.
       I have been in power conversion since for medical and aerospace.
       I have looked into the eyes of many people who are afraid of nuke
       power or global warming.
       I am more of a calculated risk person, than a perceived risk
       person.
       When I was in college in 1971 we were taught that by 2000 that 20%
       of the earth’s population would be dead from pollution, per the
       best computer models.
          +
        david of Kirkland says
               o February 28, 2019
            What does “20% of the earth’s population would be dead” even
            mean? 100% of people die. Nobody counts population as
            including their dead.
            Today, perhaps 10 million people die each year from air and
            water pollution. That’s no small matter, suggesting a Tokyo or
            NYC die each year as a result.
   25.
   AK says
          + February 28, 2019
       Electricity generation is only about 1/5 of our energy use. The
       rest is for transportation, heating and manufacturing. Whether we
       use renewables or nuclear for electricity generation doesn’t affect
       these other fuel uses, the other 4/5th.
       If we want to be totally off fossil fuels by 2030 as the UN
       advocates, electricity will be the only acceptable form of energy,
       so all the 4/5 now consumed will have to be replaced by
       electricity.
       Imagine all of our homes entirely heated by electricity. Imagine
       electric aircraft, trains, trucks, etc. How much land would be
       required for renewables? How many nuke plants would we need? How
       could we afford to throw away all our furnaces and ducting and
       replace all these with electric heating and AC, in all homes,
       offices and schools, throw away all our cars and replace them with
       electric cars, etc. And with rapidly rising electricity costs how
       much heat and AC and light could most of us afford?
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @AK
            “Electricity generation is only about 1/5 of our energy use.
            The rest is for transportation, heating and manufacturing.
            Whether we use renewables or nuclear for electricity
            generation doesn’t affect these other fuel uses, the other
            4/5th.”
            You left out agriculture but your point remains valid.
            Nuclear is only a partial solution. Fossil fuels are going to
            remain a necessity for the foreseeable future because there
            are no viable liquid fuel alternatives. Increased
            electrification powered by nuclear is only a partial solution.
            It is not politically popular to admit this but it is a
            reality we will confront whether we admit it or not.
               o
             dirk says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Agriculture is a good factor to mention here. Nitrogen
                 fertilizer costs a lot of fuel to produce (has to be made
                 at high pressure) and is good for one third of total
                 enery costs of grains and staples (others for transports
                 and machinery). Without that nitrogen, 3 or 4 billion of
                 the world population would not possibly have been there
                 even, and the amount is growing. This nitrogen production
                 was, before the invention of the fertilizer, completely
                 provided by nature itself, rotation crops that bind air
                 nitrogen and birds producing guano. However, we now rely
                 on this CO2 emitting process, where will we all end up?
                 We have to look at nuclear power, and some solar, water
                 and wind where possible. And save more, of course, helps
                 a lot.
                    #
                  dirk says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      This night reflected more on this one. In fact,
                      nitrogen as plant food (first element needed for
                      proteins) depended for ages on solar energy: sun and
                      CO2 make vegetal sugars, these sugars and sun energy
                      bind air nitrogen by microbial action and make it
                      available for incorporation in animal and human
                      proteins. Now, instead of working this further out
                      and develop better natural nitrogen binding, men
                      decided to do away with this useful process
                      altogether and choose for the cheaper (but energy
                      devouring and CO2 emitting) and somewhat higher
                      producing process of nitrogen fertilizer. China did
                      away with all their nitrogen binding rotation crops
                      quite recently and went on with the nitrogen binding
                      factories as got from Nixon, and now also heavily
                      fertilize their rice and grain with that stuff. This
                      avoiding to work with nature is the great
                      improvement of modern man, but…..for how long any
                      more??
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      @dirk
                      Excellent point about nitrogen. Along with the
                      fossil fuel industry, “big agra”, biotech and “big
                      pharma” are among the most maligned industries in
                      the world. It often seems that the industries that
                      to do the most to keep us alive and improve our
                      health and well-being are the most hated.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - March 3, 2019
                           Are you also agronomist maybe Jay? What I,ve
                           seen and noted, agriculturists have another
                           look at these things, because, agriculture was,
                           until quite recently, for 100% a renewable,
                           recycling business. We were taught (in theory
                           and practice) how to keep this machinery at
                           work and sustainable, until let’s say the
                           1950s. All history now, in the meantime, the
                           times they are a….changing. It’s really
                           horrible, detesting, ones guts protest loudly,
                           but……. we have to live with it.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            Nuclear (and solar) can be used for chemical reactions that
            create liquid fuels (synfuels) from water and air. That’s
            currently expensive (about $6/gallon for diesel equivalent),
            but it will probably get cheaper.
            Beyond that, most of the replacements you mentioned wear out.
            When their natural life is over, they can be replaced with
            electrified equivalents. This amortization process will take
            decades–but so will building new nukes.
   26.
   Erik P says
          + February 28, 2019
       It’s a sad that in our modern world researchers and scientists have
       so little coverage, whereas activists do. I wouldn’t outright
       disagree with him, though I’d make the points (i) cheap energy
       isn’t necessarily the answer.. we can reduce energy usage too (ii)
       nuclear is not safe: wait until we have a terrorist attack (iii)
       nuclear is not renewable.. uranium will increase in price if we
       adopt it globally as an alternative (iv) new grid systems are built
       for any new power plant (v) having looked at studies of wind
       turbines he seems to be exaggerating the effect on high value birds
       and also, like farmland, the areas may not be natural but it
       doesn’t mean nature doesn’t thrive there.. Spain and Portugal have
       been very successful with wind power (70% of energy supply). (vi)
       dams are problematic but they can be planned better than he
       suggested (vii) hydro, especially ”run of river’ hydro not even
       mentioned, neither was biogas (viii) nuclear decommissioning costs
       and problems ignored
       I heard these same arguments about nuclear 20 years ago, and I
       still don’t feel nuclear is in any way a solution as it is
       fundamentally a dangerous and unsustainable alternative. Renewables
       are in their infancy and completely new methods of capturing light
       energy are being developed. Grid systems are built around
       processing solid fuels, but they don’t have to be. In Europe the
       trans national transfer of electricity happens with or without
       renewables. In reality the energy balance depends on the geography,
       economy and urbanisation of the country, but nuclear is certainly
       regressive.
       In the end, I wish we simply listened to academic studies more than
       we listened to journalists and activists, particularly in the
       environmental sector.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Erik P
            (i) cheap energy isn’t necessarily the answer.. we can reduce
            energy usage too
            Cheap energy is a necessity for economic growth and lifting
            people out of poverty. Higher energy prices are the enemy of
            the poor. You can reduce energy consumption by making it more
            expensive but that comes at a steep cost and the burden hits
            the most vulnerable the hardest.
            (ii) nuclear is not safe: wait until we have a terrorist
            attack
            Irrational fear mongering. Nuclear reactors cannot explode
            like nuclear bombs.
            (iii) nuclear is not renewable.. uranium will increase in
            price if we adopt it globally as an alternative
            10,000 years is close enough. Wind turbines and solar panels
            need to be replaced every 20 years or so (if not damaged
            earlier by the elements).
            (iv) Spain and Portugal have been very successful with wind
            power (70% of energy supply).
            Learn the difference between energy and electricity. Spain
            gets about 10% of its energy from wind and solar.
               o
             Fluffy Buffalo says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 “Learn the difference between energy and electricity” –
                 ha! Good point! So far, the other fields where energy is
                 consumed (heating and traffic, mostly) rely heavily on
                 fossil fuels… EVERYWHERE, even in the countries with the
                 largest share of nuclear power. So we’ll have to
                 restructure our energy infrastructure either way to get
                 rid of fossil fuels.
                 Speaking of which, the demand for electricity varies
                 during the day – at noon, the demand is roughly twice as
                 high as in the night. Which is not something nuclear
                 plants can handle without additional infrastructure. It’s
                 not as bad as with renewables, because you need to
                 compensate for a day, nor weeks or possibly months, but
                 it shouldn’t be glossed over.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @Fluffy Buffalo
                      “So far, the other fields where energy is consumed
                      (heating and traffic, mostly) rely heavily on fossil
                      fuels… ”
                      Transportation and agriculture are completely
                      dependent on fossil fuels and that is not going to
                      materially change any time soon. It is a sobering
                      reality few people want to confront. Electric
                      vehicles can address only a small part of the
                      problem.
          +
        Grant says
               o February 28, 2019
            The only reason nuclear might be regressive is because of the
            lack of research and new design. It certainly can made,
            cheaper and even safer. It’s currently the most feasible way
            to dramatically reduce CO2 emissions by 2050. The Chinese are
            doing it, building a molten salt reactor.Gate’s Tera Power has
            been blocked from building their test reactor here or in
            China.
            Germany, after all their massive expenditures on renewables
            hadn’t made a dent in their CO2 output because they closed
            their nuclear plants.
          +
        Grant says
               o February 28, 2019
            Spain’s total renewable percent of use, all forms is about 20
            percent. Meanwhile, the cost of electricity has jumped over 60
            percent, they’ve incurred huge debts and electricity is
            subsidized, all for a minor reduction in CO2.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            The safety risks of nuclear relate to proliferation and
            poisoning, not terrorist attacks. These risks have been
            contained so far, and better security is coming.
            Nuclear is, strictly speaking, a renewable energy source. See:
            https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_power_proposed_as_renewa
            ble_energy
            Pro tip on global warming solutions: always think of how your
            ideas work in China/India. If they don’t work there, they
            don’t work.
   27.
   Jan Kjetil Andersen says
          + February 28, 2019
       You say ” A bigger problem is that there are many other uses for
       the water that accumulates behind dams, namely irrigation and
       cities.”
       This is not a valid argument against hydroelectric pumped storage.
       The dams do not consume water, it only stores it for some time. We
       will therefore not get less water for consumption because we have
       some hydroelectric storage stations.
       /Jan
   28.
   Jan Kjetil Andersen says
          + February 28, 2019
       You say ” A bigger problem is that there are many other uses for
       the water that accumulates behind dams, namely irrigation and
       cities.”
       This is not a valid argument against hydroelectric pumped storage.
       The dams do not consume water, it only stores it for some time. We
       will therefore not get less water for consumption because we have
       some hydroelectric storage stations.
          +
        dirk says
               o February 28, 2019
            I just wanted to write down what you noted here above Jan,
            twice even, so, no use to come with it a third time. You are
            very right, I wonder how somebody can say such things, water
            is a peculiar something, even in plant water use, you actually
            don’t use it, it just transpires and rains down somewhere else
            again. So different with carbohydrates! There it is: once
            consumed, no more replenishing, consuming the work of millions
            of years in just hours.
               o
             dirk says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 No carbohydrates, but hydrocarbons, of course.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            The more important point the author forgot to mention is that
            such storage is entirely inadequate to compensate for the
            intermittency/seasonality of “renewables.”
            Also: hydro generates methane emissions.
            Also: damming up rivers is high impact environmental
            destruction (which has been normalized).
   29.
   Fickle Pickle says
          + February 28, 2019
       Hands up for those who are familiar with the book Atomic Suicide by
       the remarkable duo Walter and Lao Russell!
       There work is introduced here: http://www.philosophy.org/about.html
       Another essay by Mae Wan Ho the author of The Living Rainbow, and
       The Rainbow and The Worm
       http://www.i-sis.org.uk/TheNuclearBlackHole.php
   30.
   Fickle Pickle says
          + February 28, 2019
       Hands up for those who have heard of the book Atomic Suicide by the
       remarkable (polymath) duo Walter and Lao Russell?
       Their work is introduced here http://www.philosophy.org/about.html
       Check out an essay titled The Nuclear Black Hole by Mae Wan Hoe the
       author of The Living Rainbow, and The Rainbow and The Worm.
       It is available on the Institute for Science In Society website.
   31.
   Morti says
          + February 28, 2019
       Well, Poland’s future looks even more dire now because of that.
       Poland will be doomed to import expensive electricity from hostile
       Russia (and maybe some from less hostile Germany) leaving it at
       Moscow’s mercy in the future.
       Even building ONE nuclear plant vastly exceeds the potential of the
       country.
       That’s also why nuclear sucks: it’s extremely difficult and
       expensive to build and maintain. It’s far too centralized and if
       one plant goes down, millions of people are without power supply.
       We need something smaller scale, cheaper and simpler. Something
       that countries not being major economic powers can afford and
       sustain.
          +
        Daath says
               o February 28, 2019
            Finland has two nuclear plants (with fifth reactor finally
            finished) and Sweden three (10 reactors). Both are much
            smaller nations than Poland, and certainly not major economic
            powers.
            Besides, nuclear power is one of the cases where “extremely
            difficult to build” means “difficult, built by people without
            experience”. The construction of nuclear has been so anemic
            for a long time that West lacks workers and engineers who’ve
            worked on several projects before. This also makes the cost
            overruns inherent in any complex constructions much worse. The
            maintenance costs per kW aren’t bad at all, though. “Cheaper
            and simpler” just doesn’t automatically translate into the
            system needing less money and work-hours to maintain, though
            the people won’t need the same degree of specialized training.
            Reactor accidents also don’t mean that entire plant is out of
            operation – even at Chernobyl, the other three reactors were
            gradually shut down during the next 14 years. Serious reactor
            accidents are also extremely low-probability events, and so
            far have involved only the older generation reactors
            (Chernobyl was a particularly risky RBMK-1000 type as well).
            Prolonged periods of low winds or cloudy skies, on the other
            hand, are common. Barring serious technological breakthroughs
            in areas like battery technology or jet stream wind power, I
            don’t really see renewables breaking beyond a supplemental
            role in energy production. I’m all in favor of investing more
            in R&D, but unfortunately reality isn’t a computer game in
            which investing X gold will reliably give you Y research
            points.
               o
             John PAK says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 My father helped design the first electricity generating
                 nuclear reactor at Calder Hall, UK. He read the reports
                 that came out of Russia on Chernobyl and his assessment
                 was that appalling design and sloppy operators nearly
                 caused a catastrophic disaster. By that he meant, they
                 could have sterilised thousands of square miles of Russia
                 and exterminated millions of local people and that region
                 would have become off-limits to all life-forms to this
                 day.
                 He realised that most nuclear accidents arise due to
                 incompetent operation so he was working on a more
                 idiot-proof design where the inherent physics meant that
                 the reactor could not over-heat if all the operators
                 died.
                 When the Brits dissolved the UK AEA they shredded all his
                 work but that’s politicians for you. He had numerous
                 friendships with German, French and British
                 engineers/scientists but he described an invisible
                 sound-proof glass window slowly closing when talking with
                 politicians.
   32.
   Rob Simmons says
          + February 28, 2019
       Whilst I get the neatness of the nuclear option there are a couple
       of issues with this argument. First a single nuclear meltdown on
       the coast if the US would ruin the deaths comparison for ever.
       Second the German investment doesnt complete for another 6 years!
       Im not sure when the grid reaches full output and am unclear if the
       capital costs have been front loaded on consumers but the facts are
       missing and so how can we accept the case for renewables is poor?
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > First a single nuclear meltdown on the coast if the US would
            ruin the deaths comparison for ever.
            Maybe you should try getting your information from engineers
            rather than Jane Fonda movies.
               o
             Bob says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Well said Doctor. I live within 5 miles of the site of
                 the first commercial core meltdown in US history, Santa
                 Susanna Field Laboratory. Half a million people live
                 within 10 miles of the site where much of the material
                 has yet to be accounted for. It is about a dozen miles to
                 Beverly Hills and I don’t see it hurting too badly.
                 Now the methane accident at Porter Ranch Oil Field is a
                 different story. SoCal gas has refused to name the
                 chemicals besides methane that were released. But the
                 former Gov’s sister sits on the parent companies board of
                 directors so that leak did not harm anyone. No health
                 study, no nothing.I had to pay to be tested by an
                 independent lab. I seem to have an abnormally high level
                 of benzene and some other oil by products in my system.
                 Hmmmmm.
   33.
   E. Olson says
          + February 28, 2019
       Good article from another Quillette author who has seen the error
       of their Leftist perspective. Now imagine millions more like him
       who haven’t yet seen the light, and are doing everything in their
       power to stop fracking, stop new pipeline construction, shut-down
       nuclear plants and prevent new ones, tear down existing hydro dams
       (so the fish can swim upstream naturally), and even slow or stop
       new wind farms (birds, view destruction), new solar farms (wildlife
       habitat destruction), and grid expansion to connect everything
       together. Of course many of those same people lobby and push for
       high speed rail and electric car subsidies, but apparently don’t
       consider that they are trying to ban or reduce every possible
       source of power that is needed to make them run.
       Quillette also published another article today about taxing the
       Western rich and giving the money to the world’s poor to make
       everybody more equal. This is another Leftist dream that doesn’t
       work, but it is often accompanied by such comments as “global
       warming is most damaging to the poor”. What results from this
       erroneous and delusional thinking are Western aid prohibitions
       against any power generation that isn’t renewable, which means they
       expect the poor to rise out of poverty via solar panels and
       windmills the provide unreliable and extremely expensive power as
       California, Germany, Denmark, Australia have painfully found for
       themselves. Of course those are very rich places that can almost
       afford sky high electricity rates, and can import power from
       neighboring states when the sun stops shining, but poor countries
       and people don’t have that luxury, and yet that is what the Western
       tree-huggers expect them to do.
       The most dangerous and destructive people in the history are
       Leftists who want to help the unfortunate and save the environment.
          +
        Aylwin says
               o February 28, 2019
            Is like to suggest, to you E Olson and to others, that perhaps
            this could be one topic that we don’t deteriorate into
            “Leftists” vs rightists – that’s one sure-fire way to get
            sides to dig in their heels and stop reasonable discussion.
               o
             E. Olson says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 I appreciate your sentiments Aylwin, but I don’t see how
                 the topic of renewables can be divorced from Left vs
                 Right discussion, since the entire industry is entirely
                 dependent on massive government interventions into the
                 energy market, with the Green New Deal proposal being
                 just the most recent and aggressive example.
                    #
                  K. Dershem says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I agree with Aylwin. Also, it’s worth noting that
                      the nuclear industry (both existing plants and new
                      construction) is completely dependent on federal
                      subsidies and loan guarantees. In contrast, wind
                      energy is cost competitive with fossil fuels and the
                      cost of solar continues to drop. I’m not
                      ideologically opposed to nuclear energy — I think
                      that decisions about energy should be guided by
                      science, not ideology — but it’s not clear to me
                      that its benefits outweigh its costs.
                      https://www.forbes.com/sites/judeclemente/2017/09/29
                      /nuclear-subsidies-are-bad-energy-policy/#41fdc4d47b
                      2c
                         @
                       Jay Salhi says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           @K. Dershem
                           “it’s worth noting that the nuclear industry
                           (both existing plants and new construction) is
                           completely dependent on federal subsidies and
                           loan guarantees. In contrast, wind energy is
                           cost competitive with fossil fuels and the cost
                           of solar continues to drop.”
                           Good grief. The history of wind energy in the
                           US is that whenever the subsidies dry up,
                           investment stops. As Warren Buffet has
                           explained, take away the tax incentives and
                           investing in wind makes no sense. And solar is
                           subsidized more heavily than wind.
                           If you want to compare subsidies, you have to
                           compare subsidy per unit of energy produced.
                           Wind and solar are by far the most heavily
                           subsidized.
                           https://lifepowered.org/the-true-cost-of-renewa
                           ble-energy/
                         @
                       E. Olson says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           K – nuclear subsidies are far lower than
                           renewables on a per KWh basis, but the
                           renewable industry never reports on a per KWh
                           basis, only on raw subsidy expenditures. DOE
                           levelized costs of energy production by type
                           also never consider the need for backup power
                           for renewables, thus while solar and wind costs
                           have dropped over time, the true cost needs to
                           include the cost of maintaining
                           coal/gas/nuclear backup power for when the wind
                           and sun are not blowing/shining. On the other
                           hand, a nuclear, coal, or gas electricity
                           generation plant does not need any renewable
                           backup, and actually run much cleaner and more
                           efficiently without the intermittency
                           interference from renewables. If nuclear is so
                           expensive, and solar and wind so cheap, why do
                           ALL the countries and states (CA) with the most
                           renewable energy have the highest electricity
                           prices? Why did heavily nuclear France get
                           increased electricity prices when they started
                           to boost renewables?
                           The Manhattan Contrarian is an outstanding site
                           for analysis on the true cost of renewables and
                           the politics of trying to cover them up – the
                           links below are just a couple of examples:
                           https://www.manhattancontrarian.com/blog/2018-8
                           -6-what-is-the-cost-of-getting-to-a-100-renewab
                           le-electric-grid
                           https://www.manhattancontrarian.com/blog/2018-7
                           -17-a-modest-proposal-for-wholesale-electricity
                           -pricing
                         @
                       K. Dershem says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Jay and E.: it’s possible to find sources which
                           support almost any conclusion you want to
                           reach. You both oppose renewables and support
                           nuclear energy, and you’ve linked to sites
                           which share that agenda — at least one of which
                           (the Texas Public Policy Foundations) receives
                           funding from fossil fuel companies. As I’ve
                           said, I’m not categorically opposed to nuclear
                           power; I think an “all of the above” energy
                           strategy make sense, at least in the short
                           term.
                         @
                       E. Olson says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           K – you need to look at the underlying sources
                           of data for the subsidy information provided in
                           the links offered by Jay and myself. For the
                           most part they are from DOE and other
                           government sources that if anything are big
                           proponents of renewables. And of course the
                           other aspect is to look at the actual
                           electricity prices paid by consumers in markets
                           with lots of nuclear vs lots of renewables –
                           its ALWAYS much higher with renewables.
                    #
                  Scott says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I do think gov. incentives have sped the
                      construction of wind turbines, but in plains states
                      from Texas to the Dakotas, the case for low cost of
                      the electricity and the case for them being
                      profitable is pretty strong. The farmers love them
                      because they can lease portions of their farm fields
                      giving them multiple sources of income.
                         @
                       E. Olson says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Scott – Government incentives shouldn’t be
                           needed if wind turbines truly provide low cost
                           and profitable electricity, but the true
                           situation is that they are only profitable with
                           subsidies. Here are a couple of recent stories
                           about the true costs of wind power in the
                           upper-Midwest.
                           https://www.powerlineblog.com/archives/2019/01/
                           why-green-energy-is-futile-in-one-lesson.php
                           https://www.powerlineblog.com/archives/2018/11/
                           exposed-a-key-element-of-the-wind-energy-fraud.
                           php
                    #
                  D-Rex says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I have to agree with E. Olson on this (someday I
                      won’t agree with him on something just for the shock
                      value), all of the crazy environmental and weak
                      scientific arguments are predominantly pushed by
                      leftists. They swallow loony ideas lock stock and
                      barrel because they fit their ideology and then
                      claim that rational opinions are science denial. The
                      number of people I read in comments who accuse
                      others of not understanding ‘the science’ , who
                      themselves have no scientific knowledge or
                      understanding is astounding.
   34.
   Tim B. says
          + February 28, 2019
       I am an American expat that has lived in Germany since 2001, with a
       3 year residence in Nebraska in the late 2000s. I pay 29 EUR/ct.
       per kWh, the highest in Europe. When you drive around, you can see
       solar farms, wind turbines and rooftop panels galore. I would love
       to make my house greener but it would cost more than my house is
       worth. With external insulation, new windows and solar panels,
       that’s easily 100,000 Euros or more. Not to mention, a 15,000 Euro
       solar panel set up would only save me 30% on my electricity bill on
       average throughout the year. Plus, when I put power into the grid,
       I would make about 12 EUR/ct. per kWh. After 17 years, I would make
       nothing.
       To add to this, Germans absolutely hate nuclear power. You will
       even see cars with bumper stickers that say “Atomkraft? Nein,
       Danke!” But nuclear power is reliable, efficient and carbon
       neutral. Sure it’s unsightly, a beautiful vista smudged by steaming
       double-cooling towers. I guess that it’s a case of NIMBY-ism.
       In the meantime, I try to do my part by replacing light bulbs with
       LEDs and making sure appliances are switched off, much to the
       chagrin to all in my home and I have earned a reputation of being
       the “Electricity Tsar” as I go around chastising my kids for
       leaving lights on.
       Renewables are a nice idea, but the tech isn’t there year and
       neither is the price. Until then, one might save a few Euros, but
       it’s more about being able to brag that your house is green.
          +
        johno says
               o February 28, 2019
            Off subject, but this reminds me of a comment I read. Jacob
            Beser, a Jewish crewman on the Enola Gay, was asked if he had
            any regrets about dropping the atomic bomb.
            He said he regretted not dropping it on Berlin.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @ Tim B.
            Thanks for sharing your experience. Is there any sign that
            public attitudes in Germany might change causing politicians
            to come to their senses? They got rid of nuclear and now rely
            heavily on coal to back up unreliable wind. Now they are
            talking about getting rid of coal.
            Is the public at all aware that this will make them heavily
            dependent on importing natural gas, much of which will come
            from Russia?
   35.
   Rob says
          + February 28, 2019
       “cats kill common birds” cats kill what moves whether that’s a
       house sparrow (invasive no one cares) to grasshopper sparrow
       (endangered). Oddly worded at best, meant to trigger birders
       seemingly.
          +
        Obscure Canuck says
               o March 2, 2019
            Yep. “As for house cats, they don’t kill big, rare, threatened
            birds. What house cats kill are small, *common* birds, like
            sparrows, robins and jays”
            This is innaccurate. Cats have caused numerous small bird
            species extinctions, most famously the Stephens Island Wren.
   36.
   geoffrey says
          + February 28, 2019
       Yes nice promotion. Two things the author “forgot” to include in
       his biased statistics. What are the costs, emissions and
       environmental impact of extracting Uranium? What do you do with
       nuclear waste that remains radioactive for thousands of years? Do
       you suggest that we leave this s**t for the future generations to
       handle?
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > What do you do with nuclear waste that remains radioactive
            for thousands of years?
            Long half-life = less radioactive. By definition. You’ve been
            sold a bill of goods.
               o
             geoffrey says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 @ Doctor Locketopus
                 What about an Earth full of “less radioactive” sites ?
                 What if each generation creates 100 new sites of nuclear
                 waste in order to meet the energy demands?
                 Btw other factors matter also besides the half life of
                 the isotope. It is also the type of the radiation and how
                 effectively it is absorbed by organisms.
                    #
                  D-Rex says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      @ geoffrey
                      An obvious solution for nuclear waste is to mix it
                      back in with the ore that is was mined with and
                      shove it back into the mine that it came out of in
                      the first place once that mine was spent. That way
                      the mine would actually be less radioactive than
                      before it was mined and it would effectively have
                      zero additional radiation impact on the environment.
          +
        Scott says
               o March 1, 2019
            All sources have costs and impacts of extraction. Look at
            pictures of neodymium extraction in china that gets used to
            make wind turbines. I think you are missing the scale of
            radioactive waste compared to waste from all other sources of
            electricity. Fly ash from coal burning is quite awful. Tailing
            ponds from coal mining have dams that fail after 50-90 years
            and destroy river ecosystems. If you want to create one
            underground storage facility in the middle of nowhere the only
            real risk is transporting the waste. At least in a single
            facility we have control over the impact compared to burning
            things that affect the habitability of the entire planet.
               o
             geoffrey says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 @ Scott
                 I know that wind turbines and solar panels are not built
                 out of thin air. If nuclear waste is to generate power
                 for the whole world, one facility is not enough. You will
                 have to add up the waste of many generations also. You
                 also need to be able to impose universal safety standards
                 all over the world. And you know how hard that is; we
                 cannot even persuade all the nations of scientific FACTS!
                 Anyway, my main point is, the author wrote thousands of
                 words promoting nuclear power without spending a second
                 sentence on the single biggest problem of it.
   37.
   Peter says
          + February 28, 2019
       What I don’t understand is why the greens persist in chasing after
       Wind and Solar despite the obvious problems to the exclusion of
       other possibilities.
       I still don’t understand why every weir and water wheel in the
       country doesn’t have a small turbine on it. While admittedly it’d
       be a relatively small energy income from each turbine they’d
       practically never stop working (except in floods) and the aggregate
       power output ought to be relatively impressive.
   38.
   johno says
          + February 28, 2019
       One has to remember that the mantra of global warming has little to
       do with actual global warming, which has been highly exaggerated.
       It is a vehicle for a redistribute the wealth political agenda.
       I can think of several very good reasons to curtail the use of
       fossil fuels, that have nothing to do with global warming. Balance
       of payments – send less of your money out of your country. Fewer
       wars – most of the major wars fought by the western nations in the
       last 30 years have involved the global oil supply. That’s why they
       intervened in Libya, but did nothing when a million Rwandans were
       slaughtered. Rwanda has no oil, and no impact on the global
       economy. Less reliance on ME oil means a more prosperous global
       economy, if it wasn’t dependent on the most politically unstable
       region on earth. And… not funding terrorism.
       These are reasons that anyone of any political persuasion can
       appreciate and support without argument.
       Yet, the greenies never bring that up, because it would mean people
       would use less fossil fuel without caving in to their point of
       view. It’s all about bending others to their view.
       As for electric vehicles… actually, the capacity of li-ion cells
       can be at least doubled with low polymer anodes, if they can figure
       out how to mass produce those. Imagine an all electric vehicle with
       a 500 mile range, for under USD$25k. It would be a best seller, not
       because it’s ‘green’, but because it’s a better deal than a
       gasoline vehicle. Fuel costs about 1/10 of gasoline, and
       maintenance costs much lower – most auto maintenance involves the
       gasoline engine or drivetrain. Unlike fuel cells, the
       infrastructure to fuel electric cars is already in place – the
       current electric grid. And charging typically happens in off peak
       hours, so the current grid could handle a lot of electric vehicles.
       Even if one fueled electric cars from coal plants, we’re still
       ahead. It’s an axiom in power generation that the larger the plant,
       the more efficiently it operates. You’d be replacing half a million
       small gasoline engines with one large engine. And, it’s far simpler
       to contain or control the emissions from one large plant than half
       a million small ones.
       But, then again, we’d have a lot of people owning electric cars
       without paying homage to the greens. And that just won’t do. Their
       motivation is bending others to their will, as evidenced by their
       failure to bring up these very practical advantages that have no
       political agenda behind them.
       Meanwhile, very real and un-exaggerated ecological problems fester,
       such as the garbage islands in the oceans.
       I find California to be a study in hypocrisy. They claim to be
       ecologically conscious, yet they burn more hydrocarbons per capita
       than anywhere in the world. Suggest to a Cali resident that they
       not drive their car, and you get a blank stare… inconceivable. They
       only have sidewalks to go jogging. And mass transit is all but
       nonexistent. Do as I say, not as I do…
          +
        Nakatomi Plaza says
               o March 1, 2019
            “Greenies” have been making the arguments you’re making
            forever. Your second paragraph – stopping foreign wars based
            on oil – is fundamental to the left (the real left, not the
            corporate left). I have no idea what you’re talking about with
            this point. Why mention the potential of electric vehicles
            when that potential hasn’t been reached? Who’s opposing more
            efficient electric cars (except big oil)? You seem determined
            to frame this as an us versus them argument, even at the
            expense of common knowledge and common sense.
            What’s your problem with California? Why pick that fight when
            the entire country in based around ICE vehicles and sorely
            lacks mass transit? California is much better at protecting
            the environment that most other states, when the federal
            government is trying to undermine us, that it.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 @Nakatomi
                 “Why pick that fight when the entire country in based
                 around ICE vehicles and sorely lacks mass transit?
                 California is much better at protecting the environment
                 that most other states”
                 Yes, the rest of the country follow the example
                 California set with the amazing success of its high speed
                 rail project. And they can teach us a thing or two about
                 forest management as well.
   39.
   dai davies says
          + February 28, 2019
       What’s missing here is: do we need to bother?
       The greenhouse effect was an unquantified assumption in the 29th
       century. They didn’t even know what an atom was then. Recent
       evidence strongly points to the GHE being insignificant.
       Science changes with new evidence. NASA’s 2009 DIVINER data of
       lunar surface temperatures provided empirical evidence of an effect
       (the Diurnal Smoothing Effect) that displaces the GHE on Earth. Now
       we have quantum mechanics to enable us to evaluate the GHE isis
       insignificant – less than 0.2C with CO2 contributing about 0.01C.
       http://brindabella.id.au?c=RDC for technical details
       http://brindabella.id.au?c=EAR for an overview
       Coal can be as clean as you’re prepared to pay for. Nuclear is the
       future but at the moment choice of technologies is difficult, with
       PWR suppliers muddying the water, and little long term evidence for
       newer technologies adding economic risk. Coal can supply reliable
       and clean energy till matters resolve. The African Development Bank
       recently backing coal was a valuable advance. China and India are
       going gang-busters, which will protect the bulk of the world’s
       population in the coming cold period. We’ve passed the maximum of
       the Modern Warm Period.
          +
        D-Rex says
               o March 2, 2019
            @ dai davies
            Just read your first article and partway through the second.
            I’m riveted but want to know if they have been critiqued by
            the likes of Judith Curry or Steve Macyntire or Spencer? I’m
            teaching year 12 chemistry and the first chapter of the
            texbook is primarily on the greenhouse effect but is so full
            of errors and spurious graphs, tables and assumptions that I
            can barely stand it but I have to teach it.
   40.
   Peter Pehlivan says
          + February 28, 2019
       Just another article saying that global warming “isn’t so simple”
       and “renewables aren’t worth it.” Probably in the service of an
       agenda, as I’d usually expect.
       It’s quite clear much of this article is misrepresentation and
       cherry-picking. I checked some of the books this guy’s authored or
       coauthored; much of it is about “exposing the failures of
       environmentalism and the left wing agenda.”
       While I know some worse examples of misrepresentations, I recommed
       people be skeptical towards articles such as this one. Climate
       pseudoscience runs on two levels:
       Level 1: Climate deniers.
       These are your William Happers, Roy Spencers, Richard Lindzens,
       etc. These are people who doubt basic science and would do
       basically anything for money. They deny either that the climate is
       warming, or that we’re the dominant cause, or that it’ll have
       negative consequences. They heavily distort science and are usually
       easy to spot.
       Level 2: Climate delayers.
       These are your Bjørn Lomborgs, Jordan Petersons, Michael
       Shellenbergers, etc. These guys are usually quite intelligent and
       good at scientific deception. They do admit the realities of global
       warming. The way they misrepresent science is by claiming that
       renewables won’t work, that the consequences won’t be so bad, that
       electric cars are bad, etc. The end goal is always less tax, even
       though we can easily tax carbon while lowering overall taxpayer
       load. They usually have a political bias, or are funded by the Koch
       brothers or conservative think tanks, or are unknowledgeable
       conservatives who are quick on their feet (e.g., Jordan Peterson),
       etc. They’re somewhat harder to spot, though. You’d have to check
       their sources and examine their methods to notice distortions. They
       normally aggregate cherry-picked snippets of science to paint a
       picture that fits their agenda.
       Global warming is an existential threat to organized human life, as
       well as animal life. Sure, there are many other problems that need
       fixing, but they’re of a kind that can wait and is localized.
       Climate change waits for nobody and affects everyone, so we have to
       take actions to prevent it.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            @Peter Pehlivan
            “The way they misrepresent science is by claiming that
            renewables won’t work, that the consequences won’t be so bad,
            that electric cars are bad, etc.”
            World total primary energy consumption by fuel in 2015:
            Coal (30%)
            Natural Gas (24%)
            Hydro (7%)
            Nuclear (4%)
            Oil (33%)
            Others (Renewables) (2%)
            Do you have a scientifically proven solution for turning 2%
            into 92% Or even 22%? Or 12%? Despite all the investment in
            solar and wind, the 2015 numbers barely moved from 1990 and
            the Obama administrations projections for 2040 forecast only
            minimal increases.
            Solar and wind have serious limitations. Good sources of
            energy should be dense, always available, easy to transport,
            easy to store. Fossil fuels tick those boxes (some better than
            others). Solar and wind, by contrast, are dilute,
            intermittent, difficult to transport and extremely difficult
            to store. Solar and wind are not good sources of energy.
            Where is the scientific evidence that wind and solar work at
            scale? Which countries get a majority of their energy from
            wind and solar? Zero. How many power grids in the world run on
            wind and solar alone? Zero. They are worthless without a
            reliable backup (fossil fuel, nuclear or hydro). And they are
            dependent on fossil fuels from cradle to grave.
            The countries that have invested heavily in solar and wind
            have little to show for it in terms of reducing CO2 emissions.
            Instead, they have higher energy bills and less stable grids
            (Australia is an example the author did not mention).
            If you want to get rid of all of the world’s reliable energy
            you better have a proven alternative. No such alternative
            exists (nuclear is a partial alternative). Wind and solar are
            just wasteful and redundant.
          +
        Grant says
               o February 28, 2019
            Still waiting for signals that a doubling of CO2 will result
            in a dramatic increase in world temps. There’s very little
            evidence of it. The temperature rise from about 1900 to 1940
            is about the same as from 1980 through 2000. What was the
            cause? No one knows, but it wasn’t CO2. Temperatures have not
            significantly risen since 2000 even though there’s been a
            dramatic rise in CO2. Sea level rise remains constant over the
            past 150 years. It’s always 10 years out for you folks, and
            when your dire predictions don’t materialize, it’s in ten more
            years.
            The only denying going on is that you can do something
            meaningful by building more wind turbines and solar panels.
               o
             dirk says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 The Swedish scientist ( I know, science is no longer
                 priority) Arrhenius calculated a temperature increase of
                 5 degrees at the doubling of CO2 in the atmosphere. This
                 concentration has now increased by 1/3, and the
                 temperature about 1.0, so, not bad, because, the oceans
                 can absorb about 50%. Yesterday, we had again the warmest
                 28 februari of all time, and the first lapwing egg laid 3
                 days earlier than ever, I am old and don’t mind so much
                 any more, but where will we end? I think, if really
                 something dramatic will occur (Bangla Desh flooded), we
                 will awake, but don’t expect this in the next 10 years,
                 so, no problems, so far!
          +
        K. Dershem says
               o March 1, 2019
            @Peter, excellent analysis. When this article was first posted
            I expected the climate deniers (who are very vocal on
            Quillette) would come out in droves. To my surprise, most of
            the comments have accepted the reality of anthropogenic
            climate change and debated the relative merits of nuclear
            energy vs. alternatives. Personally, I think the author
            overstates the virtues of nuclear and undersells renewables,
            but I’m not opposed to nuclear in principle. An escalating
            carbon tax would allow the market to determine the optimal
            approach.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 “I expected the climate deniers (who are very vocal on
                 Quillette) would come out in droves”
                 What is your definition of climate denier?
                    #
                  K. Dershem says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I think Peter (the OP) provided a pretty good
                      definition.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           He didn’t come with a definition K.D., but
                           mentioned a few climate change deniers by name.
                           In fact, what I realised yesterday, this
                           climate denier of course came in vogue after
                           the existence of holocaust denier, also by a
                           section of people that have a radical and
                           minority agenda, in the face of reality,
                           whereby I always must think of a pasage in
                           Alice in Wonderland: – you can’t deny it, even
                           where you try with both hands-. Everybdy knows
                           more or less what it means, but literally it is
                           nonsense of course. -Climate change sceptic-
                           would be a better description, “things are not
                           as bad or extreme as is depicted by press and
                           science. No need to do something” (as we see
                           now in the NL where we try to stop the winning
                           of natural gas (houses are crumbling) and lean
                           towards wind, underground warmth winning and
                           solar, but who is going to pay? An outcry of
                           the citizens (voters), and the politicians
                           admitting that costs are much higher than what
                           was calculated at first, this is how democracy
                           works, no more sensible actions, they are
                           blocked effectively). Where are the dictators,
                           please?
                         @
                       Jay Salhi says
                              - March 3, 2019
                           Peter listed William Happer, Roy Spencer, and
                           Richard Lindzen” as deniers.
                           Those are three prominent scientists who
                           express serious doubts about various aspects of
                           the prevailing narrative. They could be wrong
                           but to call them deniers is ridiculous.
                           The climate models predict the earth should be
                           warming at .3 degrees C per decade. People like
                           Lindzen and Spencer point out that the actual
                           temperature data show this isn’t happening and
                           all of the models over predict warming.
                           One could just as easily argue that the people
                           who favor the models over the data are the
                           deniers. Or perhaps we should just stop
                           slandering people with the “denier” label and
                           allow open debate instead of insisting that the
                           debate is over because 77 of 79 scientists
                           answered “yes” to two simple questions on a
                           grad student’s survey (the source of the false
                           97% consensus claim).
          +
        D-Rex says
               o March 2, 2019
            Level 3: People who blindly accept the CAGW narrative without
            question and resort to misrepresenting the abilities of actual
            scientists who are way smarter than them and claim they are
            fossil fuel funded hacks.
            These are people like Peter Pehlivan, K. Dershem and Nakatomi
            Plaza.
            ‘Global warming is an existential threat to organized human
            life, as well as animal life.’
            You do understand that we are in the middle of an ICE AGE!?
               o
             dirk says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 D-Rex: BTW, are you also holocaust denier? I wouldn’t be
                 surprised.
          +
        vince porter says
               o March 3, 2019
            A response headlined by slurs, as in “climate deniers” and
            “climate delayers”, and not a number in sight. But lots of
            political predictables – “we have to take action” because
            climate change is an “existential threat”. It probably is,
            but, opting in favor of the delusional solution rather than
            the reasonable solution merely delays the reasonable solution.
            By the time we replicate the German experiment in every
            developed country on earth, it may be too late for the
            reasonable solution.
   41.
   Erica from the West Village says
          + February 28, 2019
       It’s always a good thing when someone becomes “woke” before we all
       go “broke.”
       The banners and placards Michael and his environmentalists should
       be tugging around from protest to protest should declare “Open
       Yucca Mountain!!!”
       If Democrats would relent, the nation would be thrilled to call it
       The Harry Reid National Nuclear Waste Depot.
       After all, we’ve spent nearly $20 billion in taxpayer money to
       build this facility. Since it was Harry Reid who always blocked its
       opening (while gladly accepting the $ going into his state for
       development of the site), it’s only a fitting tribute it be named
       after the soon to be departed Senator from Nevada.
       Also…..Michael? As we’ve learned from the Japanese….best not to
       build reactors on or near geological fault lines. Californians
       often believe themselves to be immune from the laws of Nature, but
       this advice should be heeded.
   42.
   Anonymous says
          + February 28, 2019
       An excellent article. Intellectually, I have no doubt that nuclear
       makes the most sense – however, catastrophes such as Fukushima and
       the Ukraine are still scary.
       Maybe it is a phobia, but phobias are real.
       Who wants to move their family right next to a nuclear plant,
       regardless of the statistics ?
          +
        Ted Talks says
               o February 28, 2019
            How cheap is the property? For the right price I would.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o February 28, 2019
            “Who wants to move their family right next to a nuclear plant,
            regardless of the statistics ?”
            The French and the Swedes have managed just fine.
            Nobody wants to live near wind farms either. They are popular
            only for people who live far away. As more get built,
            opposition will grow. Unlike the fear of nuclear (which is
            completely irrational), wind farms are a horrible nuisance.
               o
             Doctor Locketopus says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Yes, if nothing else the nuclear plant is going to be far
                 less noisy.
          +
        E. Olson says
               o February 28, 2019
            Anonymous – 1 person died from radiation at Fukushima, 45 died
            at Chernobyl, and 0 died at 3 Mile Island. I was unable to
            find death figures from Cobolt or Lithium mining and
            processing, but I highly suspect the annual deaths are higher
            than total nuclear reactor deaths since 1945. I would
            certainly rather live next to a nuclear plant than a coal
            plant or wind farm (low frequency vibrations are very
            disruptive to central nervous system). Given how often Tesla
            batteries go up in flames, I am not sure it will be very safe
            to live next to the massive batteries that would be required
            to store excess solar or wind power either – especially since
            the battery fires are near impossible to put out.
               o
             D-Rex says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 @ E. Olson
                 Hah! Finally something to disagree on! That one person
                 who died at Fukushima committed suicide, so there!
                    #
                  E. Olson says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      D-Rex – thanks for the correction, although I expect
                      that person did commit suicide because they were
                      fearful of dying from radiation exposure in 30-40
                      years.
               o
             dirk says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Let me wonder, how many people died (or die per year, per
                 ton of product) in mining: coal, beauxite, coltran,
                 gold?? And how many just for collecting swallow nests for
                 Chinese soups (100 dlrs/cup)? All these human
                 considerations only made in the modern West. In other
                 countries just only risks to be taken, and ordinary
                 casualties . No food and progress without deaths of some.
          +
        Tersitus says
               o March 1, 2019
            “Maybe its a phobia, but phobias are real.” Just because
            you’re paranoid doesn’t mean someone’s not nuking you.
          +
        annonymous says
               o March 2, 2019
            No one wants to move their family next to ANY energy source,
            including nuclear, wind, coal, natural gas or a hydro plant.
            Why would they? The biggest concern is setback distance. The
            windustry insists on setbacks of 900 ft to 1400 ft from homes.
            Opponents want that setback distance closer to 2000 ft or more
            from PROPERTY LINES. Hence, the arguments. Opponents to wind
            energy, like opponents to the other energy sources want common
            sense setbacks————-and not the setbacks demanded, yes demanded
            by the wind energy companies.
   43.
   Sukh says
          + February 28, 2019
       Has the Auther Looked into Viktor Schauberger and his
       experiments/inventions using the energy of implosion ?
       I believe there is currently a massive internationally Cooperative
       project building a Nuclear Fusion plant in France
   44.
   Leafy says
          + February 28, 2019
       What we need is a Robert Moses for nuclear power.
   45.
   Fluffy Buffalo says
          + February 28, 2019
       Meh. A very one-sided take on things, to say the least.
       First off, yes, renewables harvest fairly low-density forms of
       energy, and therefore require land. It’s important to make
       efficient use of that land, so for example growing corn to convert
       it to bio-fuel is horrendous bullshit, because you can get hundreds
       of times more energy per area from solar panels. But we will have
       to get used to the thought of using a few percent of our area for
       generating energy, just as we use a few percent for living, and for
       traffic, and a large percentage for agriculture. (Combination uses
       are possible – like building a solar roofing over highways, and
       partially covering fields with solar cells mounted a few meters
       above the ground to reduce excessive solar radiation to the
       plants.)
       Second, yes, renewable energies are intermittent. They have to be
       coupled with some form of energy storage system. The most likely
       candidate IMO is power-to-gas – using excess electricity to
       generate hydogen and/ or methane, which can be stored, transported
       and used with the existing infrastructure for natural gas, and
       processed further to have high-density fuel for cars and planes.
       Third, nuclear is not the answer. Yes, you need only a little
       fissible uranium… but you have to mine a boatload of toxic,
       radioactive uranium ore to get that. And then you’re left with
       more-or-less radioactive waste that’s highly toxic and needs to be
       stored and guarded quite literally until the end of days. Germany
       has been searching for a site suitable to store that crap for
       decades… without success. If you’re worried about exporting defunct
       solar cells to the third world, guess where our nuclear junk
       (including the plants, when their lifetime of 30 years is up) is
       likely to end up? Seeing how the waste will generate costs
       indefinitely, the claim that nuclear energy is only expensive
       upfront is ludicrous.
       Oh, and evacuating something like an entire county in the case of a
       catastrophic failure is not an appealing prospect either.
       So, yeah, renewables will have to do the job in the long term,
       otherwise we’re screwed.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            Hand waving with no numbers. Your post is useless.
            “evacuate whole countries” = you have zero credibility
               o
             Fluffy Buffalo says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Cannot tell the difference between “country” and “county”
                 = doesn’t bother to read before writing angry comments.
                 And you want numbers? What numbers do you want? Some that
                 prove that renewables are more than competitive with
                 nuclear power? Okay: estimated cost for power from a new
                 nuclear power plant in the US: 77.5 $/ MWh.
                 Photovoltaics: 60 $/MWh. Wind, onshore: 55.9$/MWh.
                 Source:
                 https://www.eia.gov/outlooks/aeo/pdf/electricity_generati
                 on.pdf
                    #
                  Craken says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      Fluffy: Comparing baseload power with intermittent
                      power again proves you have no credibility. Since
                      you don’t understand the meaning of these numbers,
                      maybe you were better off without any.
                    #
                  Ftrftr Nd says
                         @ March 8, 2019
                      “And you want numbers? What numbers do you want?
                      Some that prove that renewables are more than
                      competitive with nuclear power? Okay: estimated cost
                      for power from a new nuclear power plant in the US:
                      77.5 $/ MWh. Photovoltaics: 60 $/MWh. Wind, onshore:
                      55.9$/MWh.”
                      According to your own source, the costs for wind and
                      solar aren’t comparable to nuclear, due precisely to
                      their intermittent nature.
                      From pages 8 and 9:
                      “The duty cycle for intermittent resources is not
                      operator controlled, but rather, it depends on
                      weather that will not necessarily correspond to
                      operator-dispatched duty cycles. As a result, LCOE
                      values for wind and solar technologies are not
                      directly comparable with the LCOE values for other
                      technologies that may have a similar average annual
                      capacity factor”
                      Which means your numbers are garbage.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > And then you’re left with more-or-less radioactive waste
            that’s highly toxic and needs to be stored and guarded quite
            literally until the end of days.
            You’re either ignorant of physics or lying. Which is it?
            “Long half-life” = “less radioactive”. By definition.
            From your “reasoning”, something with an INFINITE half-life
            should be SUPER dangerous. In reality, a half-life of infinity
            means that it’s not radioactive at all.
               o
             Fluffy Buffalo says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 Okay, my man, then tell me, if I’ve got a nice mixture of
                 Uranium 238 (half-life �4.468 billion years, eventually
                 decays into Radon, which tends to seep through
                 containers), Uranium 239 (703.8 million years) and
                 Plutonium 239 (24110 years, considered particularly
                 toxic), plus a bunch of shorter-half life isotopes which
                 keep the stuff above boiling temperature for a couple
                 decades at least… after how many years would you be
                 willing to store a bucket of the stuff under your bed?
                 After how many years would you be cool with it to seep
                 into your groundwater supply?
                    #
                  Doctor Locketopus says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      Still on the “half-life” idiocy, I see.
                      U-238 having a half-life of 4.468 billion years
                      means that it’s hardly radioactive at all.
                      Dangerous radioisotopes are generally the ones with
                      the SHORT half-life (i.e., highly radioactive).
                      After a couple of hundred years, reactor waste is no
                      more radioactive than the rocks from which it came
                      > after how many years would you be willing to store
                      a bucket of the stuff under your bed?
                      U-238? Indefinitely.
                      Don’t look now, dude, but there are billions of tons
                      of U-238 already in the environment. It’s a natural
                      substance that’s all around you, “my man”.
                      Innumerate.
                         @
                       Fluffy Buffalo says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           So you don’t have a problem with having a
                           constant source of radon under your bed? Cool.
                           And you’re the one who rounds down “long
                           half-life” to “not an issue”, and call me
                           innumerate? Okay, if I haven’t miscalculated,
                           Uranium 238 has an activity of 1.8E7
                           Bequerel/kg. Multiply that with the number of
                           elements in the decay series for the total
                           activity in the long term. Your turn, Mr.
                           Numerate: at what level is the stuff harmless
                           enough to let it seep into the environment?
                    #
                  Doctor Locketopus says
                         @ February 28, 2019
                      > Okay, my man, then tell me, if I’ve got a nice
                      mixture of Uranium 238 (half-life �4.468 billion
                      years
                      Which means it’s barely radioactive at all. By
                      definition.
                      It is a natural substance that’s found everywhere.
                      There are billions of tons of it out there, “my
                      man”. It’s all around you! Run! Hide!
                      You are an innumerate who views “radiation” the way
                      a savage views “evil spirits”.
                         @
                       Fluffy Buffalo says
                              - March 1, 2019
                           Are you daft? Uranium is “all around us”… in
                           minuscule concentrations, embedded in rocks,
                           that’s why such large amounts of ore have to be
                           dug up. And even then, it’s not harmless –
                           environmental radon that is created by uranium
                           decay causes several percent of lung cancers
                           (the vast majority being caused by cigarettes).
                           When it’s concentrated, it’s radioactive enough
                           to be a problem.
                           Also, you didn’t answer the question. How long
                           until the stuff becomes safe enough that you
                           don’t have to worry about it anymore?
                    #
                  charles says
                         @ March 2, 2019
                      Well, I don’t keep it under my bed and I don’t let
                      water seep in, because it is chemically toxic What
                      do I do with it ? I keep it in a well aerated place
                      (to avoid radon accumulation), burn it in reactors
                      (first thermal reactors, then later in the century
                      or next century, fast reactors) and then what is
                      left is only made of
                      – short and medium lived fission products
                      – long-lived fission products, and
                      – transuranics,( I.e. Neptunium and above in the
                      elements table).
                      I wait 300 years for the first part to decay away,
                      (building vaults that last 300 years is something
                      that even Egyptians from antiquity knew how to do)
                      and then I send the remainder is space towards the
                      sun using the 24th century space technology, for
                      which it will be a trivial problem (actually, the
                      second half of the 21st Century rocket technology
                      would suffice from a cost and performance
                      standpoint).
                      Oh, and of course, the few thousands of rocket
                      flights needed will use Hydrocarbons produced by PTG
                      technology…
                         @
                       D-Rex says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           I wouldn’t bother sending it to the sun. Worst
                           case just bury it back in the mine it came
                           from, best case, in 100 years time I’m sure we
                           would have technology that could make use of
                           every last gram of left over material.
          +
        charles says
               o March 2, 2019
            PTG infrastructure is made of expensive assets (about 1$ to 2$
            per Watt of electricity source :
            http://www.powertogas.info/fileadmin/content/Downloads/Broschü
            ren/dena_PowertoGas_2015_engl.pdf). It is the same order of
            magnitude than building a power plant. If you are the owner of
            such an asset, what do you prefer, feed it a few hours a day
            with intermittent power or maximise the output 24/7 with
            constant power ? PTG assets must go way down in price to make
            the above effect negligible. Another obstacle is that most
            large scale machineries don’t work very well intermittently
            (create materials fatigue for instance) ; from the same source
            as above : “Crucial for operation and efficiency of the
            process, however, are the peripheral components of an
            electrolysis system such as lye pumps, pressure regulators and
            product gas separators. Frequent load changes and full
            shutdowns stress these mechanical components by unsettling the
            heat balance, thereby shortening the system’s service life.”
            Last but no least, using Gas produced by PTG to produce
            electricity again when intermittent power is down is an
            inefficient proposition, as you have efficiency loss first
            when producing the Gas for Electricity (about 30% loss) and
            second (about 40%loss) when producing the electricity from Gas
            : that is about 60% loss from that battery !
            There is a place for PTG in transition from fossil fuels
            though, not as a battery, but as a way to create “carbon
            neutral” hydrocarbon for applications for which there is no
            alternative (for instance flying planes or rockets). This is
            for instance what the US Navy tries to do. (see
            http://www.altenergy.org/new_energy/seawater-into-jet-fuel.htm
            l)
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 5, 2019
                 @Charles
                 First, thanks for your posts on PTG, something I know
                 little about that sounds promising.
                 “There is a place for PTG in transition from fossil fuels
                 though”
                 The question is scale. For example, geothermal has a
                 place but geographic limitations mean it will never play
                 a large role. In terms of percentage of of global energy,
                 can you put an estimate on the potential capacity?
   46.
   Daniel Rirdan says
          + February 28, 2019
       If you want to see the real deal, you are welcome to download an
       excerpt of my book that lays down the most detailed continental
       24/7 plan of renewables: http://www.danielrirdan.com/energy.html It
       include amount of concrete, steel, area, it models fluctuations,
       and more.
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            Even if N America can go full renewable, will it work in
            India/China? If not, then America has a role to play in
            developing better nukes for places that can’t do the renewable
            thing 100%. I’m very skeptical even America can do it.
               o
             Fluffy Buffalo says
                    # February 28, 2019
                 FYI: China and India have cranked up their efforts at
                 rolling out renewables considerably in the last years.
                 Will they be able to go 100% in the next decades?
                 Probably not, considering how much their energy
                 consumption is rising at the same time… but that’s not an
                 excuse for the west to avoid doing its part.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 3, 2019
                      “FYI: China and India have cranked up their efforts
                      at rolling out renewables considerably in the last
                      years. Will they be able to go 100% in the next
                      decades? Probably not,”
                      1. No country in the world has any chance of going
                      100% renewable in the next decades, least of all
                      China or India who are building hundreds of new coal
                      plants.
                      2. In Paris in 2015, China pledged to limits the
                      increases its CO2 emissions to 100%, which was a
                      sacrifice compared to the Indians who said they
                      needed a 200% increase.
   47.
   David Schnarr says
          + February 28, 2019
       Nobodybmentioned thorium reactors as an alternative ton uranium….no
       meltdowns, no plutonium forcbombs. ……cheap and plentiful.
   48.
   Econo says
          + February 28, 2019
       Well, I see the author likes nuclear, and the main argument against
       renewables seems to be the added cost from intermittency. But there
       are options to deal with that.
       What the author decides to downplay, if not outright omit, is that
       the true cost of nuclear is much higher than he lets on. Nuclear
       only exists through direct public subsidies, free public insurance
       against disasters, and public money for decommissioning. Once these
       are factored in, nuclear is simply not cost-competitive.
       But don’t take it from me, take it from one of the leading
       economics journals:
       “Nuclear power has long been controversial because of concerns
       about nuclear accidents, storage of spent fuel, and how the spread
       of nuclear power might raise risks of the proliferation of nuclear
       weapons. These concerns are real and important. However,
       emphasizing these concerns implicitly suggests that unless these
       issues are taken into account, nuclear power would otherwise be
       cost effective compared to other forms of electricity generation.
       This implication is unwarranted.”
       Davis, Lucas W. 2012. “Prospects for Nuclear Power.” Journal of
       Economic Perspectives, 26 (1): 49-66.
       https://www.aeaweb.org/articles?id=10.1257/jep.26.1.49
          +
        Econo says
               o February 28, 2019
            Worse yet are the economics of building new nuclear in
            developed countries. A case in point is Hinkley Point C in the
            UK, where private investment could only be mobilized by
            guaranteeing substantial feed-in tariffs for decades, wildly
            above market rate. And even then, investors are not exactly
            biting.
            https://www.theguardian.com/news/2017/dec/21/hinkley-point-c-d
            readful-deal-behind-worlds-most-expensive-power-plant
          +
        Craken says
               o February 28, 2019
            Nuclear was cheap before it became overregulated. The price of
            building a nuclear plant roughly tripled (after inflation)
            from the mid 70s to the mid 80s in America. This price
            pressure is exacerbated by the rarity of new reactors in most
            countries–each reactor is bespoke, instead of mass produced.
            Both of these problems can be fixed–we know this because of
            history and because China currently has neither problem.
            You do have a point about public insurance, but it is
            impossible for the private sector to insure nukes. On the
            other hand, the insurance payouts have been minimal in the
            West. And new plants are safer than the very safe old plants.
            Nuclear is the only currently available tech that is
            demonstrably sufficient to eliminate most forms of GHG
            emissions.
          +
        Grant says
               o March 1, 2019
            The decommissioning costs are built in and would be much less
            if they were just kept open. New designs can burn waste and
            dramatically reduce risk. 104 US nuclear plants have been
            producing huge amounts of clean, safe energy for 50 years
            without a single fatality. If you think that CAGW is a high
            probability, then you must be pro nuclear, otherwise you are
            deceiving yourself.
   49.
   Caligula says
          + February 28, 2019
       “You need the right kind of dam and reservoirs” to store energy by
       pumping water uphill.
       1. And you need to use the power you’ve stored within a reasonable
       time, otherwise your stored energy will evaporate. Which makes this
       type of storage more suitable to flattening the daily or weekly
       demand curve than storing energy in the off-season for use a
       half-year later. Let alone using this to store energy against
       uncommon adverse events such as draught.
       2. And as always, you get out less than you put in. Overall
       power-out/power-in efficiency for this type of storage depends on
       climate and terrain, but 60% might be typical. Which is certainly
       better than zero, but you’re still leaking away a lot of energy.
       BUT the primary risk of renewables remains grid instability, in
       part because the sources are intermittent but also because the
       distances between energy production and use tend to be large, thus
       requiring more and longer transmission lines, which create an
       inherently more complex system that must deal with the long delays
       between when a power source goes offline and when that reduction in
       supply affects a distant load.
       For ultimately a power grid is a negative feedback system in which
       adjustments are constantly being made to balance power inputs with
       outputs. And time delays between inputs and outputs always degrade
       negative feedback control systems. For example, imagine trying to
       drive a car where visual information was not presented through
       windows but through cameras, such that the images from the cameras
       were delayed by just a few seconds …
   50.
   NOYB says
          + February 28, 2019
       If I was going to write something that long about something I
       thought that important I would proofread it.
   51. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet – End Times Buzz
   52.
   Foyle says
          + February 28, 2019
       Renewables can work and be a total solution now at competitive
       prices. Middle east has PV plants producing power for $0.025/kWh,
       undercutting all other forms of electricity. They can make liquid
       hydrogen for about $1.5/kg – that can be transported anywhere in
       the world to run through fuel cells (or in far future power ships
       and planes and earthmoving equipment) to make electricity for
       $.08/kWh – similar to existing wholesale electricity prices. That
       provides all the cheap energy storage and transportability of
       energy required to make the world’s power production entirely
       renewable.
       We can then use home or utility scale PV and a few kWh of batteries
       per person for the day/night cycle. Huge additional capacity of
       electric cars will make it possible for people to go off grid –
       their (autonomous) car goes and charges up at a grid connected
       station if their home power system battery gets depleted (cloudy
       days or winter months).
       The economics are viable now, and will only continue to improve.
       Home batteries are currently ~$600/kWh, but big manufacturers will
       get that down to <$150/kWh in a few years. Cost of utility scale PV
       will continue to drop as more efficient (automated) installation
       methods are developed.
       I love nuclear power – particulalry floating reactors sitting over
       the horizon offshore and built in specialist shipyards (which fixes
       Nimbyism and high costs of moving skilled construction workforce
       around), but it is becoming less and less necessary.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > They can make liquid hydrogen for about $1.5/kg – that can
            be transported anywhere in the world
            What kind of disasters do you foresee if we start shipping
            billions of tons of liquid hydrogen all over the place?
            As for shipped liquid hydrogen ever being cheaper than fossil
            fuels (much less nuclear-generated electricity), that seems
            highly unlikely. Liquid hydrogen has to be transported in
            cryogenic containers. Gasoline doesn’t.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o February 28, 2019
            > They can make liquid hydrogen for about $1.5/kg – that can
            be transported anywhere in the world to run through fuel cells
            (or in far future power ships and planes and earthmoving
            equipment) to make electricity for $.08/kWh – similar to
            existing wholesale electricity prices.
            Sorry, I simply don’t believe this.
            Liquid hydrogen has to be transported in cryogenic containers.
            Gasoline, coal, and uranium don’t.
            There’s no way that shipping liquid hydrogen around is ever
            going to be cost-competitive with those technologies. Not to
            mention the risks involved with shipping billions of tons of
            liquid hydrogen all over the world. Yikes!
          +
        Foyle says
               o March 1, 2019
            Liquid Hydrogen (LH2) shipping is quite feasible and not
            particularly expensive. There are already many bulk cryogen
            transports ships in service for LNG. LH2 ships to carry the
            same amount of energy would be about 50% bigger than the LNG
            freighters, but would weigh far less. Supertankers already
            ship vast amounts of fuel around the world, so that is not a
            big difference or change, an LH2 tanker spill or crash is not
            going to do any environmental damage – just as you don’t heart
            about problems with LNG tankers. LH2 can also produce
            electricity with nearly 70% efficiency, higher than the 60%
            possible with natural gas.
            Liquid hydrogen in an accident evaporates nearly instantly and
            rapidly rises into the air, it doesn’t accumulate in low
            places the same way that heavy hydrocarbon gases do. Sure it
            will burn if ignited but it is generally conflagration not
            detonation and it is actually less dense as an energy source
            than hydrocarbon fuels. There is no reason to ever bring it
            into close proximity with large populations if it is used as a
            seasonal/annual store for energy. It can be held in large
            isolated cryogenic tanks and be distributed to generation by
            gas pipeline (the same as natural gas).
            I don’t see this happening in the next 10-20 years as natural
            gas is such an easy and cheap option for the time being, but
            when we need it it is economic. The post-fossil fuel energy
            future of the human race is quite secure, can be entirely
            renewable, and need be no more expensive than today.
               o
             Doctor Locketopus says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 > Liquid Hydrogen (LH2) shipping is quite feasible and
                 not particularly expensive.
                 What does “not particularly expensive” mean? Cheaper than
                 crude oil? Cheaper than coal?
                 Yeah, gonna have to ask for some hard evidence there.
                 There’s no way that a cryogenic vessel is ever going to
                 be as cheap as a plain steel hopper car or ocean-going
                 tanker.
                 > There are already many bulk cryogen transports ships in
                 service for LNG.
                 Methane (i.e., natural gas) liquifies at -161 C. Hydrogen
                 liquifies at -252 C. Different temperature range.
                 Also, hydrogen has a bad tendency to embrittle any metals
                 with which it comes in contact. Bad news for a pressure
                 vessel. While this can be gotten around for small scale
                 tanks (up to say, railroad tank car size) by using
                 special alloys or exotic materials (e.g. aluminum tanks
                 wound with Kevlar fiber for strength) building a
                 supertanker out of that stuff is not going to be cheap.
                 > . LH2 can also produce electricity with nearly 70%
                 efficiency, higher than the 60% possible with natural
                 gas.
                 What you’re ignoring here that natural gas comes out of
                 the ground ready to use, but hydrogen has to be made,
                 incurring a loss at that stage. Typical PV solar cells
                 are about 35% efficient, so the total cycle efficiency
                 would be 0.35 x 0.7 = only about 25%
   53. Pingback: We Don’t Need No Stinking Giant Fans – Small Dead Animals
   54.
   Doctor Locketopus says
          + February 28, 2019
       Sorry for any duplicate comments…. the commenting system appears to
       have some issue where comments don’t appear for a while, even if
       one reloads the page.
          +
        Morgan Foster says
               o March 1, 2019
            @Doctor Locketopus
            Possibly related, but several days ago a comment of mine
            appeared with colored text attached from – someone – saying
            that my comment was being “moderated” and would soon appear.
            After it had, in fact, appeared.
            Perhaps we’re being a little more closely supervised?
   55.
   Peter Rowe says
          + March 1, 2019
       Thank you for an excellent article. Ten years ago, I stated at my
       work place that the only solution to the climate change issue was
       nuclear but that it would take a real crisis before it was accepted
       as the obvious solution. I was pretty much shut down by the younger
       staff members when I said this (and I was the boss). Sadly I think
       we are still decades and trillions of wasted dollars away from
       recognizing the absolute inevitability of the nuclear solution.
          +
        jimhaz says
               o March 1, 2019
            Yet I’m sure at the same time you would be 100% for
            capitalistic competition – and the trillions of dollars and
            resources lost via multiple business agencies working for a
            goal, but against each other.
            One thing I see is that the nuke rampers, like Shellenberger
            fail to properly sell the apparent safety aspect of the new
            forms of generator (nor include the projected supply/demand
            price of uranium). I wonder why.
   56.
   Conner M. Steacy says
          + March 1, 2019
       Nuclear power has been knocked on its ass for the past fifty years.
       Fears of radiation have been stoked by The China Syndrome(movie),
       Three Mile Island, Chernobyl, Fukishima and even Godzilla.
       As a result work on improving the technology has been lacking.
       Currently Light Water Reactors (the norm) use only about 5% of the
       useable uranium in the rods before they are sent to long term
       storage. People are working on ways that could actually retrieve
       the unspent fuel of all those rods.
       That is just one idea from many that haven’t been explored. We have
       no clue what capacity nuclear power might be at now if it had been
       pursued fully for fifty years.
          +
        ROD SANDERS says
               o March 2, 2019
            “People are working on ways…”
            I’ve heard this for 50 years. Still waiting. Ever hear of
            putting the cart before the horse? In this case, the
            consequences are potentially far too high to justify the risk
            of doing so intentionally. Let’s see the tried and true
            solution to the nuclear waste issue before aggravating the
            potential harm. We’ve heard enough about people “working on
            it” and how technology will provide the answer at some future
            time. Pie in the sky.
   57.
   Pedro says
          + March 1, 2019
       This is about the most encouraging news I’ve read in a long time,
       in spite of the fact there are so many evil and idiot forces out
       there trying to suppress, discredit or simply deny this truth.
       We’ve all been brainwashed about nuclear energy ever since Hanoi
       Jane Fonda did her little fright spectacle movie, The China
       Syndrome. Man, oh man have we all been duped.
   58.
   Ronald Kesslar says
          + March 1, 2019
       Very good article. I’ve been a pro-nuclear energy advocate for some
       time now. Getting people to understand that “the bomb” and nuclear
       power are two different technologies is one hurdle we need to
       overcome. Others are the fear created by old movies ie “The China
       Syndrome”. I hope our government would look at this as a possible
       solution for now until there is something we have not invented.
       Conner M. Steacy is on the right track for the unused fuel.
   59.
   Thomas Johnson says
          + March 1, 2019
       The problem with nuclear is that you can NEVER escape the waste….
       and this problem is far more pervasive that anyone will admit.
       Moreover, in the event of an accident, the land is rendered
       useless… FOREVER! And land is our most precious resource.
       Idea for a nuclear bumper sticker… Go Big – Move to Mars
          +
        jimhaz says
               o March 1, 2019
            That is a view I hold, particularly as we would appear to be
            due for some form of major natural disaster, such as a
            Yellowstone explosion.
          +
        Doctor Locketopus says
               o March 1, 2019
            > The problem with nuclear is that you can NEVER escape the
            waste
            Sheer nonsense.
            > Moreover, in the event of an accident, the land is rendered
            useless… FOREVER!
            Umm… Hiroshima has over a million people living there, dude,
            and Nagasaki has over 400,000.
               o
             Fluffy Buffalo says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 Hiroshima bomb: 60 kg of uranium. Nuclear power plant:
                 100 tons of uranium in the core, plus who-knows-how-much
                 in the cooling pond. See a difference there, Doctor
                 Numerate?
          +
        Craken says
               o March 1, 2019
            Maybe if you tried researching ACTUAL nuclear accidents you
            would be less hysterical.
            The choice is between nuclear or climate change. The risk is
            the occasional nuclear accident (until we perfect the
            technology) or destruction of the biosphere. It would appear
            that the anti-nuclear forces prefer to risk the biosphere
            rather than risk 1% of 1% of 1% of the planet’s surface.
   60.
   The other white meat says
          + March 1, 2019
       Somebody send this to AOC, not that it would penetrate that her
       scull.
   61.
   Peter Hennessey says
          + March 1, 2019
       https://news.sky.com/story/future-energy-inside-the-nuclear-fusion-
       reactor-that-will-recreate-sun-on-earth-11526692
   62.
   jimmbbo says
          + March 1, 2019
       The fallacy of the efficacy of “renewable energy” were obvious to
       ANYONE with an IQ above room temperature LONG before it became the
       battle cry of the Globull Warming Gestapo…
          +
        jimhaz says
               o March 1, 2019
            I am presuming your IQ is less than 100 then, if one considers
            that over the longer term renewables can be the ONLY answer to
            the human need for generated energy.
            I take the view that
            a) As a life form we do not change on big picture issues until
            we sufficiently suffer.
            b) Renewables will give us more time to change.
               o
             D-Rex says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Current wind and solar technology is only transient and
                 has NO chance of becoming the main supplier of energy on
                 a global scale. Lomboorg has the most sensible ideas for
                 those that feel that global warming is actually an issue.
                 For the rest of us non-hystericals, meh.
   63.
   Angus Robertson says
          + March 1, 2019
       The answer is electric cars, 2 way charging and a variable consumer
       electricity price market. When electric cars have more range than a
       person needs and 2-way charging they can be used as an electricity
       storage device. Car owners can set their cars to only charge beyond
       50% if price drops to very low levels and then sell the energy back
       to the grid if power prices rise above a high price. This way when
       the wind blows and the price falls the power is absorbed and when
       the wind stops blowing the power is available.
       This will become common place, because people buy cars with more
       range than they need on a daily basis for the time they need to
       take a once yearly trip away.
   64.
   Gary D. says
          + March 1, 2019
       It’s the money, honey.
       Governments have found a new cash cow in the environmental
       movement.
       For example, British Columbia’s “carbon tax” is at about 112% of
       the cost of the natural gas used. Then they turn around and hand
       money to very wealthy people who are able to buy electric vehicles.
       (It’s an “incentive” to buy electric vehicles, you see.)
       If governments gave a rat’s behind about the environment, I’d be
       surprised.
       Governments and environmental organizations are just licking their
       chops.
   65.
   Roger Lauricella says
          + March 1, 2019
       I’ve spent my career nearly equally between Nuclear (20 yrs) and
       wind/solar (18 yrs) and believe both are complementary. But I also
       believe in natural gas and even coal. It’s all about electrical
       inertia and the difference between synchronous generators (nuclear
       , gas, oil, coal, hydro) and asynchronous ( wind). Grid operators
       can call upon synchronous sources to support voltage and var
       contributions up and down to the grid. Wind for one needs the grid
       to start up (it consumes power first before reversing current and
       becoming a generation source) and regardless of internal controls
       or even storage cannot be counted on to provide large electrical
       inertia when the grid needs it. Texas stayed on the grid during a
       hot 2018 summer not because of record wind and solar generation but
       because of two twin nuclear reactor sites (one near Houston, one SW
       of Dallas). Those units provided grid stability (the electrical
       inertia) needed. But Nuclear is being shut down primarily by
       political forces in the USA. After 2022 the Dual Unit Indian Point
       Station North of NYC will be shutdown which is 25% of Southern NY
       power. There will be brownouts and blackouts in NYC either on hot
       summer days or cold winter nights because that inertia will be gone
       when some grid event occurs. The Politicians will promptly blame
       the utilities who will not be at fault.
   66.
   Rick says
          + March 1, 2019
       Interesting article that deserves consideration. With new advances
       in the area of nuclear technology that improves efficiency, cost,
       and safety, I don’t see how we can exclude this as part of the
       total solution. Bill Gates and his company, TerraPower
       (terrapower.com), was working with China to build a demonstration
       reactor but sadly, that project has been put on hold. A January
       2019 article at Popular Mechanics discusses some details. Nuclear
       must be part of the climate change solution.
   67. Pingback: Une grosse épine pour la lutte contre le CO2 : les
       énergies renouvelables détruisent la planète
   68.
   Hollywood Mark says
          + March 1, 2019
       I remember researching this author and his father a few years back
       when he began his first attempts to revive nuclear power
       favorability. His father is retired CIA and while I could find no
       evidence that the son works for the CIA I must assume there is
       similar connection until proven otherwise. Just my own rule.
   69.
   TheRadicalModerate says
          + March 1, 2019
       I would love to see a nuclear renaissance, but even if we had a
       radical reform in the regulatory framework, there simply aren’t
       enough trained engineers and operators to build at anywhere near
       the scale that would be needed. Beyond that, even in countries that
       are aggressively pursuing nukes, like South Korea and China, the
       capital costs per unit capacity are quite high. Nowhere near as
       high as they are in the US and Europe, but still high enough that
       the amortization makes for expensive electricity. And beyond even
       that, the irreducible unit of capacity that comes from a nuke is a
       couple of gigawatts, which makes that capital outlay a risk that
       only a few investors will tackle.
       In contrast, while I share Mr. Shellenberger’s reservations about
       renewables and the storage that’s needed to make each unit of
       capacity added reliable enough, they do have the nice property that
       they can be built at a variety of scales, and attract investors
       with a variety of risk tolerances. That’s a recipe for a system
       that can be built out, by a lot of people, fairly quickly.
       A quick note about storage: It should be possible to determine how
       many joules of storage you need per watt of renewable capacity to
       make the system reliable. From there, you can figure out the
       capital, operational, and charging costs well enough to determine
       what the levelized cost of energy is for a renewable-intensive grid
       that isn’t a complete fantasy. If you need 4 J/W, things are pretty
       reasonable. But if you need 12-16 J/W, you’re looking at LCOEs well
       north of $200/MWh, which simply isn’t feasible. Figuring out that
       key metric is essential if you want to know whether renewables will
       actually be reliable enough that we won’t have massive outages due
       to occasional bad luck.
       I’m hopeful that some new technology will come along just in time.
       It could be nuclear fusion (much easier to scale safely than
       fission nukes, and there’s a materials revolution in
       high-temperature superconductors that makes things look pretty
       good), or a real revolution in battery technology, or even the
       ability to dig a stable 5 km-deep shaft anywhere where we might
       need geothermal power. We could wind up being able to fabricate
       solar cells out of extraterrestrial materials and wind up making
       satellite solar power affordable. (The key to this one is launch
       costs, which are dropping precipitously. Instead of being 5 orders
       of magnitude too expensive, they may soon be only 1-2 orders of
       magnitude too pricey.)
       The good news is that human beings have recently been pretty good
       at finding ways to avoid extinguishing themselves, albeit at the
       last moment. With a little luck, in the near future we’ll look back
       on our hand-wringing about fossil power the same way we look back
       today at the city planners of the 1880’s, who were sure their
       cities were going to collapse because they didn’t have a way to
       clear the horse manure from the streets. Technology usually finds a
       way.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 1, 2019
            Only people who do not consider climate change the threat that
            the mainstream claims it is would suggest gambling on future
            tech miracles instead of building out fission at large scale.
            Engineers/operators can be quickly trained. There’s this
            resource out there called “young people.” It takes 6 years to
            properly train an engineer, less for other workers.
            China is a middle income country on a nuclear building spree.
            They wouldn’t do that if the $ numbers were unfavorable.
            Storage costs have been calculated many different ways–at full
            renewables even the richest nations would find them
            unaffordable. Even without storage costs, Germany shows what
            the costs look like for high renewable levels.
            Fusion is a proliferation risk, just like fission.
               o
             TheRadicalModerate says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 I’m optimistic that something better will come along, but
                 I agree that we can’t count on it. The problem is that
                 nuclear doesn’t solve the problem.
                 The problem with the nuke industry now is that its
                 workforce is aging and shrinking. Can more engineers and
                 operators be brought in? Of course. Can they acquire the
                 institutional memory necessary to operate plants
                 efficiently and safely? That’s a much bigger problem.
                 Best practices and all the little tips and tricks that
                 don’t get written down need to be mentored, not read in
                 books. There simply aren’t enough seasoned pros out there
                 to scale the industry up quickly. It’ll take a
                 generation.
                 China’s “building spree” from 2014-2020 averages to about
                 5849 GW of new capacity per year. That’s very impressive.
                 But that’s a country that is pretty much going flat-out,
                 as fast as they can, on nuclear, and here’s how much of a
                 dent that makes in their net capacity over the next 30
                 years. That should pretty much tell you everything you
                 need to know about the prospects for nuclear being the
                 major solution to de-carbonization.
                 IMO, storage costs haven’t been calculated at all–at
                 least not in any coherent way that can tell you what the
                 LCOE of a grid-wide solution would be. That’s exactly why
                 I’m advocating using the joules/watt metric. That number
                 should be stable enough by region to do a decent estimate
                 of what a majority-renewables grid will cost for each
                 independent system operator.
                 Similarly, you can figure out the LCOE of nuclear if it
                 had Chinese and South Korean overnight costs and
                 construction periods. (I haven’t done this, although it
                 sounds like a pretty simple project to do…)
                 With those numbers, you can make a decent comparison
                 between generating technologies–and you can estimate the
                 capacity deployment rate. Those are the key metrics we
                 need for policy.
                    #
                  TheRadicalModerate says
                         @ March 1, 2019
                      I don’t comment a lot on Quilette, so I didn’t know
                      that they’re one of those sites whose style sheet
                      makes links pretty much invisible. Here’s the link
                      from above on project Chinese capacity:
                      https://www.iea.org/media/publications/weo/GRAPHchin
                      ainstalledpowergenerationcapacityv2.png
                         @
                       Craken says
                              - March 2, 2019
                           This gives more accurate numbers on China’s
                           nuclear power production (4%):
                           https://pris.iaea.org/PRIS/CountryStatistics/Co
                           untryDetails.aspx?current=CN
                           At their current build rate, they’ll have about
                           120 reactors by 2050, which would provide about
                           6% of electric power. But, why wouldn’t their
                           build rate accelerate? There are no shortages
                           of manpower, materials, or money. America built
                           reactors more rapidly back in the 70s–and China
                           has 5 times the population of 70s America.
                           Also, with small modular reactors becoming
                           available, the costs will likely decline.
                           The LCOE numbers I do not have at hand. But,
                           I’ve seen them. There are two intermittency
                           issues with renewables: the short term
                           fluctuations (daily, hourly) and the seasonal
                           patterns. It’s the latter that create the major
                           cost problem. The numbers I’ve seen indicate
                           that storage becomes a major cost once
                           renewables rise above 30-50% of the electric
                           grid during peak season–the range reflects
                           different degrees of seasonal fluctuation. At
                           90% renewable penetration, adequate
                           compensatory storage becomes unaffordable for
                           any nation (cost curve goes vertical). That’s
                           what the models say. But, the models idealize.
                           Germany, as a test case, derives 27% of
                           electricity from solar/wind–and this has
                           created the highest electricity prices in
                           Europe.
                           I think an intelligent policy process would
                           result in America’s 2050 electricity mix being
                           about 25% wind/solar, 60% nuclear, and 15%
                           hydro/natural gas. If a miracle happens upon
                           us, then adjust the mix. One “miracle” that I
                           hear little about, but which is a distinct
                           possibility: creating clean synthetic fuels
                           from nuclear or renewables to replace oil and
                           natural gas. These could also be transported
                           globally by pipelines and supertankers–which
                           might mitigate the severe seasonal fluctuation
                           problem.
                         @
                       TheRadicalModerate says
                              - March 5, 2019
                           @Craken:
                           You’re projecting 6% nuke penetration in China
                           30 years from now, but you want 60% in the US,
                           even with an aging fleet? And with the
                           regulatory situation so out of whack?
                           As for why the Chinese rate wouldn’t
                           accelerate: They’ve been going flat-out since
                           the “third wave” construction started 12 years
                           ago. If they could have accelerated, they would
                           have. If anything, fourth wave construction is
                           a bit slower than third wave.
                           I favor significant nuclear regulatory reform,
                           but only a crazy person would de-regulate the
                           industry. The Chinese aren’t crazy; they
                           understand the consequences of an accident, and
                           they’re going to proceed as quickly as
                           possible, but not so quickly that things go
                           sideways on them. That requires not only
                           increased engineering and operator capacity but
                           also regulatory capacity, overseen by people
                           who know what they’re doing.
                           Remember that the person who oversees a Chinese
                           nuke that goes INES 5+ probably gets shot. It’s
                           a powerful incentive to be fairly cautious.
                           I agree that renewable seasonality is a big
                           deal, but the real problem is 3- and 4-sigma
                           events in the good seasons.
                           It’s fairly cheap (i.e., something like 4-6
                           J/W) to handle 1- and 2-sigma bad luck. But if
                           you want a grid that doesn’t collapse every 5
                           or 6 years from a 4-sigma event, you may easily
                           be looking at 12-18 J/W.
                           One of the things that I discovered when I
                           modeled this was that the capital amortization
                           and O&M costs scale pretty linearly with
                           storage size, but the charging costs are highly
                           non-linear. That’s because, in addition to
                           powering the grid, the capacity also has to be
                           able to re-charge the storage following a bad
                           event. If it can’t, then you’re pretty much
                           vulnerable to the same kind of 3- or 4-sigma
                           event that caused you to draw down in the first
                           place. That means that you have to
                           significantly over-plan your capacity, which is
                           expensive and likely drags your renewable
                           capacity factor down.
                           We’re in violent agreement on the problems with
                           renewables, I suspect. I just don’t see nukes
                           being a viable solution. We need something
                           else.
                           If I had to guess, it’s going to be fusion,
                           which is actually making major progress for the
                           first time in about 30 years. The beauty of
                           fusion is that, while the apparatus is complex,
                           it’s manufacturable at scale and the permitting
                           and deployment can go very quickly. I suspect
                           that we’re still 5-10 years from a compelling
                           demo and 15 years from early deployment, but it
                           can catch up very, very quickly. (And yes, I
                           know the old joke about fusion being 30 years
                           away and always will be. But 10 years away
                           makes it quite a bit more likely.)
                           I agree that fusion is a proliferation issue,
                           but proliferation and safety aren’t the same
                           thing. Furthermore, blanket design for fusion
                           systems turns out to be surprisingly hard.
                           Nobody’s gonna swap the Li-6 blanket for a
                           U-238 blanket without somebody noticing that
                           something hinky is going on.
                         @
                       Craken says
                              - March 8, 2019
                           I didn’t project 6% penetration of nukes in
                           China. I projected that for their current build
                           rate. We disagree about their potential build
                           rate, which I think is much higher. They scaled
                           back their plans post-Fukushima (which was
                           wise). But, I project 20% penetration in China,
                           as they rise out of the recent rut–400 reactors
                           by 2050. That is still a slower build rate than
                           America’s in the 70s, adjusting for population
                           size. As in so many other areas, China benefits
                           from learning from others’ nuclear mistakes.
                           I think we largely agree on renewables.
                           I’m more skeptical of fusion in the medium term
                           than you are. The main underappreciated problem
                           with D-T fusion reactors is that too much
                           tritium escapes unburned. And tritium is the
                           rare element of the two. We can only produce it
                           in fission (small quantities) and fusion
                           reactors. Currently, if we had a D-T fusion
                           reactor, we’d need to supply it with tritium
                           from fission reactors since it could not
                           produce enough for self supply.
                           The best skeptical take I’ve seen on fusion:
                           https://thebulletin.org/2017/04/fusion-reactors
                           -not-what-theyre-cracked-up-to-be/
                           I discount the problems he enumerates as
                           inconveniences–except the tritium problem,
                           which is a showstopper.
   70.
   J'ai pensé à un nom magnifique mais c'est trop lon (@kl60199572) says
          + March 1, 2019
       What the article leaves out is the nuclear waste problem
       https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uU3kLBo_ruo
          +
        Craken says
               o March 1, 2019
            False. Didn’t you read the article?
   71.
   Gary Denton says
          + March 1, 2019
       He claims to be an environmentalist but is actually recognized as a
       pro-nuclear activist.
       Some of the biggest claims in this article are lies.
       Just an example: Chernobyl did not kill less than 200 people and
       Fukushima none. Both incidents caused thousands of additional cases
       of cancer deaths.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 1, 2019
            Denton: You are a liar–and not a good one. That’s a telltale
            sign of Leftism.
               o
             D-Rex says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Craken, a bit harsh perhaps but not inaccurate.
          +
        charles says
               o March 2, 2019
            The problem is that to reach these numbers, you first have to
            apply a differential statistical methodology together with a
            health modelling assumption (the so called “Linear No
            Threshold” model). That is already quite debatable.
            But, even if you pass that hurdle, what most environmentalists
            miss is the second step to achieve consistency : apply such
            methodology for EVERY risk factor and ONLY THEN, rank the
            lethality outcomes. This is where their head explode, because
            then nuclear risk is way down the list, way below smoking
            (even marijuana smoking…), drinking sugary water, eating bad
            fats, being exposed to PM 10 particles or aromatic compounds
            from household cleaning product in indoor environment, or
            being downstream of a power generating dam that can break,
            just to name a few.
   72. Pingback: Thoughts & Doubts - The Domesticated Intellectual
   73.
   drew says
          + March 1, 2019
       This guy is also a moron.
       He estimates 200 people dying due to Chernobyl radiation – fully
       1/10 the lowest estimate ever made by the USSR. Generally accepted
       cancer incident rates related to Chernobyl are much higher, even
       according to the current Russian administration.
       Also, turtle moving technology has evolved quite a bit since he was
       in college – we can save most of them now.
   74. Pingback: Recomendaciones | intelib
   75.
   thomas fletcher says
          + March 1, 2019
       Your article underscores some of the underappreciated or neglected
       ramifications of the popular renewable energy sources. Sometimes
       policies that make us feel good turn out to have ugly unintended
       consequences. Quantitatively oriented environmentalist use the
       economic metric of energy return of investment to evaluate the
       deeper implications of various energy sources. The literature, peer
       review or otherwise, on the topic of EROI provide numbers all over
       the map. Given your knowledge of the energy industry and your
       capacity to think rationally, could you write another article
       reviewing the objective, no-nonsense data on the real costs of
       renewable energy sources?
          +
        Dino Rosati says
               o March 1, 2019
            This paper explains why EROI estimates are “all over the map”
            and what to do about that (use a rational and consistent
            method for the calculations):
            http://science-and-energy.org/wp-content/uploads/2016/03/EROI_
            LesHouches2016.pdf
            Also this:
            https://www.sif.it/media/16e40c03.pdf
            Result: renewables have a terrible energy return compared to
            nuclear.
               o
             thomas fletcher says
                    # March 1, 2019
                 thank you Dino. useful article
   76.
   Joe Tie says
          + March 1, 2019
       Interesting how advancements in battery tech and turbine design
       stopped yesterday when this was published. Better tell the folks at
       MIT, NASA, the military, etc so they stop their research. Also
       interesting how nuclear waste will somehow be transferred safely
       and securely hundreds of miles to underground facilities without
       costing the taxpayers and the rate payers a dime.
   77. Pingback: A Radically Moderate Answer to Climate Change – newsfns
   78.
   Sean S says
          + March 1, 2019
       Deal with Climate Change, how? and why? Climate changes no matter
       what you do. The problem is you don’t understand: what’s wrong with
       climate change, it changes anyway, and it changes no matter what
       you do. It is like you try prevent time from moving forward, why?
   79.
   Tay says
          + March 1, 2019
       It seems the author has written this piece of propaganda to give
       people an excuse. People who are looking for any excuse to be lazy
       and not change their ways already.
       “Solar roofs cost more than solar farms” – so… money isn’t any use
       when you can’t breathe or drink or eat. Get a grip.
       “solar and wind farms require long new transmissions lines” erm…
       like roads and so do non renewable energy plants. Just get some
       ecologists to go ahead of the line and check and divert 🤨. The
       solar farms can be built in places where there is minimal affect on
       wildlife. If that’s true about the endangered tortoise that
       shouldn’t have happened. I’m sure it could have been built
       elsewhere but probably wasn’t because it would have cost more.
       We need to just make all buildings, cars and pavements out of solar
       panels. Offshore wind farms have been found to increase
       biodiversity also (as algea grows on it and attracts reef building
       species who create microhabitats which bring larger creatures)
       Regarding nuclear plants, what do you do with the waste? Surely it
       is more human hating to put all those who work in the plants or
       those having to monitor the waste in jeopardy?
       Displacing wildlife on the small scale is much better than
       poisoning a whole ecosystem with pollution from fossil fuels. We
       are in the midst of the planet’s sixth major extinction. We
       literally dont have time to continue as we are while waiting for
       better alternatives. We need to improve our output now!
       Life will adapt and find a way to carry on without us. We just need
       to stop making things worse on our way out. Before you call me a
       misanthropist, I love all animals including Homo sapien, I just
       hate the human tendency towards selfishness and apathy.
       You don’t have to be a biologist to see that in any closed system,
       when an object/ organism takes in more energy than it gives out
       then it soon uses up all it’s resources and starves.
          +
        Lennard Brett Pattinson says
               o March 2, 2019
            Can’t breathe? Why can’t you breathe? Or drink and eat?
            By the way, Effect is spelt with an EFT.
               o
             Lennard Brett Pattinson says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Hah, hoist by my own petard (and Spellchecker). E!
          +
        D-Rex says
               o March 2, 2019
            @Tay, your whole comment was basically moronic but some
            statements stood out.
            ‘We need to just make all buildings, cars and pavements out of
            solar panels.’
            So when the solar panels break down after (I’ll be generous)
            30 years, we have to demolish and rebuild all of the buildings
            and roads? You’re not actually Ocasio-Cortez in disguise are
            you?
            ‘Offshore wind farms have been found to increase biodiversity
            also (as algea grows on it and attracts reef building species
            who create microhabitats which bring larger creatures)’
            This is just technically incorrect, so not as dumb,
            biodiversity increase means an increase in the number of
            different species, not simply an increase in number of
            organisms already there. That’s an increase in biomass, which
            is also a good thing.
            ‘The solar farms can be built in places where there is minimal
            affect on wildlife. ‘
            So can nuclear waste dumps but that hasn’t stopped
            environmentalists from throwing hissy fits about it.
            If you took off your ideological glasses and did some genuine
            research, you might find that the problem of ‘global warming’
            is not as great as you imagined.
   80. Pingback: Andrew Sullivan: A Radically Moderate Answer to Climate
       Change | Daily Program Newspaper
   81.
   ROD SANDERS says
          + March 1, 2019
       After seeing Mr Shellenberger on Tucker Carlson last night, I had
       to take Carlson’s advice and read this. The main reason I needed to
       follow up by reading his essay is because I was shocked to hear him
       state his 3 reasons why people oppose nuclear energy when Carlson
       asked him. The reasons Shellenberger offered were total BS.
       Since both Shellenberger and Carlson are too young to remember the
       early days of the environmental movement, I guess I can understand
       how both of them don’t remember. However, since Shellenberger
       presents himself as an environmentalist and is now campaigning for
       nuclear power, he has no excuse. I can only deduce that he is
       somehow benefiting from promoting nuclear energy.
       Here’s how Shellenberger authoritatively answered when Carlson
       asked “Why are they against nuclear”:
       “There’s three gig reasons why people are against nuclear.”
       1. “…they associate it with the bomb….”
       2. “…there was concern that too much cheap energy – too much
       nuclear energy – would result in over-population –
       over-consumption.”
       3. “…just a really strong desire to use energy to harmonize with
       the natural world….”
       He calls the third one “in some ways, the most powerful.” I have
       never heard such a bunch of crap in my life. And Carlson, so
       anxious to diss the “new green deal,” ate it up! He was actually
       fawning over the “science” displayed in this Quillette essay and
       encouraged viewers to read it at the beginning and again, at the
       end of the interview.
       Before Shellenberger ever got to these “3 BIG REASONS,” the
       interview was already a cornucopia of misinformation. I can’t
       believe this guy presents himself as an expert. I kept thinking he
       was going to address the elephant in the room, but no. He even
       managed to change to topic from renewables to fossil fuels in
       answering one question. Carlson didn’t even notice. Then he cites
       “natural resource” as an argument against solar and wind power. It
       makes no sense. I transcribed the entire interview.
       It’s worse than this essay. Both are nonsense. With biased
       scientific claims that could only bamboozle people who seek
       confirmation of views based on politics. Birds? Really? Wasting our
       deserts with windmills? OMG! What a whack job!
       He mentions the problem of radioactive waste disposal in this
       Quillette essay almost as an aside. But somehow it didn’t even rate
       a mention on national TV when listing his 3 BIG BOGUS REASONS. I
       haven’t forgotten why people opposed nuclear power in the ’60’s.
       It’s always been the #1 problem with nuclear for many of us. It had
       not been solved in the ’60’s and it isn’t solved today. Every
       nuclear power plant is generating tons of it and it’s scattered all
       over the planet just waiting for someone to do something stupid
       like drop a bomb on it. It’s seeping into ground water all over the
       planet. It lasts for millions of years. It’s not pollution – It’s
       RADIOACTIVITY!
       No other form of energy carries this hazard. By the time people
       recognize its true threat, it will likely be too late to do
       anything about it. That’s because “environmentalists” like
       Shellenberger are ignoring it. They are willfully ignorant. And
       media like Quillette and Fox News are helping disinform us so its
       backers can make money. In addition, nuclear power will never be
       cheaper than renewables. I cringe when I pay my utility bill
       knowing that part of it goes to the STNP. Austin tried to back out
       soon after committing to it. Nobody will take Austin’s 16% share
       because nobody wants the expense. Shellenberger is selling the most
       dangerous most expensive form of energy known to man.
          +
        Tony Starkly says
               o March 1, 2019
            This comment is utter nonsense. There is no radioactivity
            seeping into groundwater. Nuclear power has killed few people.
            Explosions of fuel has killed thousands. There was no elephant
            in the room. Shellie Berger is absolutely correct. You’re
            absolutely wrong. There’s not enough land, resources, or
            consistency to make renewables viable. The only joke here is
            you.
               o
             ROD SANDERS says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 Just like Shellenberger, you conflate fossil fuels with
                 renewables to make your non-point. Exactly how many
                 people have been killed by renewables? How many by
                 nuclear power? You don’t know, just like Shellenberger.
                 He and you have no science – Just opinions based on
                 biases. Preservation of land and resources (or as
                 Shellenberger calls them, “resource”) are about as stupid
                 a reason as anyone could possibly imagine to oppose
                 renewables. I didn’t even get into some of the other
                 asinine statements Shellenberger made. There are many in
                 a short interview. The closing ad hominem is an
                 indication of your logical prowess.
                    #
                  Morgan Allen says
                         @ March 4, 2019
                      I think it’s certainly true that the comparative
                      risk of and damage done by nuclear power has been
                      grossly exaggerated, and newer reactor designs
                      (particularly thorium-based) could be very promising
                      in various applications.
                      But I’m also reasonably confident that
                      grid-balancing and energy-storage solutions
                      sufficient to meet the challenges of large-scale
                      renewable energy are very feasible. These are not
                      mutually exclusive solutions and we should ideally
                      be embracing both.
                      https://qz.com/1355672/stacking-concrete-blocks-is-a
                      -surprisingly-efficient-way-to-store-energy/
                      https://news.stanford.edu/2018/04/30/new-water-based
                      -battery-offers-large-scale-energy-storage/
   82.
   V 2.0 says
          + March 1, 2019
       How much uranium do we have lying around and won’t we run out of it
       at some point? We won’t run out of solar energy until the sun
       implodes and at that point we’ll have much bigger problems than
       having power to run our AC on hot days. Is there a way to make
       solar cell more efficient so we’re not covering the earth with
       them? I plan to get some for my backpacking trip that will
       apparently work great even on cloudy days (gotta test’em out).
       Too bad we can’t harness the energy stored in fat. That way we
       could solve our energy problems and the obesity crisis at the same
       time without having to give up the Cheetos. (Hey…if the Matrix can
       run on human generated electricity…)
          +
        charles 2 says
               o March 2, 2019
            >How much uranium do we have lying around and won’t we run out
            of it at some point?
            4 billion tons in the ocean, 100 trillion tons in rocks. If we
            extract Uranium from Seawater (possible with today’s
            technology with only a modest increase in electricity price),
            several thousand years, by which time rocks dissolve in the
            ocean and replenish the Uranium inventory. With this effect,
            we have enough for a billion year, when earth is vaporised by
            a growing sun. See
            https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_power_proposed_as_renewa
            ble_energy
            So answer to your second question : No we won’t.
               o
             Craken says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 @Charles I just want to add one clarification to what you
                 said, which is otherwise correct. For nuclear to be
                 essentially renewable, we must use the energy in uranium
                 efficiently. This means switching from current light
                 water reactors to fast or thermal reactors. The switch is
                 not urgent, but ought to be made within a few centuries.
   83.
   Chip Drewry says
          + March 1, 2019
       Oh for Pete’s sake people. Stop the over analyzing pshychobabble
       BS. Climate Change is a fraud, why do you think they changed the
       packaging from global warming to climate change? There isn’t any
       manmade climate change (global warming) going on now just like
       there wasn’t any global cooling in the 1970’s. Get a grip on
       reality, willya? And yeah, it really is just that simple.
          +
        K. Dershem says
               o March 1, 2019
            Chip: do you think there’s a massive conspiracy on the part of
            tens of thousands of climate scientists who have manufactured
            and are perpetuating this supposed threat? The conspirators
            are brilliant enough to fool almost every government and most
            of the corporations in the world, but their plan is
            sufficiently transparent that you can see right through it?
            What’s their motivation? Do they hate capitalism? Do they want
            to get rich? — or, ironically, both? Of course, if they were
            truly motivated by financial gain, they could make FAR more
            money working for fossil fuel companies (which have poured
            tens of millions of dollars into a P.R. campaign to “create
            doubt” about climate change, following the playbook of
            cigarette companies regarding the dangers of smoking) than
            they do working at universities, nonprofits and government
            agencies. The basic science underlying climate change has been
            understood for well over a century. It’s neither complicated
            nor controversial, except to people who are wearing
            ideological blinders.
               o
             D-Rex says
                    # March 2, 2019
                 @ K,’do you think there’s a massive conspiracy on the
                 part of tens of thousands of climate scientists’
                 News flash, there arn’t tens of thousands of actual
                 ‘climate scientists’. The term didn’t even exist a few
                 decades ago but now everyone in a field slightly related
                 to climate or the atmosphere or environment calls
                 themselves a climate scientist. True climate scientists
                 are called ‘atmospheric physicists’ and there aren’t that
                 many of them and a lot of them are skeptics.
                 And yes, a lot of these so-called ‘climate scientists’
                 are after fame and fortune, just like most academics
                 would like.
                    #
                  Jay Salhi says
                         @ March 5, 2019
                      Around 1,500 scientists contribute to a typical IPCC
                      report but one analysis found that 53 scientists did
                      most of the work and had control over the final text
                      of the report. Ten of them worked for the same
                      university.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 3, 2019
                 @ K Dershem
                 “The basic science underlying climate change has been
                 understood for well over a century. It’s neither
                 complicated nor controversial, except to people who are
                 wearing ideological blinders.”
                 The uncontroversial idea is that, all other things being
                 equal, increasing CO2 will have a warming effect. The
                 problem is is that nature is complex and all other things
                 are not equal. So the people doing the computer models
                 have to make numerous assumptions about things they don’t
                 know. Are the assumptions correct? Well, the track record
                 of the models (all of which have over predicted warming)
                 suggests there is still a long way to go.
                 The observed temperature increase from the late 19th
                 century is 1 degree C. In common parlance (as presented
                 by the media and activists), this is all blamed on fossil
                 fuels. People get called deniers for asking the following
                 questions:
                 1. Over half of the increase occurred during the first
                 half of the 20th century before fossil fuel use took off.
                 How can this be explained?
                 2. Does natural variation account for any of the
                 increase? If so, how much?
                 3. With regard to warming caused by human activity, what
                 percentage is caused by fossil fuels and what percentage
                 is caused by other activity such as land use?
                 4. Hasn’t the earth been warmer in the past such as
                 during the Medieval Warming Period?
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 4, 2019
                 @K. Dershem
                 “Chip: do you think there’s a massive conspiracy on the
                 part of tens of thousands of climate scientists who have
                 manufactured and are perpetuating this supposed threat?”
                 You seem to think a complex topic can be reduced to a
                 single true/false question.
                 The so-called consensus comes from the work of the IPCC,
                 which has from its founding been an activist body with a
                 political agenda. A former head of the IPCC admitted he
                 only invited scientists who supported the narrative and
                 excluded dissenting voices. This does not mean the work
                 the IPCC does is automatically wrong or that there is a
                 conspiracy. But it should give you pause before you label
                 anyone who questions any aspect of the prevailing
                 narrative a “denier”. On a topic like this, you cannot
                 separate the politics from the science. That applies to
                 “true believers” and “skeptics” alike.
                 The alleged consensus is nowhere near what it is claimed
                 to be in the mainstream press.
                    #
                  S Snell says
                         @ March 4, 2019
                      Most of the top-shelf scientists of the IPPC have
                      departed, often in protest, as that body has sunk
                      deeper into self-serving political mire. Now more
                      than ever the IPCC is a political body with a
                      political agenda, dominated by second-tier
                      bureaucrats and set-asides.
   84. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet | Watts Up With
       That?
   85.
   A. O'Connor says
          + March 2, 2019
       The author brings up some seemingly logical arguments, but they
       don’t justify a shift away renewable energy sources, away from
       finite sources. Couple of things that immediately spring to mind –
       the environmental impacts of coal mines on local flora and fauna is
       massive. Here in Australia the Indian-based mining company Adani
       has been trying to get another call mine off the ground (in the
       ground), but is being bitterly blocked by the local people based on
       Adani’s fairly dismal environmental record. Massive land clearing
       and water contamination that affects natural systems are just a
       start – how are wind farms or solar farms worse? In relation to the
       comment about storing power generated from renewables – South
       Australia installed a Tesla battery system that has continually
       outperformed the outdated coal-powered systems in place elsewhere
       in the country. No black outs and incredibly quick load adjustment
       to the network. This came after South Australia had rolling black
       outs in a heat wave that cost lives. That one piece of technology
       saved lives this summer and continues to outperform expectations.
       These technologies are fixing problems and are making our world a
       better place. Are they free from impact on our lives and
       environment? No, but they are better than what we previously relied
       upon for our energy BY FAR! As for nuclear, well it’s safe until
       its not and then – Fukushima. Nuclear has proven to be largely very
       safe, but it has a cost that we pay for generations when its goes
       wrong.
   86. Pingback: Renewables Can’t “Save the Planet,” Here’s Why… – Lake
       Minnetonka Liberty
   87.
   Mike says
          + March 2, 2019
       Great article. One thing I’d add (btw I was born in early 70’s as
       well, and have been an engineer in the commercial nuclear power
       industry for much of my career) is that nuclear and solar and wind
       are all dependent upon and derivative of, fossil fuels. They simply
       provide leverage atop those fossil supplies to one degree or
       another, and certainly nuclear is the biggest lever by far, and
       you’ve done a brilliant job illustrating that here. When you view
       the entire cycle, fossil energy is a key player in mining,
       constructing, transporting, etc. all along the value chain. In my
       mind this is the perspective the public, and therefore political
       representation, lacks.
          +
        charles says
               o March 2, 2019
            >When you view the entire cycle, fossil energy is a key player
            in mining, constructing, transporting, etc. all along the
            value chain.
            You confuse “fossil energy” with “hydrocarbon energy”.
            Hydrocarbon don’t need tocome from fossils, they can be
            manufactured from clean energy sources (including nuclear)
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 4, 2019
                 @Charles
                 “Hydrocarbon don’t need to come from fossils, they can be
                 manufactured from clean energy sources (including
                 nuclear)”
                 1. How much energy is required to manufacture
                 hydrocarbons?
                 2. Can it be done now (or in the near future) on a
                 commercially viable basis?
                    #
                  Charles says
                         @ March 4, 2019
                      @Jay
                      Efficiency is around 45-60%
                      (https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Power-to-gas)
                      In terms of fuel cost, the US Navy is projecting 3
                      to 4$ per gallon of jet fuel. Expensive but not
                      unaffordable.
   88.
   John Evans says
          + March 2, 2019
       Great article. One aspect not covered by such articles is the fact
       that the so-called “renewables” aren’t actually renewable in the
       true sense. Whilst the energy might be claimed to be renewable
       (there will always be more wind) but those claims don’t recognise
       that the raw-materials needed for much of the technology are just
       as finite as coal. The blades for wind-turbines are made out of
       fibre-glass or carbon-fibre. Apparently neither can be recycled
       beyond being minced up and used as fill under say roads. The
       lithium used in batteries is similarly finite – old batteries
       aren’t recycled so we will eventually run out. So the criticism of
       coal in that it is finite can also be applied to much of the
       “renewables” technology and so it is just as bad.
          +
        charles says
               o March 2, 2019
            > so it is just as bad.
            I agreed with you until you said that. No, it is not just as
            bad. We have to address our limited capacities one by one,
            starting with the most urgent, NOT saying they are all
            equivalents. Material necessary for fiber-glass or carbon
            composite will run out in thousands of years even longer (we
            are talking of sand and one of the most common element in
            planet earth here !). The limits in Lithium recyclability have
            been barely scratched.
            Today, our most urgent limits are :
            1 (by far) : capacity to release CO2 in the atmosphere and the
            ocean,
            2 : inventories of high EROI fossil fuels, taking into account
            1 above
            3 : fertile soil availability,
            4 : fresh water availability,
            5 : phosphorus availability
            6 : capacity of the biosphere to absorb human pollution (for
            instance micro plastics).
            Solve the above, and humanity is good to go for a thousand
            years at least. Enough time to find “out of the box” solution
            for many problems.
   89.
   cnbc says
          + March 2, 2019
       Petr Beckmann made these arguments (in a much more scientific
       manner) in the 1980’s. Why is this “expert” author just now coming
       to this conclusion?
   90.
   Rick Phillips says
          + March 2, 2019
       The only thing I know for sure is that there seem to be strongly
       held and somewhat contradictory beliefs that will make reasonable
       outcomes difficult to achieve. My modest contribution a link to an
       assessment of nuclear safety by someone who seems eminently
       qualified to make it.
       https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ryI4TTaA7qM
       Nuclear Accidents: Lessons Learned from Three Mile Island,
       Chernobyl, and Fukushima. Presented by Dr. Brian Sheron, Director
       (Retired) Office of Nuclear Regulatory Research
   91.
   Rick Phillips says
          + March 2, 2019
       QuilletteComment Renewables 190228
       There is a lot of discussion about nuclear safety in this thread.
       My modest contribution to that discussion is a link to an
       assessment of nuclear safety by someone who seems to be eminently
       qualified to provide one. It is relatively reassuring.
       https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ryI4TTaA7qM
       Nuclear Accidents: Lessons Learned from Three Mile Island,
       Chernobyl, and Fukushima. Presented by Dr. Brian Sheron, Director
       (Retired) Office of Nuclear Regulatory Research
   92. Pingback: A Radically Moderate Answer to Climate Change - USA DAILY
       NEWS
   93.
   David Guy-Johnson says
          + March 2, 2019
       An excellent article
   94. Pingback: There Still Ain't No Joy in Mudville – Freedom's Back
   95.
   Bob Candelaria says
          + March 2, 2019
       As a retired nuclear power plant operator I feel like I can comment
       with some knowledge on this. Although the human condition is one of
       imperfection, in spite of inevitable errors, I still see nuclear
       power plants as operated safely. Since the Three Mile Island
       partial meltdown, I’m not aware of any errors made of that sort of
       consequence or even close to it. My biggest concern is that going
       on 60 years are we still don’t have a good solution to high level
       Radioactive waste disposal/isolation. The Coke can size of uranium
       fuel mentioned in the article has to be put in a fuel assembly
       making it hundreds of times that size. The entire assembly becomes
       highly Radioactive creating much more waste than implied in the
       article. Although I believe nuclear power is a necessary major part
       of our future I’ll feel a lot more comfortable about it once they
       resolve the radioactive waste issue!
   96.
   Richard Poore says
          + March 2, 2019
       The most devastating damage done by wind turbines isnt even
       mentioned here.
       Bats are being killed in huge numbers by wind turbines. Bats arent
       as sexy as raptors, eagles and owls but they are play a larger role
       in maintaining our ecological environment. Biologists have been
       concerned about the US bat population because of white nose
       disease, but the impact of wind turbines is now dwarfing that
       problem.
       Each bat eats hundreds of thousands of insects every year, wind
       turbines are removing a major part of the insect predator food
       chain.
   97.
   Jean Cripteau says
          + March 2, 2019
       ctrl+f “Elon Musk”… right so no mention of the modern day Thomas
       Edison who devotes half of his considerable efforts to
       transitioning the world to renewable energy generation, storage and
       transport solutions, who also says that a solar plant of the same
       surface area as a nuclear power plant with accompanying greenbelt
       produces more energy?
       Anyone care to comment?
          +
        yarpos says
               o March 6, 2019
            There is no “transition to renewable energy” especially on
            supposedly driven by Musk. That is pure fantasy. Look at where
            the worlds real energy usage is sourced, renewables are and
            can only be a rounding error.
   98.
   Mike Donnigan says
          + March 2, 2019
       “Elon Musk…says that a solar plant of the same surface area as a
       nuclear power plant with accompanying greenbelt produces more
       energy?”
       Citation, please.
   99.
   mattb67 says
          + March 2, 2019
       He makes good points about the proven value of nuclear power. But
       he only mentions solar and wind for generation, and using an old
       dam for power storage. He’s making the standard mistake of assuming
       the world will be swapping fossil fuels for just solar and land
       based wind farms, and wow, who’d have guessed it?! These sources
       are intermittent!
       There are many, many other predictable methods of renewable
       generation which are finally getting investment – geothermal and
       tidal are completely predictable for instance. Or consider Spain’s
       solar tower thermal generation outside Seville, which can store
       energy for around 30 mins. And there are many ways to overcome
       intermittence; use excess renewables to make hydrogen; or extract
       hydrocarbons from the air for cleaner synthetic petrols; electric
       cars are mobile battery packs which can stablise the grid with
       smart/bidirectional charging (Nissan/Renault EVs and VW’s ID have
       this capability); or the slightly surreal Ares Nevada gravity
       train. There isn’t one solution to intermittence, it’s likely to
       require a range of smaller scale solutions. And that requires
       something that’s been lacking across the world – government
       planning to work on renewable energy stability, instead of just
       building yet another coal or gas plant.
       And perhaps he’s right and there won’t be a battery revolution.
       Maybe there won’t be a revolutionary breakthrough battery. But
       there is continuous improvement – Tesla have just bought a company
       called Maxwell Tech whose batteries have a lower cost, higher power
       density (around 15% on both counts). That’s a significant
       improvement, and it changes the economics of building and using
       batteries.
       The political and economic answer I believe is a carbon dividend
       scheme – tax carbon at a realistic level and give all the revenue
       back to the citizens to offset any price rises. This will shift the
       investment out of fossil fuels into renewables, and that includes
       nuclear.
   100.
   Nic says
          + March 2, 2019
       Good article.
       Two points, first a minor correction:
       “At the end of the process, the high-level radioactive waste that
       nuclear plants produce is the very same Coke can of (used) uranium
       fuel.”
       Not entirely correct. Each type of fission reactor produces a
       different profile of radioactive isotopes as waste, the bulk of
       them NOT from the base fuel, but from shielding, tamping rods, and
       other surrounding materials.
       However, it doesn’t take a PhD in nuclear engineering to calculate
       the waste amounts, what they are, the volume, and the half life
       involved.
       The shorter the half-life, the more dangerous generally.
       However, the answer is easy: You dig a deep hole in a subduction
       zone, bury them there, and let the generations around in about
       30-200 million years worry about it.
       At which point there is no issue.
       Second point is more important, and is addressed in Michael
       Shellenberger’s article..
       I was trying to run an MECE business analysis on who benefits from
       the current global climate hysteria.
       The usual list of suspects are all in there, but only in sufficient
       quantity to keep the juggernaut going, not initiate it or
       accelerate it.
       Who has both means, motive, and opportunity?
       Well, we know that energy (and that means fossil fuel mostly, but
       also large proven fission, and HUGE experimental tokamak type
       fusion reactors) interests are massively contributing to not just
       solid research (of which i HIGHLY approve – falls under civil
       defence in my book) but also to the hysteria.
       OK, but they can easily manage a four decade amortised swap from
       fossil to uranium/plutonium fuel sources. The entry barriers are
       too high for any entities other than governments or MNC sized
       corporates to play.
       So they have means, opportunity, and there is evidence that they
       haven’t been shy about using that opportunity.
       The motive is however missing.
       Unless you are interested in an engineering fashion in advances in
       fusion power.
       Not too many years ago, it seemed that we we not too far from
       cheap, small fusion reactors taking up the kind of square meterage
       a double garage can provide.
       Now that is a game changer, disruptive in the extreme.
       The net result to every human on the planet is incalculable and
       hugely positive.
       The short term net result to any party invested in the status quo
       is also huge, but here, its about massive capital losses.
       So every single country with a energy supply based economy.
       Russia, Venezuela, OPEC, the USA, etc
       Every corporate with a first order (in the business of supplying or
       using current fuel) or second order (mining, manufacturing,
       transport) interests.
       That’s about half of the top 50 (using just this admittedly bad
       list –
       https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_largest_companies_by_revenue)
       But when it is time to railroad, people railroad.
       IF (and this is a big IF admittedly) cheap fusion power is a
       likelihood within the next 5-10 years, AND it’s within the reach of
       a company which can come up with <10m USD CAPEX… then these
       interests have a gigantic short term problem, UNLESS they can come
       up with a way for someone to pick up the hit to their balance
       sheets, capital losses, and effectively underwrite them over the
       1-4 decades they need to transition.
       Now that would provide a motive par excellence.
       And leave only one party standing with means, motive, and
       opportunity.
       Even if and when the degree of manipulation is clear, people with
       new-found prosperity will be forgiving in the extreme, as "it all
       worked out OK!"
       And not notice it would all have worked out OK for everyone anyway.
       Except the guys doing the manipulation, who would have lost their
       shirts.
       A heck of a lot of people would rationally actually agree to bail
       out these companies oddly, although a lot would not.
       Given just ONE assumption (that fusion is closer and cheaper than
       the general population thinks) this scenario makes more sense than
       anything else.
       And, it doesn't worry me that much. I could even justify it
       ethically in some ways.
       Thoughts would be appreciated.
       Rgs. Nic
   101.
   Reziac says
          + March 2, 2019
       I’ve been saying this for a long time. Solar projects produce a
       scorched-earth level of ecological destruction — not only their own
       footprint, but because the heat column changes the climate for
       miles downwind, and this has a particularly negative impact on the
       deserts usually chosen as sites. I personally observed this when I
       was living in the SoCal desert. We’d formerly had very little
       blowing dust (in part due to good ground cover), and reliable
       cooling from distant but significant onshore winds, starting about
       2pm every day. A solar-mirror facility was built about 10 miles
       directly upwind. Within a year or so we had gobs of blowing dust,
       and daily cooling was either delayed til evening, or didn’t happen
       at all (meaning reduced or absent nighttime condensation — the
       water a lot of desert life relies on to survive). And this was a
       permanent change that impacted everything. What had been a thriving
       desert ecology began degrading into wasteland. And this wasn’t even
       an especially large project (about 140 acres, IIRC).
       And the projected lifespans of 20-30 years? Very funny. Any desert
       dweller knows what desert grit does to shiny surfaces. Plexiglas is
       opaqued in as little as 3 years. Tempered glass gets pitted within
       about 10 years. Microdust coats everything in short order. Yeah,
       gonna last long enough to pay for itself, sure thing!
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o March 4, 2019
            ” Any desert dweller knows what desert grit does to shiny
            surfaces”
            This desert dweller wholeheartedly agrees. Dust is the enemy
            of solar panels.
   102.
   ROD SANDERS says
          + March 2, 2019
       Just keep ignoring the elephant in the room, ye Nuclear Nutcases.
       From Wikipedia:
       High-level waste (HLW) is produced by nuclear reactors. The exact
       definition of HLW differs internationally. After a nuclear fuel rod
       serves one fuel cycle and is removed from the core, it is
       considered HLW.[35] Fuel rods contain fission products and
       transuranic elements generated in the reactor core. Spent fuel is
       highly radioactive and often hot. HLW accounts for over 95 percent
       of the total radioactivity produced in the process of nuclear
       electricity generation. The amount of HLW worldwide is currently
       increasing by about 12,000 metric tons every year, which is the
       equivalent to about 100 double-decker buses (~200 single-decker
       buses) or a two-story structure with a footprint the size of a
       basketball court.[36] A 1000-MW nuclear power plant produces about
       27 tonnes of spent nuclear fuel (unreprocessed) every year.[37] In
       2010, there was very roughly estimated to be stored some 250,000
       tons of nuclear HLW,[38] that does not include amounts that have
       escaped into the environment from accidents or tests. Japan
       estimated to hold 17,000 tons of HLW in storage in 2015.[39] HLW
       have been shipped to other countries to be stored or reprocessed,
       and in some cases, shipped back as active fuel.
       The radioactive waste from spent fuel rods consist primarily of
       cesium-137 and strontium-90, but it may also include plutonium,
       which can be considered a transuranic waste.[32] The half-lives of
       these radioactive elements can differ quite extremely. Some
       elements, such as cesium-137 and strontium-90 have half-lives of
       approximately 30 years. Meanwhile, plutonium has a half-life of
       that can stretch to as long as 24,000 years.[32]
       The ongoing controversy over high-level radioactive waste disposal
       is a major constraint on the nuclear power’s global expansion.[40]
       Most scientists agree[41] that the main proposed long-term solution
       is deep geological burial, either in a mine or a deep borehole.
       However, almost six decades after commercial nuclear energy began,
       no government has succeeded in opening such a repository for
       civilian high-level nuclear waste…
          +
        ROD SANDERS says
               o March 2, 2019
            Journey to the Safest Place on Earth:
            https://vimeo.com/75918238
          +
        Craken says
               o March 2, 2019
            You are worried about a minor *potential* problem and
            privilege this worry over a major known problem that threatens
            the entire biosphere. Your priorities are badly misplaced.
   103.
   Lorna Salzman says
          + March 2, 2019
       Except for Rod Sanders, all of the commenters are blowing smoke
       from inhaling from the Big Bong. They are prime examples of
       Confirmation Bias: people with uninformed opinions with no
       substantiation whatsoever. Shellenberger has no scientific or
       environmental credentials whatsoever. He is the darling of the
       right wing and pro growth maniacs; see my demolition of two of his
       and Nordhaus’ reports (www.lornasalzman.com). Their answer to the
       energy crisis? PROSPERITY! the precise thing that CREATED the
       crisis! Overconsumption.
       I spent most of my professional career debunking the pathetic
       rationalizations for nuclear power. Forget 4th gen thorium; it’s a
       fairy tale. Forget fusion. Forget our pocketbook; new reactors
       would cost over $13 billion, for which sum we could smother the
       entire country in wind and solar farms. You can’t forget nuclear
       waste by the way. “Wind turbines kill more people than reactors”:
       surely you jest, Mr. Shellenberger. What is going on here is quite
       simple: people who want to continue their overconsuming polluting
       life styles without impediment and at minimum cost. They rightly
       understand that with renewable energy, the vast industrial
       superstructure of capitalism gone rogue WILL have to diminish and
       eventually disappear. To imagine anything else is profoundly
       upsetting to most people, hence their desperate embrace of anyone
       and any opinions that confirms their own biases. What is depressing
       is discovering how many deluded and uneducated members of the
       public refuse to consider the views of anyone who dares to doubt
       the dominant paradigm of untrammeled economic growth and
       consumption. That Quillette chose to publish the rantings of a
       completely
       unqualified promoter of Prosperity rather than a healthy planet is
       commmendable and in keeping with its policy of encouraging free
       speech and dissent. But sadly, this particular piece does not meet
       any honest rational impartial criteria as a credible opinion. The
       BreakThrough gang are raking in millions for heir acquiescence to
       Business as Usual and More So, and their
       contrarian (and unsubstantiated) views. I doubt that any Quillette
       commenters have the integrity to do research on the nuclear issue
       much less actively seek out other opinions than those which make
       them feel comfortable. This is the most depressing thought of all:
       the conformity and lack of interest in actually educating
       themselves. No wonder the world is in trouble.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 2, 2019
            You remind me of those people who come late to a party because
            they’re busy getting drunk beforehand. “Onward to poverty!,”
            cries the drunken socialist as she staggers across the
            threshold.
            Have you ever heard the saying: don’t let the perfect be the
            enemy of the good?
            So long as the logic of strategy applies in geopolitical
            affairs, your dreams of deindustrialization and disarmament
            will remain dreams. Within the inescapable confines of this
            logic, massively proliferating nuclear energy is indispensable
            to the energy system. The alternative is not hippie
            fantasyland; it is environmental wasteland.
   104.
   Dennis Shelton says
          + March 2, 2019
       I retired from the electric power industry in 2004. Everything the
       author says in this article was known then – and before then – but
       no one would listen. I take exception to a misleading statement
       about dying from standing next to a nuclear reactor. This is true
       if you are inside the containment structure, but not if you are
       outside it. I assume the author knows this, but his readers may
       not. Kudos to the author for having and being willing to use the
       bully pulpit. May the rest of the world wake up to the truth about
       energy sources!
          +
        Jonah James says
               o March 4, 2019
            Yes, DS all of this information is a revelation only to the
            previously uncurious or indoctrinated.
   105. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet – NJ Gazette
   106.
   Chuck Berger says
          + March 2, 2019
       A thoughtful and provocative piece, from an author with integrity
       and intelligence. I think his basic insights – that renewable
       energy generation and storage are industrial-scale installations,
       and that reliance on future technological change to fix the
       problems with renewable technologies is a gamble – are well put.
       I do think the critique of renewable, and advocacy of nuclear
       energy, are overstated in some respects.
       – Large wind and solar projects are industrial-scale, and they
       shouldn’t be placed just anywhere. But like anything, there are
       better and worse places, and rigorous site assessment can reduce if
       not eliminate site-specific impacts.
       – Site specific impacts of renewable projects are very real, but
       their overall footprint is still pretty small compared to, say,
       urban growth or forestry or mining projects.
       – Yes, some renewable energy is not available 24/7. (Geothermal and
       hydro generally are suitable baseload.) But this is well-trod
       territory. What is important is grid-wide total availability, and
       often wind and solar are complementary – ie, wind is blowing when
       sun isn’t shining, and vice versa. And solar often peaks when we
       need it most, which is when air conditioning load peaks. Nor are
       fossil fuels or nuclear necessarily completely reliable baseload.
       In Victoria, maintenance on old plant has meant coal generation
       seldom gets anywhere near 100%. Finally, big centralised generation
       is vulnerable – nuclear and coal plants can get knocked out by
       natural disasters for months or years (Fukushima, Victoria
       bushfires), distributed solar and wind much less so.
       – Yes, nuclear energy requires only small quantities of fuel, but
       getting that fuel requires uranium mining. And scaling up nuclear
       would mean more mines, from increasingly lower-quality deposits.
       I’ve seen first hand the impact of uranium mining in Australia’s
       Kakadu national park (including a great many tailing spills over
       the years), and it’s not pretty. I can only imagine what it must be
       like in even worse-regulated jurisdictions in Africa, etc.
       – Battery technology isn’t just pumped hydro. Molten salts are very
       interesting and viable here, as is energy storage via hydrogen
       fuels production for transport use.
       Still, I don’t necessarily disagree with the overall conclusions. I
       do think the author, in his zeal for nuclear energy, has missed an
       opportunity to discuss demand management and energy efficiency
       technologies. Smart grids, better product design, public transport
       investments and other such policies have the opportunity to vastly
       reduce our energy demand without sacrificing quality of life. These
       remain among the best investments, dollar for dollar, in reducing
       pollution.
   107.
   Poor Denn says
          + March 3, 2019
       I enjoyed the article and have wondered what is the plan for
       recycling all these solar panels. Has this even been considered?
   108.
   John F Bramfeld says
          + March 3, 2019
       Enjoy as always a conversion to common sense. The author’s next
       epiphany will be that most of his cohorts are primarily driven not
       by the environment, but by hatred for corporations, technology and
       Western Civilization. Plus him.
   109. Pingback: Links for the Week of March 4th, 2019 – Verywhen
   110.
   Mark says
          + March 3, 2019
       The article is biased towards promoting nuclear energy as evidenced
       by many of the lame arguments about renewables. Extremely poor
       logic.
       In any case, if the U.S. were to embrace some kind of small scale
       nuclear designed for safety and containment with guaranteed waste
       disposal methods, then I would support nuclear. As it is now, the
       nuclear waste just builds up at the sites and I think that is
       untenable.
   111.
   pat childs says
          + March 3, 2019
       Thank you for telling the truth. These grand, silly schemes are
       mere diversions from real environmentalism and species propagation
       and safety.
   112. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet – Quillette |
       Wolsten
   113. Pingback: Bivši član Greenpeacea UNIŠTIO Ocasio-Cortez na Twitteru
       - Konzerva.hr
   114. Pingback: Environmentalist: How Wind & Solar Power Harm the
       Environment – alternativeenergy
   115. Pingback: “Wind and solar power [are] unreliable. Generate energy
       only 10-40% of the year.” – San Gabriel Tutor
   116. Pingback: Delingpole: Trump Is Right – Renewables Are an Expensive
       Joke – REAL News 45
   117. Pingback: Delingpole: Trump Is Right - Renewables Are an Expensive
       Joke | ValuBit
   118. Pingback: Delingpole: Trump Is Right – Renewables Are an Expensive
       Joke
   119. Pingback: Delingpole: Trump Is Right – Renewables Are an Expensive
       Joke – Viral Update News
   120. Pingback: Delingpole: Trump Is Right – Renewables Are an Expensive
       Joke – LocalAd.com News
   121. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet – The winds are
       changing
   122.
   Creature says
          + March 3, 2019
       Briefly skimmed the article. Not a deep read. My thought: The “all
       or nothing” binary framing of “save the planet…or else” around
       energy is narrow, insufficient and “dumbs down” the discussion. I
       am an advocate of the advancement of renewable energy on a broad
       scale because of specific, localized benefits…cleaner air, cleaner
       water, less noise pollution. “Global effects” are externalities.
       Let them happen. I live in Greater Los Angeles. We still battle for
       clean air here (there is still a smog layer). If 100% of
       transportation became electrified…say in the next 50 years…air
       quality would improve substantially…and noise pollution would abate
       substantially. These are positives. Technologically, it is entirely
       feasible and over time, I believe this will happen.
       Finally, to repeat my initial thrust. The “global impact” “debate”
       framework around energy sourcing is…in and of itself…part of the
       problem. Once upon a time, all politics was local. Local solutions
       that meet the specific needs of local communities with demonstrated
       benefits have resonating impact beyond their local domains. More
       intelligent “thought leaders” need to emphasize this line of
       reasoning.
   123.
   Timm John says
          + March 3, 2019
       Was refered to this article by a Breitbart.com article with link in
       it. It’s all coming together now. (Libs even your strongest efforts
       won’t stop this, and is also a total waste of time money and
       energy, ironically enough. eg. Russian collusion)
       Got a letter recently from waste management, need to raise costs,
       (I use energy to make money, gas food etc) because China is the
       biggest buyer of recyclables, and they’re cutting back because of
       trade war. Seems like most my recyclables come from amazon.com…
       Libs will never understand, too emotional/sociopathical.
       But yeah it feels so good to put dirty plastic I mean plastic I
       used a gallon of hot perfect water to clean in the recycle!!!
       Leave lib crazies in the dust, they’re going to stop breeding
       anyways, they’re definitely not stupid.
       I’m the stupid one. I need to keep using my hot perfect water to
       clean of my yogurt cups then pay someone to ship it all the way to
       China so they can either use it as leverage against my country or
       make it into a cheap piece of crap that breaks anyway and becomes
       useless and put back into the Cycle! Absolutely brilliant, plus
       makes me feel good for taking care of the planet and giving jobs to
       another country. Winning!
       PS I got a little sarcastic there.
       PSS we are winning.
   124.
   Timm John says
          + March 3, 2019
       Creature,
       Is the current president of the USA a thought leader?
   125. Pingback: Energy & Environmental Newsletter: March 4, 2019 -
       Master Resource
   126. Pingback: Energy density – we need safe, baseload nuclear power,
       maybe Thorium – Tom Grey – Families, Freedom, Responsibility
   127. Pingback: Birds, Wind Turbines & Nuclear Power | Big Picture News,
       Informed Analysis
   128. Pingback: Is There a Role for Renewables? | NeuroLogica Blog
   129.
   Jety says
          + March 4, 2019
       “The most important thing is for scientists and conservationists to
       start telling the truth about renewables and nuclear.”
       Scientists have lost credibility because they have been lying. Good
       luck getting it back.
   130. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet – Doug Santo
   131.
   Kevin says
          + March 4, 2019
       So, some dude spends his entire life fighting everything rational
       in the power generation world, and pushing everything irrational.
       Then, he wakes up at the eleventh hour and realizes that what he
       believed was wrong.
       The damage is already done; it will never be undone. Like the name
       given name Adolf, or the surname Hitler, very rare to see those
       names because of one guy 100 years ago. Like the guy who built
       Greenpeace but went apostate, the humanity killing machine has been
       set loose on auto pilot. Al Gore will never stop using private
       jets, or stop using the electricity of an entire city to power his
       lifestyle, while hectoring the rest of us to go back to subsistence
       farming and use less.
       The world is run by people like this guy used to be. People who do
       not believe the cost of diesel has anything to do with the price of
       bread or milk; it just comes from the grocery store. People who
       push things like diesel exhaust fluid, that is now killing all the
       plants in all the ditches beside every road in the world.
       THERE IS NO SUCH THING AS RENEWABLE POWER; THERE ARE RELIABLES, AND
       UNRELIABLES. Choose. Reliables make energy cheap, plentiful, and
       reliable; Unreliables do the opposite, make energy expensive,
       scarce, and unreliable.
          +
        Jonah James says
               o March 4, 2019
            TRUTH
   132.
   Geoffrey Pounder says
          + March 4, 2019
       Shellenberger’s essay is highly problematic. Disorganized and not
       well-thought out. He circles around again and again to the same
       issues.
       Many of his claims are unsubstantiated. He frequently fails to cite
       his sources.
       When he does cite sources, he frequently links to articles he’s
       written himself. Citing oneself as an authority is a definite
       no-no. Or he cites articles from his own foundation’s website. Or
       he cites op-eds, like his, from Forbes magazine. Peer-reviewed
       articles from authoritative science journals, not so much.
       For people/communities not connected to the grid, nuclear isn’t an
       option. Renewables are the best option.
       If you have a roof, putting a solar panel on it doesn’t take up any
       extra space.
       All-or-nothing thinking. Renewables don’t have to replace
       conventional energy sources 100% overnight to be useful. It’s going
       to be a gradual transition as the technology continues to improve
       and fall in price.
       Who says we have to build solar farms in wildlife habitat? Why not
       in already developed or degraded areas (brownfield land)?
       Are we really running out of room for renewables?
       Yet we have seemingly endless space for urban sprawl, industrial
       parks, shopping malls, hotels, big box store megacomplexes, golf
       courses, all sorts of frivolous things… Funny, Shellenberger
       doesn’t complain about them.
       Costs savings in renewables are not “one-time”. Prices continue to
       fall thanks to scale of production and efficiencies.
       Shellenberger cherry-picks his examples. Other jurisdictions are
       introducing renewables much more cheaply than early pioneers.
       Does Shellenberger have a cell phone? TV? Computer? A car? Does he
       worry about e-waste from the consumer items he likes to use? Or
       only about e-waste from renewables?
       Lots of iffy claims, too many to enumerate here.
       Just because Shellenberger makes a claim doesn’t make it the gospel
       truth. Readers should be skeptical.
   133.
   David Ferguson (@dferg) says
          + March 4, 2019
       FTA: “It’s not so much about the fuel as the process.”
       Similarly, it is not about sustainability as political control.
       This author will be attacked from the left.
   134. Pingback: About That Renewable Energy… | Innocent Bystanders
   135. Pingback: Renewables | Transterrestrial Musings
   136.
   Jackson Howard says
          + March 4, 2019
       The OP is very slanted I find, relying on self-references and
       sloppy arguments.
       Yes, renewables are intermittent and have large footprints due to
       their low energy density.
       That is known, but if we have room for mega-malls and urban sprawl,
       finding space for it shouldn’t be that hard. However on a continent
       scale (i.e. US, EU or China scale), wind an solar get a lot of
       smoothing in their output. Pumped hydro storage is a thing and can
       be retrofitted. It is most likely possible to make low energy
       density iron based battery storage, or molten salt. Solar is
       closing to 30% efficiency and costs are going down. Only downside
       is that the entire industry is chinese by now. Best of luck
       catching up when the administration is hell bent on reviving dead
       beat coal.
       On the other hand, nuclear is rather reliable and safe, but
       fragile. Fukushima is a good example of what can go wrong when a
       sea side NPP gets hit by a natural disaster. Also, nuclear is
       expensive even before cleanup provisions are even accounted for.
       So, if you have it already (France) you should keep it running, but
       building more of it ? I’m really not sure if it’s the best bang for
       the buck.
       Plus the political opposition will make sure that this is just not
       going to happen (in the EU). The only place where I can see it
       happening is China and India.
       Large scale nuclear would likely be limited by the availability of
       uranium, which means that large scale would require Pu or Th
       breeder designs, none of which are even close to be commercially
       competitive (while being overly complex).
       I can only recommend the David McKay book on renewables as it’s
       well researched and structured. Unlike the OP piece.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 8, 2019
            The McKay book is excellent, but I don’t see where
            Schellenberger conflicts with McKay. The main point of that
            book was that renewables were insufficient to power densely
            populated regions (like the UK).
            Also: we are in no danger of running out of uranium in the
            next few centuries even if the whole world replicated the
            nuclear-heavy French grid. It is only in the very long run
            that breeder reactors would become necessary (assuming we
            still relied on fission in 300 years). In the meantime,
            fission is the only guaranteed energy source that could
            eliminate carbon emissions. The other energy options are
            gambles in that respect.
   137. Pingback: Trump Is Right – Renewables Are An Expensive Joke –
       Menopausal Mother Nature
   138. Pingback: Responding to the Green New Deal: Don’t Stop Short |
       Raymond Castleberry Blog
   139.
   BeamMeUp says
          + March 4, 2019
       Natural gas has been eating up the energy market for the past
       several years since fracking has made it much more abundant. It’s
       gutted the demand for coal and has been eating away at the demand
       for nuclear energy. This has led to the closing down of the last
       remaining reactor at Three Mile Island and the cancellation of two
       nuclear plants in South Carolina. For nuclear energy to compete
       with natural gas, it needs less expensive and safer technology.
       We’re not going to give up our standards of living or our desire to
       improve them, neither the people of the U.S. or the rest of the
       world. We’ll always need energy that meets our demands. Renewables
       will never be able to completely meet our energy demands,
       especially with the resources and expenses involved.
   140.
   Jackson Howard says
          + March 4, 2019
       Two things :
       – fracking nets of a lot of nat gas, but the wells and fields also
       decline much faster than more conventional source while costing
       more to opperate. It makes nat gas cheap from the supply glut, but
       fracking has yet to prove profitable beyond inflated stock prices.
       Once the fields will go in decline, that glut will vanish real
       fast.
       – if we get to +4°C, a lot of the US will not be able to retain its
       living standards. It seems you mean : we don’t want to give up our
       standards right now, we’d rather defer the costs and externalities
       to the suckers that come next.
       To be clear my bet is that nat gas will have an interesting stopgap
       role in a renewable focused energy mix.
   141.
   zenman says
          + March 4, 2019
       “you can’t make the sun shine more regularly”
       you can in space, where those solar panels would soak up the rays
       100% of time
          +
        Justin D says
               o March 4, 2019
            How do you transmit the energy down to earth? The costs of
            transmission lines on earth is enough. Nevermind the miles of
            line to get to space. Then upkeep/replacement. And the sun
            would not shine on these panels all the time as they would
            have to be in a geosynchronous orbit. Or you are back to
            transmitting power without power lines aka a cordless
            extension cord.
   142.
   Jonah James says
          + March 4, 2019
       Bravo to the author. This is an excellent and clearly written
       article about the practical failure of large-scale wind and solar
       and the obvious nuclear power option. I recommend “Power Hungry” by
       Robert Bryce. It simply and clearly explains the concept of power
       density in electricity generation. If you don’t understand this
       concept, you cannot intelligently discuss options for electricity
       generation. This book was published in 2011. If the author would
       have read this book, or one of many similar books written before
       and after, he could have saved himself a lot of time.
       Now, if only we could get people to read books skeptical of
       catastrophic man-made global warming. If the environmental movement
       was about species preservation and clean air and water, it would
       have nearly universal support. Instead, it has moved to apocalypse
       mongering for the purpose of assuming political control. Using fear
       to strip freedom is not a new tactic. Environmentalism long ago
       became more like a religious cult or totalitarian political
       movement than a scientific pursuit.
   143. Pingback: "Just livin' in this world" AOC needs to clean her room
       - Crowhill Report | Crowhill Report
   144.
   Michael Rath says
          + March 4, 2019
       Outstanding article. It took real balls for the author to step out
       and state the obvious. Kudo’s!
   145.
   rstein171 says
          + March 4, 2019
       Astoundingly with all the world’s efforts to protect life, in the
       United States, wind farms are “legally” killing hundreds of
       thousands of birds, eagles, hawks, and bats every year, and it’s
       appalling that society has given the wind farm industry a FREE
       get-out-of-jail card!
       In 2017, the former President Obamas’ administration finalized a
       rule that lets wind-energy companies operate high-speed turbines
       for up to 30 years — even if means killing or injuring thousands of
       federally protected species anymore that are protected under the
       Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act and the Migratory Bird Treaty
       Act. Under the new rule, wind farms may acquire an eagle “take”
       permit from the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS) that allows
       the site to participate in nationwide killing of up to 4,200 bald
       eagles annually, under incidental “take” permits without
       compensatory mitigation. It’s shocking that wind farms can legally
       obtain permits from the USFWS to kill those majestic bald eagles.
   146.
   Gordon Miller says
          + March 4, 2019
       Mr. Schellenberger, congratulations. You’re half way there. You
       learned about more viable options, but you have obviously not dug
       below the headlines on the impact of man’s CO2 emissions on
       climate. It’s between negligible and zero according to all the
       leading climate experts NOT FUNDED BY ACTIVIST NGOs or GOVERNMENT.
       You still need to get past the politics. Nevertheless, I commend
       you for your other environmental pursuits.
   147.
   gamma57721 says
          + March 4, 2019
       “Despite what you’ve heard, there is no “battery revolution” on the
       way, for well-understood technical and economic reasons.”
       Nonsense. And here is one example why: (
       https://www.nature.com/articles/nenergy2017125/figures/1 ) This
       learning curve is analogous to photovoltaics (a.k.a. PV) and the
       drop in PV costs have been dramatic.
       Also, ignore the nonsense about a Cobalt shortage. The periodic
       table has many other transition metal that also form oxygenated
       compounds. If the cost of Cobalt remains too high for too long then
       replacements (Manganese, Vanadium, etc.) will be developed.
       The story about the desert tortoises is misleading. That was not PV
       but rather concentrated solar power (a.k.a. CSP). CSP has failed in
       the marketplace due to the rapid drop in the costs of PV and the
       very environmental concerns described.
       I’m not going to comment on the issue of wind turbines and bird/bat
       kills. Although I suspect that climate change will push those
       species, and many others as well, towards extinction much faster.
          +
        gamma57721 says
               o March 4, 2019
            Sigh. More fission Utopianism with the usual collection of
            miraculous claims and the complete absence of any way to deal
            with the waste. No one wants the waste. No one is going to
            want the waste. Leaving the spent fuel one site (i.e. at the
            site of the reactor) only dumps the problem on future
            generations.
            How about using the nuclear energy stored in the Earth’s core
            for baseload? Because geothermal and the sun are ultimately
            the only two sources of energy this planet has.
   148.
   P Haeberlen says
          + March 5, 2019
       Mr. Shellenberger has not learned his lesson. The problems with
       renewables that he discovered were known in advance. The
       opportunity offered by nuclear power was know in advance. Hoping
       for new technology to save your plan is not a good strategy. Now he
       wants to go full steam ahead.
   149.
   Gerry Vassi says
          + March 5, 2019
       Wouldn’t it be nice to fill up your car once a year with a small
       pellet of uranium.
          +
        grlcowan says
               o March 5, 2019
            Uranium-fuelled cars would have to be somewhat larger than
            submarines. They would be fuelled once, at the factory, not by
            users.
   150. Pingback: Energy And Environmental Newsletter – March 4th 2019 |
       PA Pundits - International
   151. Pingback: НЭ #4 – Кто такой Climate Hawk? – #NKFRV
   152.
   O.Lande says
          + March 5, 2019
       My comments would be (when thinking of US and not only California):
       “…Electricity from solar roofs costs about twice as much…”
       Well prices are falling, and will fall further, not a big worry
       “…..solar and wind farms require huge amounts of land”
       That is why Solar power in the US should be focused on using the
       deserts (in addition to solar roofs . Wind farms and animal farms
       can live together as they do today.
       “…wind farms require long new transmissions lines”
       The same does new Nuclear power or all types of large centralized
       power stations. Actually desentralised solar and wind farms farms
       is better wrt size of transmission lines….
       “….preserve wildlife, particularly birds.”
       That is why the future of cheap wind power is hughe offshore farms.
       Less birds to be hit offshore. The largest windmill is now 12 MW,
       but that one cannot be placed onshore (too large wings for land
       road transport). Actually in a desert a solar farm would provide
       shadow that could make the desert a little greener.
       “…intermittent nature of solar and wind energies”
       Firstly we have just started on the road to cheap grid storage. A
       hughe amount of investment is poured into grid energy storage. I’m
       sure we will get cheap storage systems that will be part of the
       solution. Another solution will be to have a mixture of biofuel and
       natural gas fired turbines as backup when needed. And the point
       being is that there is still a large amount of coal fired plants
       around that should be shut down. But before that can be done we
       need the alternatives in place. (I believe Australia have shut down
       some coal plants a little too early..)
       “those one-time cost savings from making them in big Chinese
       factories”
       Well, that’s a wrong fact. Solar power cost reductions have
       continued for decades and still continues, it is not a short
       “one-time” effort.
       “…high cost of dealing with their unreliability”
       The capacity factors in desert areas may be as high as 30%, and in
       those areas you know when the sun rises and when the sun sets, so
       you can plan for when nuclear and other plants need tp ramp up
       production. Not unreliable.
       And concluding rate increase is caused by renewables is too easy,
       there are many factors at play. Taxes are one, The amount of actual
       consumption is another, the age of the grid that may need upgrades
       are a third and so on.
       “France produces one-tenth the carbon emissions per unit of
       electricity as Germany and pays little more than half for its
       electricity.”
       Which is not correct. Electricity whole price in France is higher
       than in Germany. But Germany has higher taxes than France.
       I think I stop there, too many inaccuriacies in this article to
       correct them all
          +
        Craken says
               o March 8, 2019
            You claim he has “too many inaccuracies” in the article.
            But, you (accurately) pointed out only one inaccuracy: that
            the recent drop in solar prices is a one time effect of
            switching to Chinese factories.
            I’ll take that as a tacit admission that you also support a
            nuclear revival.
   153.
   pjbluehostwp says
          + March 5, 2019
       Thank you Michael for the article and for your intellectual
       honesty!
       If you havn’t read it yet, please check out the book “The Moral
       Case for Fossil Fuels” by Alex Epstein.
   154.
   PauL Kelly says
          + March 5, 2019
       I think your fighting global warming on the wrong end. You should
       try to lower emission from factory and vehicle. Try planting trees
       etc plant that want a lot of co2 to grow. One thing to a lot of oil
       go into make solar panels and wind mills.
   155.
   Ned2 says
          + March 5, 2019
       I like numbers!
       Numbers state that all 8 billion of the worlds population could
       live quite comfortably in the state of Texas, and that they would
       enjoy over twice the amount of space people currently enjoy in
       NYC…..at night.
       Extrapolating the numbers relating to total land mass in the world,
       that means that our planet could quite easily support………..wait for
       it… over 1,700 billion people. Over 200 times the current
       population of the world.
       Overpopulation, global warming, climate change, peak oil, and
       fairies are all crackpot theorem, so act accordingly.
       Wind turbines and solar farms are destroying the environment.
   156.
   Brian H. says
          + March 5, 2019
       I’ve been on a lot of wind farms over the last 10-15 years. I have
       yet to see the bird massacre you speak of. In fact, I have never
       seen one dead bird below or near any of the wind turbines I have
       been to, in California, Minnesota, Iowa, Texas, New Mexico. I’m
       still thinking those cats, and office building and home windows,
       for that matter, are killing a lot more birds. I also think you are
       mistaken about storage. Economic energy storage has always been the
       Holy Grail of renewables. If we are not there yet, we are on the
       cusp. Just watch.
          +
        Jackson Howard says
               o March 6, 2019
            As far as birds are concerned the big killers are
            1) Cats
            2) Cars
            For wind power to become #3 it would take quite a hefty amount
            of it. But it’s a environment concerned sounding bad-faith
            argument, so you get it a lot.
            Renewables require energy storage, yes. But not as much as one
            thinks. For Germany run on 100% renewable, the storage
            capacity needs to be around 8-10%.
            Cheapest storage is pumped hydro.
            @Doug
            As far as decommissioning Oil & Gas infrastructures once they
            go down, my bet is on the true & tested strategy used by the
            mining industry : scamper off with the profits and let the
            taxpayer clean up.
               o
             Jay Salhi says
                    # March 11, 2019
                 “Renewables require energy storage, yes. But not as much
                 as one thinks. For Germany run on 100% renewable, the
                 storage capacity needs to be around 8-10%.”
                 Nonsense.
                 http://euanmearns.com/the-cost-of-wind-solar-power-batter
                 ies-included/
   157.
   Doug Leyendecker says
          + March 5, 2019
       One thing no one seems to have taken into consideration. If we
       “destroy” the oil & gas industry then who is going to pay to
       decommission the trillions of dollars that infrastructure has in
       place?
       It certainly won’t be Exxon or Shell or Chevron since those
       companies will be bankrupt.
       So, who is going to pay? The government? The tax payers? The new
       nuclear and renewable companies?
       Where are the hundreds of billions and maybe trillions of dollars
       going to come from to dismantle and decommission this
       infrastructure…thousands of wells, millions of miles of pipelines,
       refineries, storage and other processing assets? Is it going to
       come from the “savings” we get from nuclear and renewables?
       If this infrastructure is not properly maintained, dismantled and
       decommissioned then in short order it is going to create one
       enormous environmental problem.
       Be careful what you wish for because you just might get it.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 8, 2019
            A certain percentage of that infrastructure is decommissioned
            every year; the rate may accelerate but the basic process will
            continue until the end. The oil companies, if they’re smart,
            will diversify into growth businesses and will therefore be
            able to pay the decom costs.
   158.
   Richard Harding says
          + March 5, 2019
       Michael – aside from the fact that the panels will eventually need
       to be dealt with, is there any compelling reason for a homeowner to
       not choose solar power for your home?
   159.
   Bob Houten says
          + March 5, 2019
       It’s great that this author has come these insights. A little
       attention to science would have spared him hard lessons and would
       have spared our country many billions of dollars going down the
       various rabbit holes of so-called alternative energy. As for me, I
       love coal, natural gas and oil. Without these things available to
       our society, we will soon be living in very primitive conditions.
       In fact, a great many of us will be dead. The scary thing, of
       course, is that many our self-professed elites would think this a
       good thing.
          +
        binra says
               o March 6, 2019
            Energy cartels – extended to these very ‘elites’ – it isn’t
            just the what of it but the way of it.
            Look up nujol – and rockefeller – wont take long to find.
            Dependency of corporate commodity means you are an asset – and
            a disposable one at that.
            All of us will be dead – insofar as the body does not
            ‘survive’ a certain term.
            Much cleaner use of so called fossil fuel is do-able with
            political willingness – as are many other solutions currently
            choked back.
            Renewables work best as part of community solutions – not
            centralised profiteering (and top-down leverage).
   160.
   John Preston says
          + March 6, 2019
       Yeah, nah.
       Simple question: what do we want? Do we WANT the issues associated
       with nuclear (waste, decommissioning costs, etc)?
       As to how renewables won’t be enough. The author fails to
       appreciate the immense space available around the world available
       for solar.
       Calculations have been done (about 10 years ago – see
       landartgenerator) as to the amount of solar panels required to
       power the whole world.
       An area less than half that of South Australia (the top, desert
       half) could power the whole planet, replacing ALL nuclear, gas,
       coal, oil, wind, thermal and hydro. Pump in sea water, pump out
       gazillions of tons of synthetic fuel, hydrogen, whatever.
       Done. Next.
          +
        Ftrftr Nd says
               o March 8, 2019
            “An area less than half that of South Australia (the top,
            desert half) could power the whole planet, replacing ALL
            nuclear, gas, coal, oil, wind, thermal and hydro. Pump in sea
            water, pump out gazillions of tons of synthetic fuel,
            hydrogen, whatever.”
            And all for the low, low price of 57 trillion dollars! Don’t
            delay, operators are standing by, call NOW!
            “Done. Next.”
            Sounds great. So when exactly will you be writing the check to
            pay for all this?
               o
             John Preston says
                    # March 9, 2019
                 The article focused on environmental issues, and on that
                 basis how nuclear was the answer — using the top half of
                 South Australia would not cause huge environmental issues
                 (there’s basically no one there).
                 If you think nuclear is cheaper than renewables, please
                 go directly to the UK and tell them how to build Hinkley
                 Point C on budget on time.
                 Yeah, thought so.
                 next.
                    #
                  Ftrftr Nd says
                         @ March 9, 2019
                      “The article focused on environmental issues, and on
                      that basis how nuclear was the answer”
                      And your response asserted that solar could easily
                      replace ALL energy usage on the planet. Which is
                      economically insane, as I pointed out.
                      “using the top half of South Australia would not
                      cause huge environmental issues (there’s basically
                      no one there).”
                      Um, you’re forgetting about aborigines.
                      https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aboriginal_peoples_of_
                      South_Australia
                      You’re going to kick them out of their ancestral
                      homeland to fulfill your eco-fantasies?
                      Good luck with that.
                      “If you think nuclear is cheaper than renewables,
                      please go directly to the UK and tell them how to
                      build Hinkley Point C on budget on time.”
                      I didn’t mention anything about the relative cost of
                      nuclear vs. renewables. Here’s what I did say: that
                      contrary to your assertions of simplicity, your
                      South Australian solar plan would cost
                      multi-trillions of dollars, which doesn’t even
                      include the astronomical cost of pumping millions of
                      gallons of seawater hundreds of miles to interior of
                      Australia.
                      And rather than defend your own statements, you’re
                      trying to change the subject.
                      Unsurprising.
                         @
                       John Preston says
                              - March 10, 2019
                           “I didn’t mention anything about the relative
                           cost of nuclear vs. renewables. ”
                           Yeah, right. And that’s because if solar would
                           cost multi-trillions, nuclear given its much
                           higher per MWh cost would be multi sextillions,
                           As to land use, you appear unfamiliar with
                           Australia — aboriginal permission is negotiated
                           for use of their land. You may be unaware that
                           mining occurs in Australia, on Aboriginal land.
                           And SA was only one example, amid the 26,000
                           kms of coastline, most of which is uninhabited.
                           There’s also Morocco which is starting to build
                           solar power for export.
                           “your response asserted that solar could easily
                           replace ALL energy” I quoted others who have
                           calculated the energy required to do that.
                           https://landartgenerator.org/blagi/archives/127
                           Your reply is incoherent. Dismissed.
                         @
                       Ftrftr Nd says
                              - March 10, 2019
                           “Yeah, right. And that’s because if solar would
                           cost multi-trillions, nuclear given its much
                           higher per MWh cost would be multi
                           sextillions,”
                           Um, what? Unlike you, I’m not proposing to
                           replace all worldwide energy usage with
                           nuclear. So you’re attacking an argument no
                           one’s making. Stay on-topic, please
                           “As to land use, you appear unfamiliar with
                           Australia — aboriginal permission is negotiated
                           for use of their land. You may be unaware that
                           mining occurs in Australia, on Aboriginal
                           land.”
                           Unlike your solar fantasy, a mine doesn’t
                           require every square inch of the top half of
                           South Australia to operate. Your solar panels
                           would forcibly relocate thousands of aboriginal
                           people hundreds of miles from their homeland
                           FOREVER, and your hand-waving about
                           ‘negotiation’ is just code for additional costs
                           to add to the 57 trillion-dollar bill for this
                           boondoggle, which doesn’t include the price of
                           massive seawater pumps, piping, and motors
                           (which will shut down as soon as the sun sets,
                           since they’re solar-powered too). Or the price
                           of new electrical transmission lines to get all
                           that juice from SA to the rest of the earth. Or
                           the price of storage required to power the half
                           of earth that’s constantly receiving 0%
                           sunlight.
                           “I quoted others who have calculated the energy
                           required to do that.”
                           Your source doesn’t contain one word about how
                           much it would all cost.
                           Which I provided, and you promptly ignored,
                           since you can’t dispute it.
                           “Your reply is incoherent. Dismissed.”
                           Says the poster who thinks we can fly Boeing
                           747 airplanes on solar electricity.
                           Okie-dokie, Mr. Coherent.
   161. Pingback: Green New Dealers Reject Nuclear Energy – USA All
       Americans NEWS™
   162.
   dirk says
          + March 6, 2019
       I wonder whether this thread will reach the 600, as was the case
       with that on education and naughty students of a week ago, Public
       Education’s……. So, education is more relevant as environment is,
       quickly judged.
   163.
   binra says
          + March 6, 2019
       The top down story that has been pushed and targeted to a top-down
       displacement of environmental guilt, as a triggerring of
       apocalyptic fear and thus a rabid override of reason to sacrificial
       archetypes of averting or appeasing terror – ENACTS the destruction
       it purports to avoid by giving power to fear and the manipulators
       of it – who generate conflict and fear (and environmental toxins)
       by pushing private agenda over and at expense of wholeness of
       being.
       Real science is therefore as welcome as truth in a war that seeks
       only to technologise, weaponise and marketise everything to serve
       such an agenda.
       The submission of the will to a mind-cartel of supposed experts is
       the nature of a technocracy that is wielded by top-down ‘power’ of
       a corrupted institutionalism – in terms of law, governance and
       finance, media information and education, scientific and medical
       regulation and accreditation.
       “Everything is BACKWARDS; everything is upside down! Doctors
       destroy health, Lawyers destroy justice, Universities destroy
       knowledge, Governments destroy freedom, Major media destroys
       information, And religions destroy spirituality”. Michael Ellner
       AS for Unclear power – the story of radioactivity (originally
       believed a panacea), is one of the terror symbols of our age – and
       is directly associated with police states into perpetuity.
       In fact a lot of ‘radioactive waste’ gets dumped after due process
       of perception management has been carried out.
       Fukushima polluting the Pacific – what is that?
       Chernobyl – wildlife has NOT mutated.
       Hiroshima radiation survivors died only about months to a year
       earlier than a control group – what does that say?
       The nature of top down power is the enforcing of dependency via
       controlled scarcity in necessaries such as energy, food and water –
       and the already energy cartel seeks to upgrade by shifting to an
       energy currency based on ‘carbon guilt’ or original sin with state
       allowed dispensations subject to carbon and social credit rating –
       realtime on the IoT (Internet of Rings).
       CO2 is healthgiving and trending is low in my opinion – so welcome
       a rise in CO2 and ignore its demonisation by ‘consensual top-down
       politics’, but focus on transparency and accountability for
       corporate-caused pollution, degradation and disease (toxicity and
       alienation under coercive threat both set up the terrain of disease
       conditions).
       Outsourcing of guilt is a lie. Trading in guilt is a further
       uncovering of the Beast of trading in toxic debt.
       Waking from conformity and compliance under key opinion ‘experts’
       or other influence – is breaking the capacity of a system that
       stunts or buries scientific developments that do not serve the
       ‘established economic and political model’.
       i have no doubt that much of our energy is wasted and used to make
       us weak and toxic, while the means for clean energy are not
       unavailable – excepting for political reasons – that may also
       include a gross lack of responsibility for balancing our freedoms
       and responsibilities. This can be applied to both corps and its
       consumed base, but the opening of the life denying canopy to allow
       micro-economic activity to renew the soil out of which a more
       diverse human cultural expression would hold real charge across a
       spectrum of consciousness – instead of the enforced ‘multicultural’
       state-corporate flatland.
   164.
   Matt says
          + March 6, 2019
       It’s a pity that Quillette is rapidly turning into the Cato
       Institute light, giving a forum to crackpots like Michael
       Shellenberger.
       Shellenberg has a long track record of endorsing impractical energy
       solutions as miracle panacea, for example shale oil, despite the
       BLM declaring “there are no economically viable ways yet known to
       extract and process oil shale for commercial purposes.” His vanity
       gubernatorial campaign garnered less than 0.4% of the vote, not
       surprising considering his platform was filled with bizarre
       proposals and grandiose, pipe-dream schemes. His one-man
       ‘institute’ blurts out fantasy tech ‘solutions’ straight out of
       Popular Mechanics.
       Shellenberg’s obsession with nuclear energy approaches the level of
       a paraphilia for, in addition to grossly understating the economic,
       logistical, and environmental problems of nuclear power plants, he
       also advocates complete nuclear weapons proliferation.
       In this article, Shellenberg repeats the same hackneyed and idiotic
       tropes against renewable energy. Lamenting “you can’t make the sun
       shine more regularly or the wind blow more reliably”, while
       mentioning “one solution” — “to convert California’s dams into big
       batteries” — he: 1) fatuously ignores that solar can meet the bulk
       of peak-hour power consumption; while 2) intentionally selects a
       far-fetched proposal (dams as batteries) to evade mentioning a
       proven solution, molten salt storage, which has been successfully
       employed in scale for over a decade, most notably in Spain.
       Regarding wind, he choses not to recognize that wind farm sites are
       selected precisely for their steady winds, or that a country like
       Denmark, which relies heavily on wind, has experienced no fatal
       reliability issues, and in fact at times wind generates energy that
       exceeds the entire nation’s needs.
       Another specious critique is that “solar and wind farms require
       huge amounts of land.” In truth, the entire US electrical usage
       could be met by 500 square miles of photovoltaics. (This excludes
       the potential of large-scale solar-thermal plants.) Where, oh,
       where, Michael, are we to find those “huge amounts” of acreage? On
       rooftops, of course. Recently, MIT successfully powered in full one
       of its buildings with PV rooftop panels. If Shellenberg rejects the
       technological innovation of MIT, what, non-nuclear solution will
       meet his approval?
       Shellenberg shares his epiphany that “no amount of technological
       innovation … could solve the fundamental problem with renewables”,
       apparently because “solar and wind farms require long new
       transmissions lines”. Somehow it did not dawn on him that upgrading
       our aging power infrastructure is but a public works project
       requiring no innovations whatsoever.
       When Shellenberg attributes steady lowering of PV costs to
       “one-time cost savings from making them in big Chinese factories”,
       he is just flat out lying.
       I appreciate Quillette’s commitment to providing a platform for
       thoughtful discourse from a range of perspectives. But
       pseudo-science nonsense from certifiable crackpots does not pass
       muster.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 8, 2019
            This statement of yours is a lie–and it’s not even within 2
            orders of magnitude:
            “In truth, the entire US electrical usage could be met by 500
            square miles of photovoltaics.”
            The best estimate is more like 200,000 square miles:
            http://iopscience.iop.org/article/10.1088/1748-9326/aae102
            I will not waste time with the rest of your comment: all lies
            and innuendo.
               o
             Matt says
                    # March 8, 2019
                 You deniers sure do loving picking cherries!
                 A confirmation of the figure I cite here:
                 https://blogs.ucl.ac.uk/energy/2015/05/21/fact-checking-e
                 lon-musks-blue-square-how-much-solar-to-power-the-us/
                 Estimates do vary, but the bottom line is that more than
                 ample area exists to install all the PV required to meet
                 our electric consumption. Shellenberger’s objection based
                 on lack of space fails.
                    #
                  Ftrftr Nd says
                         @ March 9, 2019
                      “Estimates do vary, but the bottom line is that more
                      than ample area exists to install all the PV
                      required to meet our electric consumption. ”
                      Until the sun sets. But hey, how often does that
                      happen?
                         @
                       Matt says
                              - March 9, 2019
                           Maybe one day scientists will discover a way to
                           store electricity.
                         @
                       Ftrftr Nd says
                              - March 10, 2019
                           “Maybe one day scientists will discover a way
                           to store electricity.”
                           There isn’t a way to do so on a state- or
                           country-sized scale currently. And it would
                           cost trillions of dollars to develop and
                           install grid-sized batteries if the technology
                           ever became feasible.
                           Which is unnecessary, since we already have
                           energy sources that can ramp up and down in
                           response to demand.
                           Namely, fossil fuels.
   165.
   Matt says
          + March 6, 2019
       Regarding birds killed by wind turbines, Shellenberg firstly cherry
       picks a high outlier figure, 1 million p/a, when the U.S.
       Geological Survey estimates c. 367,000. He goes on to claim that
       unlike house cats, “[w]hat kills big, threatened, and endangered
       birds—birds that could go extinct—like hawks, eagles, owls, and
       condors, are wind turbines”. He neglects to mention that cell
       towers (6.7 million total) also kill those species as well, much
       less lament the ‘impracticality’ of cell phones and the return to
       phone booths. Shellenberg also ignores that those ‘big, threatened,
       endangered birds’ he professes such concern for stand to lose c.
       95% of their remaining habitat range due to climate change.
       When he gushes that “[t]he rapidly spinning turbines act like an
       apex predator which big birds never evolved to deal with” — while
       conveniently omitting any supporting research — he exposes his
       gross misunderstanding of natural selection while further
       establishing his pseudo-scientific credentials.
          +
        Craken says
               o March 8, 2019
            There are only about 200,000 cell towers in America. Natural
            selection can select species out of existence–and often does.
            He is pushing nuclear as the only clear way to prevent climate
            change/habitat destruction.
            In other words, your comment is mendacious.
               o
             Matt says
                    # March 8, 2019
                 The figure cited for bird deaths caused by cell towers is
                 not in dispute.
                 Natural Selection does not work in the way Shellenberger
                 imagines it, which is likely why he cites no evolutionary
                 biologists to support his assertion. To understand why
                 his scenario is so preposterous, I suggest both you and
                 he read Peter Grant’s Ecology and Evolution of Darwin’s
                 Finches, describing a multi-decade, longitudinal study of
                 that species’ response to changes in environmental
                 pressure.
                 In any case, Shellenberger’s professed concern for
                 predator avians is transparently insincere given his
                 abject disregard for greater threats to their existence;
                 it is rather a mere excuse to indulge in his fetish with
                 nuclear.
   166.
   Bucc Leuch says
          + March 7, 2019
       A great advert for the nuclear industry and the further
       despoliation of the planet with nuclear wast for thousands of
       years. (If responding, please indicate how close you are willing to
       be to a nuclear waste dump)
       Strange no one seems to have mentioned the most powerful form of
       energy on the planet, namely the daily movement of billions of tons
       of water with the rising and falling of the oceanic tides.
       Perhaps that is just an inconvenient truth!
          +
        Ftrftr Nd says
               o March 10, 2019
            “Strange no one seems to have mentioned the most powerful form
            of energy on the planet, namely the daily movement of billions
            of tons of water with the rising and falling of the oceanic
            tides.”
            If tidal were cheap and feasible, we’d already be using it in
            significant quantities. But it’s far more expensive than
            fossil fuels on a per-MWh basis.
   167. Pingback: With Ethanol And Biomass No Longer Viewed As “Green,”
       Will Other Renewables Soon Follow? | SPOT TIMES
   168. Pingback: With Ethanol And Biomass No Longer Viewed As “Green,”
       Will Other Renewables Soon Follow? | Capmocracy.com
   169. Pingback: Deconstructing The Green New Deal - The Daily Coin
   170. Pingback: With Ethanol And Biomass No Longer Viewed As 'Green,'
       Will Other Renewables Soon Follow? - FreeMedia24
   171. Pingback: Spotlight on green news & views: ‘The Uninhabitable
       Earth’; Tesla price cut irks some owners | Direct Path News
   172. Pingback: Spotlight on green news & views: 'The Uninhabitable
       Earth'; Tesla price cut irks some owners – Headlines
   173.
   Petr says
          + March 9, 2019
       good article but Dan lost me when he said that using Dams for
       batteries didn’t work as the demand for water is high. Pump storage
       doesn’t use up water it just pumps it up then lets it back down
       again. If Dan’s grasp of physics is that bad how can one believe
       the rest of the article.
   174.
   Jayashree Satvalli says
          + March 10, 2019
       How did the erudite author, so passionate about the environment,
       coviniently leave out Animal Farms and breeding centres as a major
       contibutor to global warming in terms of green gas emissions? The
       huge amount of food that is fed to the countless billions of farm
       animals which take up millions of billions of hectares? Because he
       doesn’t believe in it? Or does not want to be a part of the
       awakened world which knows that Veganism is a good and sensible
       option for the world to start healing?
   175. Pingback: Sunday Reading 03/10/19 | Romick in Oakley
   176.
   Joe says
          + March 10, 2019
       Nice advert from the atomic energy lobby.
   177.
   Andrew Coffey says
          + March 11, 2019
       Isn’t this why we are not progressing new nuclear projects?
       https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018-11-08/wind-and-solar-c
       osts-keep-falling-squeezing-nuke-coal-plants
          +
        John Preston says
               o March 11, 2019
            @Andrew
            Thanks for the link, confirming this article (by
            Shellenberger) is plain nonsense. As I’ve posted above, the
            arithmetic has been done to show solar alone (if it were
            necessary) could power the whole planet (without all that much
            land being used). And that’s before we use wind, geothermal,
            tidal, hydro.
               o
             Ftrftr Nd says
                    # March 12, 2019
                 “As I’ve posted above, the arithmetic has been done to
                 show solar alone (if it were necessary) could power the
                 whole planet”
                 And as you’ve ignored above, the arithmetic has also been
                 done to calculate the cost of it all, and it runs into
                 the multi-trillions. Which doesn’t even include the cost
                 of grid-sized battery storage required to supply the half
                 of earth remaining in shadow, and which also has the
                 additional technological hurdle of not currently
                 existing.
                 But hey, other than that, great plan.
                    #
                  John Preston says
                         @ March 13, 2019
                      “And as you’ve ignored above, the arithmetic has
                      also been done to calculate the cost of it all”
                      wtf — nuclear is more expensive, so whatever the
                      cost to power the whole planet with solar (if that
                      were necessary) it would be far less than it would
                      cost to do it with nuclear (especially if one
                      includes the costs for eventual decommissioning, and
                      ongoing storage of the radioactive waste).
                      As for batteries, who said anything about batteries.
                      Hydrogen for export is now being planned and soon to
                      be built) in South Australia, other Australian
                      states, and other countries.
                      I see you’re the same incoherent dude as previous.
          +
        Jay Salhi says
               o March 11, 2019
            @Andrew
            The Lazard study looks at only a small piece of the overall
            picture. If wind and solar were genuinely cheaper than fossil
            fuels they (i) would not need subsidies (ii) would actually
            make a meaningful contribution to world energy supply (instead
            of providing about 1%). Once you take into account things like
            efficiency, the cost of backup power and maintenance costs
            (just to name a few), you get a radically different picture.
            http://euanmearns.com/the-cost-of-wind-solar-power-batteries-i
            ncluded/
               o
             Jackson Howard says
                    # March 11, 2019
                 Wind and Solar are already probably cheaper than fossil
                 fuels once the AGW externalities and early deaths from
                 air qualities are factored in. One can argue that
                 ignoring those externalities effectively act as an fossil
                 fuel subsidy.
                 For renewables to become effective they need to be
                 operated at an industrial scale, due to the low energy
                 density. My bet is that once oil ERoEI gets lower than
                 renewables, the switch would happen anyway. But that will
                 be probably be too late for a moderate amount of GW.
                    #
                  Ftrftr Nd says
                         @ March 12, 2019
                      “Wind and Solar are already probably cheaper than
                      fossil fuels once the AGW externalities and early
                      deaths from air qualities are factored in. One can
                      argue that ignoring those externalities effectively
                      act as an fossil fuel subsidy.”
                      If you’re going to count pollution against fossil
                      fuels, then you also need to count the increased
                      lifespans since the advent of the Industrial
                      Revolution in their favor. People used to live to 35
                      back then. But now people live well into their 80s,
                      and far more comfortably, thanks to fossil fuels and
                      the economic gains they helped make possible.
                      The gains far, far outweigh the losses.
                      “For renewables to become effective they need to be
                      operated at an industrial scale, due to the low
                      energy density.”
                      Don’t forget jacking up poor people’s electrical
                      bills even more than they already have been, due to
                      the necessary increase in subsidies.
                      “My bet is that once oil ERoEI gets lower than
                      renewables, the switch would happen anyway. But that
                      will be probably be too late for a moderate amount
                      of GW.”
                      What switch? We don’t use oil to generate
                      electricity, outside of Hawaii. We use oil for
                      transportation. And going to 100% solar/wind
                      electrical generation is already enough of a pipe
                      dream without throwing in the additional energy
                      demand required to replace all gas and diesel.
          +
        Ftrftr Nd says
               o March 12, 2019
            “Isn’t this why we are not progressing new nuclear projects?”
            Not really, since according to Lazard’s own report you can’t
            compare solar and wind to conventional generation technologies
            due to the former two’s intermittent nature.
            From page 5:
            “Variations in fuel prices can materially affect the LCOE of
            conventional generation technologies, but direct comparisons
            against “competing” Alternative Energy generation technologies
            must take into account issues such as dispatch characteristics
            (e.g., baseload and/or dispatchable intermediate load vs.
            peaking or intermittent technologies).”
            https://www.lazard.com/media/450784/lazards-levelized-cost-of-
            energy-version-120-vfinal.pdf
            Expecting the know-nothings at Bloomberg to actually read the
            report they breathlessly quote from is apparently too much to
            ask.
            Nuclear and gas will provide power 24 hours a day. Solar and
            wind, not so much.
   178. Pingback: Sierra Club Abandons Environment To Push Industrial Wind
       And Solar | PA Pundits - International
   179.
   Jamie Karl says
          + March 11, 2019
       Beyond the obvious graphene ultra capacitors, you can store energy
       using gravity without water. Just lift a large weight into the air.
       Just as ‘not everywhere has appropriate dams’, a lot of places are
       fairly ideal for renewables and have no need of nuclear. Places
       with plenty of sun, or lots of rivers, or coastal towns.
       I’ll agree with you on a level. In that for EVERY PLACE, with
       current technology, renewables are not a complete solution. And in
       that, for now, for some places, nuclear is ideal. Our current
       situation is not just something you can throw solar panels at.
       But I don’t for a second believe that we are going to experience
       some kind of technological standstill. And battery storage, is as
       much a problem for the environment, even IF you use nuclear. You
       can’t run a car on nuclear. Current batteries use cobalt and
       lithium, and can’t run heavy machinery either.
       You can’t drive an industrial furnace on nuclear either. Rockets,
       missles, space travel, industry require burning. So we need
       hydrogen.
       Rubbers and plastics are bad from limited fossil fuels as well.
       This all leads me to come to the opposite conclusion as you, in
       many ways. That we still have a lot of progress to make, before we
       can solve this problem. And that requires investment in scientific
       research, not merely throwing money at renewables or electric cars
       (not that those things hurt, they still reduce emissions)
   180.
   Ken says
          + March 11, 2019
       He is flat out wrong with his estimates about Chernobyl and
       Fukushima. The lowest estimates of the cancer death toll given by
       the WHO for Chernobyl is “9,000 excess cancer deaths.” And if you
       include increases in cancer across Europe the numbers rise. And the
       fact that humans can’t safely return to the area should be very
       concerning to everyone.
       The WHO also says that there is an increased risk for a variety of
       cancers to those living in the most contaminated areas in Fukushima
       Prefecture, which shouldn’t be surprising. I’d be interested in
       knowing where Mr. Shellenberger’s funding comes from for his
       organization. Is he now a lobbyist/spokesman for the nuclear energy
       industry?
   181. Pingback: The Green New Deal - TradingGods.net
   182. Pingback: Nuclear Is Not A Catch-All Solution To Climate Change –
       Enjeux énergies et environnement
   183.
   Nashville Jam says
          + March 12, 2019
       Your half-way home, Mr Shellenberger. Now you have to come to grips
       with the fact that the contribution of Puny Humans to global
       climate is zero. Rather it’s the Titanic Forces of Nature,
       operating on a global and solar scale. And, unfortunately, we’re
       due for another Ice Age which is the norm, geologically speaking.
       They’ll be begging for global warming in the not too distant
       future. In the meantime, all the hype and nonsense about CO2
       emissions is making energy less-and-less affordable. Which of
       course hurts the developing poor the most, not the
       already-got-it-good people pushing the CO2 nonsense.
   184. Pingback: Why Renewables Can’t Save the Planet | Agenda 21 Course
   185. Pingback: With Ethanol And Biomass No Longer Viewed As ‘Green,’
       Will Other Renewables Soon Follow? – Menopausal Mother Nature
   186.
   Respect Silence says
          + March 12, 2019
       “…Look at a satellite view of the deserts–solar farms are a trivial
       speck on the landscape…”
       That statement is devoid of context, especially considering FUTURE
       solar growth. It’s clear that the dream of (small footprint) solar
       panels on roofs and parking lots isn’t nearly enough.
       At least you didn’t try to downplay the obvious blight of
       industrial wind turbines, which interrupt scenic views for miles
       around and require vast new road networks with permanent
       mountaintop clearcuts. Many wind projects span over 30,000 acres.
       They also fill the night sky with flashing red lights in areas that
       previously enjoyed natural darkness. The countryside is becoming
       the city; urban sprawl with new branding.
       Many environmentalists are willfully ignoring the SCALE of wind and
       solar relative to fossil fuels they can never replace, since
       they’re built with them at every step, including land preparation.
       https://www.google.com/search?q=cubic+mile+of+oil (obvious scale
       problem)
       The real solution, if any, is a lower population, a stable
       (non-growing) economy and tough personal sacrifices, but those
       concepts don’t sell well.
       https://www.google.com/search?q=blight+for+naught (debunks “green”
       wind power)
   187. Pingback: With Ethanol And Biomass No Longer Viewed As 'Green,'
       Will Other Renewables Follow? | Global Climate
   188.
   postkey says
          + March 12, 2019
       Is this ‘true’?
       “Furthermore, one of the biggest energy issues is the fact that
       producing electricity does nothing for the 80% of energy use that
       isn’t supplied by electricity – mainly the shipping and transport
       industry (including the military sector), the mining industry, and
       the agriculture industry. The other fact is that “renewables” do
       absolutely nothing to curtail our ever-increasing energy use.”
       https://www.facebook.com/groups/methanehydratesnews/
   189. Pingback: Soyez écolo, prônez le nucléaire ! – La Lumière du monde
   190. Pingback: Tuesday PM ~ thefrontpagecover | New American Gazette

   Comments are closed.

   Previous PostConfronting a New Threat to Female Athletics
   Next PostWhy the American Left Should Embrace Effective Altruism over
   Provincial Populism

Narrated

   Narrated, Top Stories

NARRATED: How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life

   Greg Ellis reads How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life, Stephen
   Elliott’s essay about being accused of rape on the Shitty Media Med
   list in 2017. It was published...

   October 3, 2019

Podcast

   Podcast, Top Stories

PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of Crowds

   Conservative intellectual Douglas Murray talks to Toby Young about the
   moral shortcomings of identity politics and the Marxist underpinnings
   of the Social Justice movement, both subjects of his new...

   October 3, 2019

Top Stories

     * The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
       The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
     * 'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
       'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
     * Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
       Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
     * From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
       From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
     * PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
       PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
     * 'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
       'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
     * Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
       Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
     * The Case for Black Optimism
       The Case for Black Optimism
     * Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America
       Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America

   [merchstoread.png]

Share

     * (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)

   Help free thought live

   Close and accept
   Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this
   website, you agree to their use.
   To find out more, including how to control cookies, see here: Cookie
   Policy

   Free Thought Lives

Follow Us

     * Menu Item
     * Menu Item

     * Copyright © 2019 Quillette Pty Ltd | All Rights Reserved

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.
   #Quillette » Feed Quillette » Comments Feed Quillette » On Toxic
   Femininity Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * Home
     * About
     * Subscribe
     * Donate
     * Quillette Circle

Quillette

Free Thought Lives

   Menu

     * Features
     * Science / Tech
     * Politics
     * Review
     * Podcast
     * Narrated

   Close Menu

   Sex, Top Stories
   Published on July 9, 2018

On Toxic Femininity

   written by Heather E. Heying

   Male lions can be monsters, murderous and focused. Toxic, if you will.

   Given the opportunity, male lions will kill the kittens in a pride over
   which they have gained control. They commit infanticide, which brings
   the new mothers, freshly childless, back into estrous. The females are
   quickly impregnated. This, we can all agree, is disturbing behavior,
   and may make some people feel rather less pleased with lions.

   Given the opportunity, the vast majority of modern human males would do
   no such thing.

   Those who argue that men are inherently toxic are, ironically, making
   arguments that are biologically essentialist. And they are making them
   badly, at that. Evolution built humans, as it did lions. But humans
   have longer childhoods and greater generational overlap, share more
   ideas with greater complexity, and usually live in more stable social
   groups than do lions. In humans, evolution has given us the capacity to
   shape personality during development to a greater degree than in any
   other species. As such, and because few human cultures would tolerate
   such behavior, the vast majority of men would not and could not kill
   babies, nor rape their grieving mothers.

   *     *     *

   Over 30 years ago, I came of age as a female in LA. Being a young woman
   in LA means being watched—watched for deviations from the norm, for
   indications of future fame, for signs of weakness. Watched simply for
   how one looks. There are, unfortunately, many examples, recent and not,
   that point to LA’s most famous industry being a place where young women
   need to be on guard. I never aspired to the industry, but even just
   living in LA, the culture is omnipresent.

   Two anecdotes should suffice. Walking alone in my sun-kissed west LA
   neighborhood one summer, I was approached by a man looking for extras
   for a beach scene in a movie. Before I had said a word, he told me
   where to go, how much I would be paid per day, and what would be
   expected of me: that I stand around in a bikini, among others similarly
   clad. I told him I was going to college. He literally looked me up and
   down, adopted a frown, and assured me that I did not need to go to
   college. Beach scenes were my future, and from there—who can say?
   Better beach scenes, presumably.

   Second anecdote: One of my many part-time jobs in high school, along
   with scooping ice cream and renting out VHS tapes, was staffing high
   end catering events. Dressed in classic, tailored black and white, I
   carried platters of hors d’ouevres around during cocktail hour, and
   ferried plated entrees during table service. At indoor events, male
   attendees would often stop me to engage in small talk, and ask for my
   number. I wished that they wouldn’t, but I felt no risk. One night,
   though, I worked an event on the backlot of Universal Studios. A group
   unaffiliated with Hollywood had booked it for a no-expenses-spared
   fete, and I was to do the usual, except that I would have to cover more
   ground. The kitchen was further away, the guests more spread out, with
   no walls to contain them. Before table service, my co-workers and I
   made the rounds with our platters of bruschetta and cured meats. On
   this Hollywood backlot, though, the lack of walls proved dangerous. A
   young man—older than me but younger than 30—maneuvered me away from the
   crowd. There were many shadows, and he stood too close. He looked at me
   with predatory eyes. He backed me into a hedge, rubbed up against me.
   And I got away from him before it went any further.

   That was toxic masculinity, before the phrase existed.

   Yes, toxic masculinity exists. But the use of the term has been
   weaponized. It is being hurled without care at every man. When it
   emerged, its use seemed merely imprecise—in most groups of people,
   there’s some guy waiting for an opportunity to fondle a woman’s ass
   without her consent, put his hand where he shouldn’t, right? That’s who
   was being outed as toxic. Those men—and far, far worse—do exist.
   Obviously. But wait—does every human assemblage contain such men? It
   does not. This term, toxic masculinity, is being wielded
   indiscriminately, and with force. We are not talking imprecision now,
   we are talking thoroughgoing inaccuracy.

   Most men are not toxic. Their maleness does not make them toxic, any
   more than one’s ‘whiteness’ makes one racist. Assume for the moment
   that we could agree on terms: Is maleness more highly correlated with
   toxic masculinity than is femaleness? Yes. Ipso facto—the term is about
   maleness, so men will display more of it than will women. The logical
   leap is then concluding that all men are toxic. The very communities
   where ‘toxic masculinity’ is being discussed most are the communities
   where the men are, in my experience, compassionate, egalitarian, and
   not at all toxic.

   Calling good men toxic does everyone a deep disservice. Everyone except
   those who seek empowerment through victim narratives.

   For the record: I am not suggesting that actual victims do not exist,
   nor that they do not deserve full emotional, physical, legal, medical,
   and other support. I also do not want to minimize the fact that most
   women, perhaps even all, have experienced unpleasantness from a subset
   of men. But not all women are victims. And even among those women who
   have truly suffered at the hands of men, many—most, I would hazard to
   guess—do not want their status in the world to be ‘victim.’

   All of which leads us directly to a topic not much discussed: toxic
   femininity.

   Sex and gender roles have been formed over hundreds of thousands of
   years in human evolution, indeed, over hundreds of millions of years in
   our animal lineage. Aspects of those roles are in rapid flux, but
   ancient truths still exist. Historical appetites and desires persist.
   Straight men will look at beautiful women, especially if those women
   are a) young and hot and b) actively displaying. Display invites
   attention.

   Hotness-amplifying femininity puts on a full display, advertising
   fertility and urgent sexuality. It invites male attention by, for
   instance, revealing flesh, or by painting on signals of sexual
   receptivity. This, I would argue, is inviting trouble. No, I did not
   just say that she was asking for it. I did, however, just say that she
   was displaying herself, and of course she was going to get looked at.

   The amplification of hotness is not, in and of itself, toxic, although
   personally, I don’t respect it, and never have. Hotness fades, wisdom
   grows— wise young women will invest accordingly. Femininity becomes
   toxic when it cries foul, chastising men for responding to a
   provocative display.

   Where we set our boundaries is a question about which reasonable people
   might disagree, but two bright-lines are widely agreed upon: Every
   woman has the right not to be touched if she does not wish to be; and
   coercive quid pro quo, in which sexual favors are demanded for the
   possibility of career advancement, is unacceptable. But when women doll
   themselves up in clothes that highlight sexually-selected anatomy, and
   put on make-up that hints at impending orgasm, it is toxic—yes,
   toxic—to demand that men do not look, do not approach, do not query.

   Young women have vast sexual power. Everyone who is being honest with
   themselves knows this: Women in their sexual prime who are anywhere
   near the beauty-norms for their culture have a kind of power that
   nobody else has. They are also all but certain to lack the wisdom to
   manage it. Toxic femininity is an abuse of that power, in which hotness
   is maximized, and victim status is then claimed when straight men don’t
   treat them as peers.

   Creating hunger in men by actively inviting the male gaze, then
   demanding that men have no such hunger—that is toxic femininity.
   Subjugating men, emasculating them when they display strength—physical,
   intellectual, or other—that is toxic femininity. Insisting that men,
   simply by virtue of being men, are toxic, and then acting surprised as
   relationships between men and women become more strained—that is toxic
   femininity. It is a game, the benefits of which go to a few while the
   costs are shared by all of us.

   *     *     *

   I had a student on one of my study abroad trips who had a perennial
   problem with clothing. She was never wearing enough of it. She was
   smart, athletic, and beautiful, but also intent on advertising hotness
   at all moments. At a field station in a jungle in Latin America, she
   approached me to complain that the local men were looking at her. The
   rest of us were wearing field gear—a distinctly unrevealing and unsexy
   garb. She was in a swimsuit. “Put on more clothes,” I told her. She was
   aghast. She wanted me to change the men, to talk to them about where to
   point their eyes. Here in their home, where we were visitors, and one
   of the gringos had shown up nearly naked, she wanted the men to change.

   For a spell before that, my job was to trek around tropical forests
   studying poison frogs. I was interested in their sex lives, in figuring
   out how they choose their mates and their territories, in how they
   parent, and in what that meant about the evolution of sociality more
   generally.

   My research revealed, in part, how many different ways there are to be
   territorial, and to be successful, in male frogs. In Madagascan poison
   frogs, there are multiple routes to success, both naturally and
   sexually selected—males can succeed, evolutionarily, by holding
   high-quality territories, and they can also succeed by having no
   territories at all (but by being rather more sneaky). Wide variance in
   strategy, and shifting strategies under different conditions, is well
   studied in animal behavior and game theory.

   Given that we know this to be true in non-human animals, why would we
   imagine that humans are less, rather than even more, flexible? There
   are many ways to be female, and many ways to be male, and some of each
   are bad news for everyone but the individual employing them. As a
   social species that has become the dominant ecological force on our
   planet, we can and should aspire to behave in ways that are not merely
   selfish, not merely competitive, but also collaborative. Toxic
   masculinity, and toxic femininity, are inherently selfish modes, and
   those not employing them should be interested in seeing them
   eradicated.

   *     *     *

   The movement that has popularized the term ‘toxic masculinity’ shares
   tools and conclusions with those who see signs of ‘white supremacy’
   everywhere they look. Intersectionalists have in common with one
   another a particular rhetorical trick: Any claim made by a member of an
   historically oppressed group is unquestionably true. Questioning claims
   is, itself, an act of oppression.

   This opens the door for anyone who is willing to lie to obtain power.
   If you cannot question claims, any claim can be made.

   Thus: Racism is ubiquitous. And all men are toxic. I object—but
   objection is not allowed. Everyone who understands game theory knows
   how this game ends: Innocent people being vilified with false claims,
   and exposed to witch hunts. Sexual assault is real, but that does not
   mean that all claims of sexual assault are honest.

   It is shocking that this bears saying, but there is a world of men who
   are smart and compassionate and eager to have vibrant, surprising
   conversations with other people, both men and women. The sex-specific
   toxicity that I have seen, when it has been obvious, has mostly been in
   the other court. All men are toxic and all women victims? No. Not in my
   name.


   Heather E. Heying is a former professor of evolutionary biology at The
   Evergreen State College. She has a PhD in Biology from the University
   of Michigan, and is the author of Antipode, an investigation of life
   and research in Madagascar. You can follow her on
   Twitter @HeatherEHeying

Share this:

     * Pocket
     * WhatsApp
     *
     * Email
     * Print
     *

Related

   Listen to this article
   [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1] [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1]
   Voiced by Amazon Polly Voiced by Amazon Polly

   Filed under: Sex, Top Stories

285 Comments

    1.
   Steve says
          + July 9, 2018
       “evolution has given us the capacity”
       Evolution has not “given” us anything whatsoever. Why is it that so
       many are unable to talk about evolutionary biology without the
       tacit assumption that it is some sort of intelligent being
       possessed of goals, will and even aesthetic judgement? Evolution no
       more gave us the capacity to shape ourselves than the moon gifted
       you with light last night. Any capacities we have are no different
       in principle from he capacities of a garden slug — at least as far
       as natural selection is concerned.
          +
        Philippe says
               o July 9, 2018
            Dude she is a professor of evolutionary biology she knows more
            than you. This is far from the point of the article and her
            use of that term is obviously for the sale of the narrative,
            she’s not writing a paper on biology.
               o
             peanut gallery says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 This is a poor argument. Just because she’s an authority…
                 I mean, I think Steve is being a bit dense, but a bad
                 argument is still bad.
               o
             thylacosmilus says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 She doesn’t appear to know that lions have CUBS. Not
                 ‘kittens’.
                 Dude.
                    #
                  Claude Balloune says
                         @ July 12, 2018
                      hmm… toxic taxonomy?
                      Cats have kittens.
                    #
                  recumbent driver says
                         @ July 14, 2018
                      And bats have ‘bittens.’ Who cares.
                         @
                       farkennel says
                              - July 17, 2018
                           …and moths have mittens
                    #
                  Charles says
                         @ July 18, 2018
                      Mountain lions have kittens. She didn’t specify
                      which type, sooo …
          +
        K says
               o July 9, 2018
            … And dark matter isn’t really matter and global warming
            doesn’t necessarily mean it will be warmer.
            There are some patterns of language not worth breaking unless
            it’s necessary. It is not necessary here.
               o
             LA says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 lol. Awesome K!
               o
             pa'ul says
                    # July 17, 2018
                 thank you : )
          +
        Colin Wright (@SwipeWright) says
               o July 9, 2018
            Clearly she knows that evolution isn’t some intelligent, or
            teleological force. It is much simpler, especially when
            writing an article for non-experts, to write “evolution has
            given us the capacity for X” than it is to say “we have
            evolved trait X because individuals with trait X tended to
            survive longer and leave more offspring than individuals that
            had traits Y or Z.” It’s shorthand for a lot of jargon.
            It’s like Richard Dawkins’ book The Selfish Gene. Genes aren’t
            really selfish, and Dawkins knows this. It’s simply a metaphor
            for the fact that genes are the object of selection, and
            “compete” with other genes in the gene pool. We also commonly
            say “trait X evolved for Y reason,” even though we know that
            natural selection doesn’t have foresight. It’s just the way we
            talk, and we all know what we mean when we use this kind of
            language.
               o
             Tom More says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 She can’t know any such thing.. indeed if that could be
                 known.. she couldn’t know it.. but that is a teleological
                 point. Nobody ever read even materialists like Thomas
                 Nagel.. Mind and Cosmos? Naive materialism is on its way
                 out… and good riddance.
          +
        Shank says
               o July 10, 2018
            It’s just a term of art.
          +
        S.K.Graham says
               o July 10, 2018
            @Steve,
            The result of a physical process can legitimately be said to
            “give” its result. It is an appropriate use of the word
            “give”. Burning wood gives us heat, smoke and charred wood.
            Rain, sunlight, and the earth give us crops to eat.
            The process of evolution gives us the results of evolution:
            the current forms and behaviors of extant species, including
            the forms and behaviors of homo sapiens.
            Nobody who has a modicum of knowledge of evolution thinks
            using a word like “give” implies that evolution is a sentient
            being with goals. This is, frankly, a stupid criticism.
            Evolution gave us brains and the ability to communicate, so we
            can learn from each other, particularly younger generations
            learning from older, and adapt within the course of a single
            lifetime, rather than relying solely on the knowledge encoded
            in our genes (and, before you object, yes, there is knowledge
            encoded in your genome, not all of it necessarily correct,
            hard won, through pure trial and error).
               o
             dirk says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 What about giving: There was a time that dairy-cows (they
                 all had a nice human name and not a computerstrip) gave
                 their milk to the milkers and consumers. These times have
                 long since gone. Now, they are forced by hormones and
                 soybean extracts and milking machines to produce milk.
               o
             Tom More says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 You guys should really read a lot more Aristotle. Or
                 philosopher Ed Feser. In a teleological universe.. the
                 one we are in.. evolution does indeed “give” us gifts. As
                 Aristotle showed.. that which is an end or goal to the
                 highest degree is the reason for the existence of what
                 preceded it. His metaphysics is airtight by the way.
                 Going to the store for smokes is the reason Sally put on
                 her coat and boots, started the car, burned gas and
                 walked into the store… the reason for all that went
                 before., teleology. We’ve just disturbed some passing
                 17th century dogmatism here.
               o
             Grrr says
                    # July 21, 2018
                 Exactly SK!
          +
        Jacopo Stifani says
               o July 10, 2018
            I think you are taking this too literally. She’s personifying
            evolution to commmnicate an idea.
          +
        Robert Casenta says
               o July 10, 2018
            You are being pedantic. She is an accomplished evolutionary
            biology professor…this OBVIOUSLY was not the intended
            connotation. In another forum I would mostly agree with
            you…this is not the place.
          +
        Speaker To Animals says
               o July 10, 2018

     Why is it that so many are unable to talk about evolutionary biology
     without the tacit assumption that it is some sort of intelligent
     being possessed of goals,
            She never made any such claim.
            It’s no wonder you have nobody who cares about you.
               o
             Toby says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 This is seems unnecessarily harsh? Be better.
                    #
                  Scott Pierce says
                         @ July 14, 2018
                      This pleased me, “Be better”. I’m so tired of
                      pedantic, academic bores. I think we should all just
                      “Be better”.
          +
        James Tidwell says
               o July 10, 2018
            I think it was obvious she was speaking figuratively.
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 10, 2018
            “Evolution has not “given” us anything whatsoever.”
            How silly. Of course not, and she isn’t saying it has,
            literally, any more than someone saying that “history has
            given us many examples of X” means “History, personified, has
            intentionally handed to us…”, or “my experience has given me a
            good understanding of…” means “my experience has personally
            handed to me an understanding…”
            It is almost impossible to speak without using some form of
            metaphor, and that is what the use of the term is here, it
            would take someone totally focused on avoiding any set
            expression to do that, and it just distracts from the subject
            at hand.
            It means “the process of evolution has produced in humans “,
            or is that still too metaphorical? Maybe ” evolution is a
            process that has resulted in humans having…”?
            But everyone with half a brain knows that already.
          +
        Oregoncharles says
               o July 10, 2018
            Not incidentally, it makes perfect sense to say that a
            process, which evolution is, “gives” us its product.
            She’s writing popular science. It’s true that evolution does
            not have agency, but it proceeds very much as if it does, so
            it’s engaging to write about it that way. That’s especially
            true when you’re talking about animals, especially humans,
            which DO have agency and purposes they pursue. Sexual
            selection, the subject here, is actually about “esthetics”.
            Hence the peacock’s tale and men’s and women’s contrasting
            shapes, formed by the preference of potential mates.
          +
        ADITLife (@AlexThx1121) says
               o July 10, 2018
            As others have stated the language in use was likely employed
            as a tool for communicative efficiency, evonomy of language.
            It was likely, as are many pieces, written with some audience
            in mind; as a resualt not all will understand, & or be able to
            knowledgeably respond.
            Hopefully the replies, elsewhere given, can shed some light on
            the nuanced peculiarities of language & its usage “in the
            wild”.
            I for one am willing to assume this oversight on your part is
            naïveté, & not malicious obtuseness feigning outrage.
            Do consider the Quillete audience. It isn’t one likely to
            sucuumb to such sophomoric attempts at verbal subterfuge.
          +
        Tom More says
               o July 11, 2018
            Employing the metaphysical principles of Aristotle this
            “father of western science”, he also arrived at the necessary
            existence of something he called Pure Act.. the unmoved
            mover.. necessary to explain the existence of finite being.
            And we naturally see teleology in evolution as we should ..
            its there. At the ground of existence and purpose and purpose
            is a sign of mind… we find Intelligence. This is not to be
            confused with the irreducible complexity ID theory, but is
            rather the gift of scholar monks who built the foundations of
            western science.
          +
        Mark says
               o July 11, 2018
            My parents didn’t “give” me blue eyes either. For the benefit
            of future readers I’d recommend you incorporate a pedantry
            check (less is better) into your comment proof-reading.
          +
        Andrew Smedley says
               o July 12, 2018
            Oh my god, Steve, we all know. It’s not a tacit assumption,
            it’s a linguistic shortcut that evolutionary biologists use
            all the time when talking with each other because it’s quicker
            than saying ‘trait A was adaptive for species X in recent
            evolutionary history, and so offspring which had more…’
            At a certain level of conversation we just have to have faith
            that there are certain things about the world that everyone
            involved understands, for sanity’s sake.
          +
        Rudolph Pitman says
               o July 12, 2018
            You really need to understand colloquialism. Of course
            evolution has ‘given us’ our evolved traits, ‘us’ being a
            generalized group of humans (or women, or men) having evolved
            to have those traits. The author assumes people reading
            understand enough of the basics of evolutionary psychology in
            order to infer the obviously implied meaning, and the common
            sense not to be so pedantic.
          +
        Dan H says
               o July 12, 2018
            Arguing over six words is a great way to divert attention from
            the claim. I find.
          +
        Alex says
               o July 12, 2018
            She is using metaphorical shorthand. Get over yourself.
          +
        Micha Elyi says
               o July 12, 2018
            Speaking of “selection”, let us not forget sexual selection.
            Men, say anthropologists, are a breeding experiment run by
            women. As a result, any “toxic masculinity” is the result of
            women selecting men for those qualities.
            But don’t expect feminists to hold women accountable for their
            choices. The operative feminist motto is “We always side with
            the woman, no matter what.”
               o
             David Blair says
                    # July 19, 2018
                 Not if the woman is a Republican.
          +
        ADM64 says
               o July 13, 2018
            Would “natural processes have led us to evolve the capacity
            to…” be easier to understand?
          +
        Robert Arvanitis says
               o July 14, 2018
            Colloquial English, not an invitation to pick nits.
            You see a a product for sale, tell a friend “My company makes
            that!”
            That is NOT a claim you own the company, just that you work
            there. “But he said MY company” you whine,
            Exactly the same here. You want periphrasis “The apparent net
            result of blind natural selection is to endow this creature
            with that capacity to…” ? You’ve already lost the audience and
            buried the idea.
               o
             dirk says
                    # July 14, 2018
                 I don’t think anything can “give” so much response on
                 Quillette as linguistics, the proof that intellectuals
                 dominate the place.
          +
        J says
               o July 14, 2018
            Found the autist.
    2.
   Alex D. says
          + July 9, 2018
       If only more could accept and grasp the uncomfortable truths of our
       reality. Excellent article..We appreciate your work Heather!
          +
        Paul Ellis says
               o July 9, 2018
            “https://girlsjustwannahaveguns.com/watch-liberal-students-fli
            p-out-when-panel-agrees-men-and-women-are-different/”
            Here are three who evidently can’t, or more probably, won’t:
            https://girlsjustwannahaveguns.com/watch-liberal-students-flip
            -out-when-panel-agrees-men-and-women-are-different/
    3.
   Sean says
          + July 9, 2018
       This is interesting in its particulars, but given that few
       feminists argue that men are inherently toxic (but instead that
       most are made so by culture and the rest collectively responsible),
       I don’t suspect this argument would hold under rebuttal, but would
       be rejected as acting a straw position.
          +
        Aurora Sola (@sighlab) says
               o July 9, 2018
            I’m afraid you’re right. Heather makes a lot of good points,
            and her experience and knowledge in the field of biology are
            appreciated, but the straw men sprinkled throughout weaken her
            message.
          +
        ouipoo says
               o July 9, 2018
            Most of what feminists do isn’t really argument at all – it’s
            a mix of 1) slogans, 2) innuendo, 3) motte and bailey claims,
            and (finally) 4) arguments with unacknowledged premises and
            which respond to rebuttals by starting at 1) again.
               o
             Peter from Oz says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 In other words, they are behaving like the sterotypical
                 silly women they complain we men are falsely cliaming
                 them to be.
                 Real women advance themselves and their families. They
                 don’t care about advancing their sex.
          +
        John Drake says
               o July 9, 2018
            I can name some 50 women off the top of my head who identify
            as feminist and who argue that men are inherently toxic, hence
            their arguments that we need to teach them “alternative
            masculinities.”
            Don’t be disingenuous.
               o
             Sean says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 It’s not disingenuous: I’m reporting my experience
                 accurately, though I can’t say yours isn’t different.
                 What I will say is even those most “anti-male” I’ve
                 encountered, such as the lady who wrote the “Why Can’t We
                 Hate Men” piece blame culture, not some essential feature
                 of biology, for any inherent toxicity of men.
                    #
                  lujlp says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      Could I interest you in the president of the NYC
                      chapter of NOW who referred to FIVE year old boys a
                      serial gang rapists in response to Ted Kennedy’s
                      “betrayal” of feminists “forgiveness” of his killing
                      Kopechne by endorsing Obama over Clinton in the 2008
                      primary?
                      She blamed the rape impulses of kindergartners on
                      the political machinations of a man who she felt
                      ‘owed’ feminists a lifetime fealty because they
                      ignored his killing of a woman so long as he was
                      politically convenient to their cause
                    #
                  whothehell cares (@DuplicityNo) says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      Doesn’t matter what you blame when the premise is
                      wrong to begin with.
                    #
                  Davicus says
                         @ July 12, 2018
                      What a lovely use of the no true scotsman fallacy
                      and appeal to authority! Proving you wrong is as
                      simple as having you google search the term toxic
                      masuclinity. The number of articles that promote the
                      concept indicate feminists promote universal toxic
                      masculinity.
               o
             Mazzakim says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Okay, I’ll bite. Name 50 women entirely off the top of
                 your head who argue men are inherently toxic. I’m
                 genuinely curious to see such a list.
               o
             pook says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 I’d like to see links to even one of these supposed
                 feminists who supposedly believe such a thing (contrary
                 to every feminist I’ve ever read or spoken to).
          +
        S.K.Graham says
               o July 10, 2018
            Except a key point in the article is the *most* men are *not*
            toxic. This is the crux of the disagreement with feminists,
            not whether the toxicity is derived from biological or
            cultural causes.
          +
        Bahuleya Minyakka says
               o July 10, 2018
            “Few feminists” really? You must be hanging around feminists
            who aren’t Feminists™
               o
             pook says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 More like, feminists who are actual people and not
                 right-wing strawmen.
                    #
                  Peter from Oz says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      Surely, you mean ”straw women”?
          +
        Robin says
               o July 10, 2018
            Sean feminists routinely argue that normal male behaviour is
            toxic. While they may contend that culture creates this
            behaviour as an evolutionary biologist Dr Heying knows better.
            Feminists are de facto biological essentialists.
          +
        patriarchisumarte says
               o July 10, 2018
            I am afraid Sean is right: “given that few feminists argue
            that men are inherently toxic (but instead that most are made
            so by culture and the rest collectively responsible), I don’t
            suspect this argument would hold under rebuttal, but would be
            rejected as acting a straw position.” Even if I don’t think
            radical feminists are so few – especially in the academic
            world – I agree that all the others can call themselves out
            and play the strawman card.
               o
             pook says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 If radical feminists so widespread as you say, surely it
                 wouldn’t be hard to find an example of a feminist saying
                 that men in general are toxic.
          +
        Permuted Polytope (@lhtach) says
               o July 10, 2018
            Made toxic by which cultures? Every human culture ever? Except
            perhaps some prehistoric ones where paucity of data allows
            people to fill in the details with their imaginations? Unless
            someone can give lots of examples of well-documented cultures
            without “toxic masculinity”, then saying that “men are made
            toxic by culture” is basically the same as “men are inherently
            toxic”. With the added twist of, “But if you give me and my
            co-ideologues absolute power to usher in Utopia, maybe men
            might be OK then.”
          +
        David Beard says
               o July 10, 2018
            HEH: Those who argue that men are inherently toxic are,
            ironically, making arguments that are biologically
            essentialist.
            I think she understands that, hence the use of ‘ironically’.
          +
        David Funk says
               o July 15, 2018
            I’m glad that you pointed that men are inherently toxic, that
            just are toxic. I feel so much better informed now.
    4.
   Reverend Holly (@Hollymathnerd) says
          + July 9, 2018
       SO grateful for this. It gave me language for how to think about
       some of the purity culture bullshit I was raised with, among many
       other helpful provocations of thought. Thank you. (The Rev. in my
       handle is a joke.)
    5.
   jonahj (@jonahj) says
          + July 9, 2018
       Why are so many people clueless about male sexuality? I’ve heard
       feminists state sexual objectification starts around puberty. No.
       Baby boys have erections. Toddlers have erections. Fetishes and
       sexual preferences can be traced to childhood. And now LGBTQ
       organizations are encouraging children to “pick their gender” and
       child drag queens like the 10 year old Desmond Napoles to create a
       drag club websites for kids. Toxic Gender is creating Toxic
       Sexuality.
    6.
   Rachel Allen says
          + July 9, 2018
       Heather- you and your husband are a new and wonderful light in my
       intellectual life. Although I wish a different price has been paid,
       I’m so glad the two of you are now getting exposure in the greater
       sphere. Please continue to write, give talks, and engage! 😄
    7.
   Erin says
          + July 9, 2018
       What a breath of fresh of air! Thank you!
    8.
   ModuloBurrito (@pancake_crumbs) says
          + July 9, 2018
       MGTOW
    9.
   Sylv says
          + July 9, 2018
       I have yet to hear any definition of Toxic Masculinity that
       couldn’t just as accurately be called “Bad Masculinity,” but for
       the fact that “toxic” is a vaguely scientific-sounding word that
       makes the whole affair sound much more medically serious.
       Why did the man do a bad thing? Because toxic masculinity made him
       do it!
       Which parts of masculinity are the toxic parts? The parts that make
       men do bad things!
       How do we tell those parts from the other, non-toxic bits? Your
       question makes me think you are part of the problem!
          +
        Sean says
               o July 9, 2018
            Accusations of toxic masculinity I’ve seen usually fall in the
            realm of hyper-aggression or tolerance for hyper-aggression
            (and by extension, insufficient empathy for the vulnerable).
            Masculinity is typically associated with competitiveness,
            assertiveness, tenacity, denial of vulnerability, and
            aggression. Taking those qualities into spaces where the
            organizing principle is cooperative and empathetic creates a
            tension between organizing principles. Those with masculine
            temperaments are supposed to switch out of assertive and
            competitive modes in those spaces and when they encounter true
            vulnerability (that is, competition is supposed to be mostly
            opt-in in our society).
            However, I’ve encountered more and more of a sense that
            cooperative modes should be the rule, and competition the rare
            exception. I’ve encountered the implication that tolerance of
            aggression in any space is complicity in aggression by men
            everywhere, and that men everywhere are collectively
            responsible for male aggression anywhere.
               o
             Emblem14 says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Gendered tendencies tend to become toxic and extreme when
                 they manifest in a single gender dominant environment
                 homogeneous enough to create feedback loops without any
                 braking or moderating counterforce.
                 Ultra competitiveness and winner-take-all conditions can
                 both represent and exacerbate socially dysfunctional
                 behavior among human beings generally (among other
                 things, it rewards sociopathy and psychopathy) – but men
                 will be highly overrepresented in the people who seek out
                 and thrive in that kind of environment. More women than
                 men will feel very uncomfortable, intimidated, or even
                 damaged by a social situation that encourages unbridled
                 masculinity
                 Toxic femininity? Perhaps unbounded maternalism
                 (devouring mother stereotype), unhealthy obsession with
                 physical beauty, (eating disorders, self-loathing),
                 overbearing compassion for the weak (imposing dependency
                 and inhibited agency instead of
                 independence/empowerment), ultra-fragility (intense
                 dislike of masculine traits/environments and high
                 sensitivity to emotional distress demands demasculinized
                 “safe spaces” for normal functioning)…
                 Interesting exercise.
                    #
                  TarsTarkas says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      There are several obvious collections of people
                      where one could test your premise; monasteries,
                      nunneries, remote isolated military bases where the
                      staff is all (or almost all) male, any
                      female-dominated organization like veterinary
                      schools, nursing schools, etc. There are probably
                      papers on all these types of gender-exclusive
                      communities.
               o
             Paul Ellis says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Toxic masculinity = active aggression. Toxic femininity =
                 passive aggression. Neither promote co-operation.
                    #
                  peanut gallery says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      It’s easier to just say “assholes.” These people are
                      assholes. Don’t be an asshole!
                         @
                       pook says
                              - July 10, 2018
                           It’s not really just about assholes, though?
                           “Toxic masculinity” isn’t about toxic men. It’s
                           about toxic attitudes that men learn (and are
                           influenced by, and are *also hurt by*).
                           Think of men who don’t know how to handle their
                           feelings any way but drinking, because men
                           aren’t supposed to have feelings. Veterans with
                           PTSD who are embarrassed to admit they need
                           psychiatric help. Or men who kill themselves
                           when they’re financially ruined, because it’s
                           so ingrained in them that the man is supposed
                           to provide for his family that they fall apart
                           when they can’t. Think of shy nerdy boys who
                           feel like they’ve failed at “being a man” if
                           they don’t drink beer and love football.
               o
             X. Citoyen says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Ah, good-natured Sean. I can tell you’d make the perfect
                 neighbor, though I suspect I’d hear you fret about how
                 one neighbor hasn’t returned your lawnmower, how another
                 built his fence two feet onto your property, and how your
                 brother never pays you back the money you lend him.
                 Because you’re good natured, you don’t see a thief, a
                 squatter, and a mooch. You just wish aloud that they
                 could be more considerate and you hope they come to their
                 senses and do the right thing.
                 I conjecture all this because you’ve bought the bill of
                 goods on “organizing principles.” I know, it sounds nice
                 and fair, and it would all work fine with good-natured
                 people like you dealing with minor matters, where little
                 is at stake for anyone involved. In such cases,
                 scientific-sounding abstractions like “hyper-aggression”
                 and “competitive” and “cooperative” spaces seem as
                 obvious as the blue sky. You can easily fill in the
                 definitions and assume that others have exactly the same
                 ideas in mind, no need for Robert’s rules of order.
                 But a few weeks after joining a community association
                 based on the “cooperative organizing principle,” you
                 start fretting to me about how you keep getting shut down
                 for your “competitiveness” and your “lack of empathy for
                 other perspectives,” even though all you did was raise a
                 couple of minor objections to proposals by the group’s
                 “Cooperation Coordinator.”
                 You made three good-natured mistakes. First, even
                 good-natured people don’t agree when the stakes are high
                 and trade-offs are involved. Second, highfalutin words
                 like “hyper-aggression” are vague and easily manipulated
                 abstractions, especially when the first problem arises.
                 Third, you failed to ask the crucial question of who has
                 the power to judge when the first and second arise. The
                 answer to that is the sugary sweet-voiced saleswoman who
                 sold you the bill of goods about cooperative organizing
                 principles does. She gets to decide when you’ve become
                 competitive, which means she has absolute power inside
                 that apparently cooperative and non-competitive space.
                    #
                  david says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      @X. Citoyen
                      You’ve lived in a commune, haven’t you? So have I.
                      THAT taught me a few things.
                    #
                  Sean says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      X. Citoyen, here’s what you might be missing: it’s
                      possible to be firm but not aggressive, and
                      group-based vengeance is a perfectly feminine
                      organizing principle, as is shame and intolerance
                      for the cheat. In other words, there’s a difference
                      between being individually confrontational and
                      overly “nice”. I’ve watched my wife’s PTO and Girl
                      Scout interactions long enough to know that there’s
                      more than one way to run an organization and get
                      things done. I think I prefer the “masculine”
                      method, though, because it’s simpler and less
                      anxiety-inducing.
                      On a more personal note, money lent should be
                      considered gone but my brother did pay me back and
                      my children do listen. I may be charitable enough to
                      be taken advantage of time to time- but not
                      repeatedly
               o
             AA says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 Here’s something you hadn’t thought about: how many
                 millions of corpses were piled up in an attempt to create
                 a utopia where cooperation was the rule and
                 competitiveness the exception? Stalinist Russia. Maoist
                 China…
                 But this actually makes perfect sense if you are willing
                 to stop and reflect for just one moment. In order to
                 bring about your cooperative paradise on earth and
                 eradicate competitiveness there is no doubt a number of
                 bodies you would be willing yourself to pile up. What is
                 your number? Is it in the hundreds, thousands,
                 millions…or maybe billions? What’s your number?
                    #
                  Chris says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      @AA You missed a point.
                      Stalin’s Russia and Mao’s China (and you might add
                      Pol Pot’s Cambodia here) were exactly those
                      co-operative anti-competitive societies slated to
                      become shining utopias, but as usual when you ‘stir
                      the pot’ of a society with a left wing revolution,
                      what floats to the top is never the cream but the
                      most violent thugs that society has to offer.
                      The unstated point is that those 100,000,000 plus
                      deaths were those countries’ own civilians, almost
                      all killed after the revolution was ‘won’.
                      ….and before denials flood in citing Hitler’s
                      Germany as a capitalist counter example, I encourage
                      you to reflect on the fact that NAZI was a
                      contraction of the name for the ‘German national
                      SOCIALIST party’.
                      All of which has little to do with feminism other
                      than pointing out how pear-shaped things can get
                      when you allow an intolerant, fundamentalist, left
                      wing creed to dominate a country’s educational
                      system.
                    #
                  EK says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      As Stalin said: Soon there will be fewer but better
                      Russians.
                    #
                  Sean says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      AA – Straight to communism, huh? I’m absolutely not
                      a socialist. However, squint at any tops-down
                      capitalist organization, and internally it looks
                      fairly socialist. As do most volunteer
                      organizations. Why aren’t they totalitarian
                      nightmares? Scale matters. The fact the
                      organizations involve at-will association rather
                      than coercion matters. Cooperative and competitive
                      dynamics co-exist in most of society without having
                      anything to do governmental socialism. How about
                      using a modicum of nuance and context?
   10.
   LAW says
          + July 9, 2018
       I found the focus on dress to be a bit puritanical/narrow for the
       discussion at large. But then I realized this is looking at
       “masculinity” and “femininity” from an evolutionary biology
       standpoint, where “toxic” gender behavior is behavior that is
       selfish from the view of a species reproducing.
       That’s interesting, but I think the argument can be made a bit
       broader. From my viewpoint “toxic masculinity” refers to using
       physical aggression to get what you want. Its counter, “toxic
       femininity”, refers to using emotional aggression to get what you
       want.
       For one example, look at the ways men and women fight – men beat
       each other up, women socially manipulate and exclude each other.
       For what it’s worth, the behavior described in this piece is a
       subset of this definition of toxic femininity – using sex appeal to
       manipulate and demonize people.
       Definitions aside, the larger point here for me is that both
       genders have good and bad inherent traits. It would be nice if we
       could focus on the positive, instead of running around calling each
       other “toxic”. I appreciate the defense, but I would much prefer if
       we rewound to a few years ago where there wasn’t constant
       discussion of “toxic masculinity” whenever any man does something
       bad. Is that so much to ask?
          +
        Jason says
               o July 10, 2018
            Another difference might be that after men beat each other up,
            they can have a beer and become friends.
            To men very little is taken personally. To women very little
            isn’t.
               o
             Peter from Oz says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 And yet, so many fools on the left would have you believe
                 there is no difference between men and women.
   11.
   Travis says
          + July 9, 2018
       I expected to enjoy this article, but I don’t think I did. It even
       elicited an audible eye-roll at points (Wisdom is so much nobler a
       pursuit than beauty? Why, because you get a few more decades of
       utility out of it? If only Marilyn Monroe had been given this
       advice, oh, her contribution to our culture would have been so much
       more ~respectful~!)
       Maybe you’ve captured some of what “toxic femininity” is, here, but
       I’m not sure I see it. I don’t think there’s anything especially
       feminine about maximizing your hotness and expecting others not to
       react to it. To the degree that this expectation is justified (“I
       expect you not to grope my body just because I’m wearing yoga
       pants”), this is a human thing. To the degree that it’s not
       justified (“I expect you to never glance at my chest despite my
       ample cleavage”), this is a confusion thing. You could make the
       case that the latter situation is a kind of toxic feminism (apiece
       with #killallmen and other radfem ideas), but I’m not getting
       what’s so feminine about it.
       When I think of toxic masculinity, I think of traditionally
       masculine traits being pushed to their toxic extremes:
       Competitiveness is a virtue, until it leads to
       winning-at-all-costs. Self-confidence is a virtue, until it blinds
       you to criticism. Resilency is a virtue, until it justifies
       self-harm. I would expect toxic femininity to look a lot like these
       – for example, a motivation to nurture being pushed into
       Munchausen-by-proxy, or a self-critical attitude that leads to
       anorexia – and I’d be very surprised if “toxic femininity” only
       included behavior that revolves around interaction with men.
          +
        Dustin says
               o July 19, 2018
            Well said.
   12.
   Mark says
          + July 9, 2018
       Thank you, Heather. We need more reasonable women such as you to
       speak out against those who weaponise the words “toxic
       masculinity”.
   13.
   phaidonvassiliou says
          + July 9, 2018
       While I mostly agree with the article, I’d say that toxic
       femininity mostly wears the garb of compassion to conceal vicious
       authoritarian inclinations from which women are not immune. If
       toxic masculinity is the extreme expression of gender traits
       predominant in men such as aggression and the appetite for sexual
       conquest, then toxic femininity is the equivalent to the motherhood
       instinct gone rogue. Seduction surely does play a role in it, but
       it’s broader and more pernicious than that: it’s authoritarianism
       in the name of motherly compassion.
          +
        K says
               o July 10, 2018
            Well said.
          +
        Natalie says
               o July 10, 2018
            Spot on.
   14.
   Aaron Kindsvatter says
          + July 10, 2018
       Thank you Dr. Heying, I really enjoyed reading your thoughts here
       and listening to you speak at heterodox. -Aaron Kindsvatter
   15.
   Irene Gribble says
          + July 10, 2018
       So many parts of this are problematic. Throughout the article there
       is a repeated suggestion of a correlation between appearance and
       intelligence. Why couldn’t she be a bikini model and also go to
       college? Should women really have to dress and look a certain way
       in order to be respected? Should girls in school not be allowed to
       wear shorts in hot weather due to men “not being capable” of
       viewing them as sex objects rather than human beings? Does beauty
       mean a lack of wisdom? By saying that makeup and clothing are
       something that defines a female, and are something she needs to be
       concerned about, you are putting value into the objectification of
       women. This is one of the largest oppressive mechanisms used by the
       patriarchy. No I don’t wear makeup to “display” myself for the male
       gaze. My appearance is not here for men, and we, as people should
       be able to wear whatever we want without being judged.
          +
        Bubblecar says
               o July 10, 2018
            The author does display a kind of condescending contempt for
            heterosexual men. Apparently they are helpless receptors of
            “female hotness” who are “provoked” into “trouble”, by seeing
            women in bikinis etc.
            Speaking as a gay man, one doesn’t find that sort of
            expectation amongst gays. Young gay men can wear sexy and
            revealing clothes without being told they’re “inviting
            trouble”. Unsolicited groping or sexual assault in the gay
            scene is clearly identified as unacceptable behaviour – no-one
            blames the victim for presenting himself as “hot”.
               o
             Zeke says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 That’s because gay men, still being men, desire young gay
                 men to wear sexy and revealing clothes. It’s a win-win.
                 Just like straight men love when women wear sexy and
                 revealing clothes.
                 Straight men aren’t provoked into trouble, but we
                 generally will glance at attractive women, even more-so
                 if they are wearing sexy clothing. Neither the author,
                 nor any decent person is arguing that it’s an excuse to
                 sexually harass anyone.
               o
             Natalie says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 First off, claiming there aren’t predators or asshats
                 among the gay scene is false and foolish. But more to the
                 point of this article, unsolicited groping or sexual
                 assault is clearly identified as unacceptable behavior in
                 EVERY scene and she clearly stated that she was not
                 saying that victims of actual assault were asking for it.
                 However, I have seen many reports lately of people
                 equating men simply looking at boobs or butt openly on
                 display with sexual assault or even a man asking for a
                 phone number. Equating those behaviors with assault is a
                 problem. And it’s insulting to those of us who have
                 experienced actual actual assault.
          +
        Paul Ellis says
               o July 10, 2018
            “My appearance is not here for men, and we, as people should
            be able to wear whatever we want without being judged.”
            Yes it is. Your appearance is for *everyone*, because anyone
            who sees you can’t avoid seeing you, yet you insist that men
            are not to see you, but if they do, to form no judgement of
            you whatsoever.
            That’s just passive aggression. Or extreme naïvety.
            Of course people should wear what they want to, but whatever
            you wear provokes a reaction in others, which used to be
            called ‘first impressions’. Choosing what you wear gives you
            some control over those first impressions. You can choose to
            blend in with most people around you, in which case the first
            impression will largely be: ‘That person is like us’, or you
            can choose to look very noticeably different, in which case
            the first impression will probably be: ‘That person is not
            like us. Are they a threat?’
            If you want that investment banking job you’d better turn up
            to the interview in a business suit, whether or not you like
            wearing it. If, on a dark street, you want to be mistaken for
            a mugger, lurk around in a hoodie with the hood well over your
            face. Do you judge young men dressed in this way? I would be
            most surprised if you didn’t. Few people entirely lack the
            self-preservation instinct.
            As for people with very brightly coloured hair? If they’re not
            teenagers, my first impression usually tends to be: ‘Avoid.
            Don’t interact’.
               o
             peanut gallery says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 If I dress in a police officer uniform, people will
                 probably treat me like one. If I dress like a hooker (IE
                 sexually available), should I expect a different result?
          +
        J says
               o July 10, 2018
            >problematic
            Oh boy
          +
        Brian says
               o July 10, 2018
            ” My appearance is not here for men..”
            Irene.
            You are preaching exactly the type of hypocrisy that this
            article talks about. The fact that you refer to ‘beauty’ as a
            physical attribute speaks volumes about your own value system.
            For many women wearing makeup and revealing clothing is an
            attempt, conscious or otherwise to increase their
            attractiveness to potential mates.This is NATURAL, not a cause
            for shame. For others such as yourself it is, apparently an
            expression of pure narcissism.
            Physical self-obsession is not an exclusively female trait.
            Gyms worldwide are full of men who spend most of their spare
            time staring at themselves in full length mirrors, building
            body mass instead of knowledge and character, only to discover
            later in life that, although 20 inch biceps do attract a
            certain type of mate, they don’t qualify a person as a
            valuable member of a modern society. I wouldn’t call this
            delusion toxic though, merely pitiful.
            What is toxic in your argument is your egoistic attempt to
            exempt yourself from the facts of reproductive biology and
            your inability to handle the (intellectual/ animal) duality of
            the human condition. This requires insight, humility and a
            sense of humour.
            Sincerely,
            Brian ( Patriarch in Chief of the Ancient Order of Misogynists
            )
               o
             roccocannoli says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 There’s a difference, though, between “beauty” and
                 “hotness.” Most women naturally want to look beautiful,
                 to attract, to be desired, etc. But dressing for the sake
                 of “hotness” is purely sexual and will elicit sexual
                 responses. A woman in a pretty, modest dress can look
                 perfectly beautiful, and male response to her will be
                 more “whole-bodied” and “whole-brained,” likely involving
                 feelings of protectiveness along with desire. Put that
                 same woman in short shorts, thigh high boots, halter top,
                 and fishnets, and she will have a totally different
                 effect, focused in the genitals. Modern Western culture
                 inculcates hotness rather than beauty.
                    #
                  Natalie says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      Spot on.
                    #
                  Wicked One says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      “Modern Western culture inculcates hotness rather
                      than beauty.” Modern Western culture isn’t a
                      monolith. The sluttiness or hotness of modes of
                      dress are linked to class.
                         @
                       Rob says
                              - July 10, 2018
                           Good point. Class is rarely brought into these
                           discussions, either by identarians or by
                           skeptics. Probably because most of the people
                           on both sides of this issue are in the same
                           socio-economic class – the educated,
                           professional 20 per cent.
          +
        Wicked One says
               o July 10, 2018
            You can never escape judgement, no matter who or what you are.
          +
        Francesca Gonshaw says
               o July 11, 2018
            Yes, I completely agree with you and am sure Amal Clooney
            would too.
   16.
   Grant Dewar says
          + July 10, 2018
       Heather, Your courage is breathtaking, especially after what you
       and Bret have been through at Evergreen. Thanks for providing you
       insight in this highly contended area…. I would just like to add we
       can take the sting out of “toxic” by acknowledging too much of
       anything is toxic.. even clean water…
   17.
   painedumonde says
          + July 10, 2018
       I’ve read through comments after the article; besides the thanks
       and positive mentions, all the critiques seem to sidestep even the
       possibility that toxic feminity, whatever it is, could even exist.
       I’m not one to be able to define it, no sir/ma’am. But as a
       possibility, it must exist surely. And I believe the author has
       made the point clear that the wellspring of that toxicity, whatever
       that is, is that damned DNA. Poison frogs and great apes have it in
       common, it’s just a matter of expression.
       And as a matter of course, Professor, thanks for baring your neck,
       whether on trek in the jungle or day to day in the one that’s
       concrete.
   18.
   Manzell Blakeley says
          + July 10, 2018
       I’m not feeling this article. There is such a thing as toxic
       femininity, but chastising men for gawking is not a great example
       of it. Your student wasn’t toxic – she was just clueless, raised to
       believe that there should never be consequences for her actions and
       that her own desires were sacrosanct.
       I’d suggest the tactic of finding a way to criticize someone
       regardless of their actions (for eg: feeling infantilized when a
       man offers help, while also feeling unfairly dismissed and ignored
       when help is not offered is a decent example) to be a more apt
       example. Or perhaps the most typical one, courtesy of our outspoken
       twitter feminist activist friends: First, claim that men never ask
       why a woman might have perspective X or Y, but when someone does,
       then insist “It’s not my job to teach you”. That’s just
       passive-aggressive bullying (most of these twitter shills are
       grown-up bullies, in my experience. They were just as terrible,
       with a more local pervue. Now, they can be worldwide!
          +
        EK says
               o July 11, 2018
            “– she was just clueless, raised to believe that there should
            never be consequences for her actions and that her own desires
            were sacrosanct.”
            In social situations, why isn’t that a perfectly good
            definition of all toxic people?
          +
        Rachel Welsh says
               o July 18, 2018
            If I was to define toxic femininity, I would mention
            over-nurturing and hypo-agency.
   19.
   Manzell Blakeley says
          + July 10, 2018
       Also, point of clarification:
       I understand toxic masculinity is the negative behaviors by men in
       order to reinforce their position in the male hierarchy. Like, “gay
       rage” where a gay man coming on to a straight man doesn’t elict a
       “thanks, no thanks” response, but potentially a violent one. Most
       men aren’t affronted that someone is attracted to them, they’re
       affronted because being gay (and by extension, being friendly
       towards gay people) might be a sign that they might be gay
       themselves, and therefore less of a man. All types of things that
       guys do to ‘Prove Themselves’ as a man is underthe TM umbrella.
       So basically, that dude cornering you and trying to cop a feel
       wasn’t (by my understanding) exhibiting toxic masculinity, he was
       exhibiting plain toxicness that even most toxic manbros don’t do.
          +
        benita canova (@benitacanova) says
               o July 10, 2018
            Interesting definition of toxic masculinity. It would follow
            that toxic femininity would serve the purpose of reinforcing a
            woman’s position in the female hierarchy. The behavior
            described in the article appears to serve no purpose at all.
            Women are often accused (by men) of being illogical. Has the
            author unwittingly given substance to that assessment?
   20.
   Kate says
          + July 10, 2018
       Heartened to hear I wasn’t the only one who thought this article
       missed the mark. The idea that the term “toxic masculinity” is
       overused and used imprecisely is not a hard sell for me, but the
       misunderstanding of the term makes what might have been an
       interesting opinion piece terribly out of focus.
          +
        LAW says
               o July 10, 2018
            Yeah, that’s my take as well. Hate the term “toxic
            masculinity”, and think there are very clearly dark sides of
            femininity that you could call out as well. I just don’t see
            dressing provocatively as a pressing issue to take on. And in
            general, I don’t like the idea of “toxic” gender labels. Let’s
            just all agree that neither masculinity or femininity is
            toxic!
               o
             nicky says
                    # July 12, 2018
                 I don’t think the author’s example (let alone her point)
                 was about dressing provocatively. The example was about
                 dressing ‘provocatively’ and then being indignant at the
                 gazes gotten.
                 I don’t like the ‘toxic ‘ label either, and I’m
                 convinced, after reading her article, Heather isn’t
                 either.
   21.
   Victor C. says
          + July 10, 2018
       Loved the article Doctor. The only issue I had was with Lions and
       infanticide. I don’t consider it disrurbing behavior. Nature is a
       mean place. C’est la vie!
          +
        nicky says
               o July 12, 2018
            IIRC it was first described in langurs. And yes, it maybe the
            way nature is, but I still find it disturbing.
            Do you seriously do not feel a pang of pity for the cub,
            rolling on it’s back, realising (well I guess) that the game
            is over, before it is clinically dispatched?
            We all wish, due to our social instincts inherent in a highly
            gregarious species (?), nature was not such a callous and
            indifferent place. C’est la vie, mais la vie est une merde!
   22.
   Elissa says
          + July 10, 2018
       This article lacks an adequate social analysis and has built a
       straw man of feminism and the concept of toxic masculinity. That’s
       the problem when an evolutionary biologist ventures into areas
       where some social science might help understand the phenomenon in
       question more clearly. Of course, we are animals and we are
       primates.Our natures have been shaped via evolution, but we are not
       lobsters and we are not tree frogs. Animals do many things that
       humans find objectionable and immoral. We are human animals and we
       are moral animals, having a powerful sense of self-consciousness
       and social awareness. We have the ability to choose to go against
       nature red in tooth and claw — in fact, culture, which is
       malleable, is an adaptation that makes us evolve our behaviours
       with much greater speed than biological evolution. Culture has been
       a prime factor in our success as a species. I find the retreat to
       biological and evolutionary explanations when discussing human
       behaviour to be impoverished, and fails to appreciate all that
       makes humans more than mere animals – culture. Our cultures value
       women for their sexual and reproductive abilities and not their
       character or intelligence. This has been historically true, and
       it’s really only in the past half century that women have made
       strides in realms outside the home, marriage, motherhood or the few
       acceptable occupations for women, such as teaching, nursing and
       retail. Young girls learn from a very early age that they are
       evaluated based on their sexual and physical attractiveness and
       their self esteem plummets at puberty when they are first aware of
       this ubiquitous male gaze. Rather than blame individual women for
       wearing makeup or fashionable clothes that enhances their physical
       attractiveness, maybe focus on why our culture continues to value
       women primarily for their appearance and not their character or
       intelligence. Maybe explore how we can reverse that so that girls
       and women are seen as people first and female second. If society
       told young girls that they are supposed to wear green knit caps,
       oversized orange pumpkin costumes, shave their heads and paint
       their faces purple in order to be attractive and acceptable, guess
       what? You’d walk down the street and see young women in various
       shades of green hats, orange pumpkin costumes and purple faces. For
       most young girls and women, wearing fashionable clothing and makeup
       is not done to attract men as much as to feel that the female is
       “good enough” and conforms to gender identity norms. As to toxic
       masculinity, feminists see it as a negative for men as well as
       women and society in general. This doesn’t mean that all aspects of
       masculinity are toxic; it merely means that there are elements of
       masculinity that are toxic as there are elements of femininity that
       are toxic. Most men do not display these toxic behaviours,
       thankfully. Most women do not display aspects of toxic femininity.
       It’s time for us to stop labelling the entire group with the sins
       of the few, even if those sins are egregious.
          +
        harland0 says
               o July 10, 2018
            Let’s face it, feminism has long since regressed from a mass
            movement that effectively spoke for huge numbers of women into
            a largely academic parlor game in which different cliques
            adopt different niche positions and pour scorn and damnation
            on the heads of their opponents.
            Sadly, it now says little or nothing to or about the wider
            world as most women experience it, instead preferring to
            become a toxic brand from which many young women shy away.
            Women need feminists like fish need bicycles.
          +
        Wilson Hill says
               o July 10, 2018
            I don’t think she’s blaming women for wearing makeup, nor is
            Peterson saying we’re all lobsters, surely it’s not that
            reducible. She’s on board with the legitimate confines of
            applicability, as far as I can tell.
            As a guy the first distinction I was taught was that girls are
            comprised of “sugar and spice and everything nice” while boys
            consist of “rats and snails and puppy dog tails.” The third of
            which isn’t all that disagreeable, granted, but it hardly
            rings of a patriarchal narrative (not that that’s your angle).
            And if we’re talking dress codes, men are clearly more
            anonymized. So guys would generally appreciate more value in
            the sexual arena just as women would appreciate more value in
            the intellectual arena. And I’m with you on your final
            sentiments as far as the integrity of individual engagement,
            but again I wouldn’t say she’s defying that here.
          +
        Colonel Muppet says
               o July 10, 2018
            You are an ideologically possessed fool.
            Men’s sexual response together with most male mammals is
            processed way faster than conscious thought.
            We cannot help looking at attractive women and get stimulated?
            Understand?
            Women will always be, in those initial moments of looking,
            sexual objects.
            Your ideas are the typical, pitiful notions of the deluded
            feminist.
            You think men have it any easier? We have to acquire resources
            and status to get an attractive mate. And many of us commit
            suicide when that fails.
            We both have it hard but in different ways. Except men dont
            whine on the internet about horrible this biological
            predicament is.
            Grow up and adapt to the world rather than try to change the
            unchangeable.
               o
             Bubblecar says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 “We cannot help looking at attractive women and get
                 stimulated?”
                 I can.
                 “Grow up and adapt to the world rather than try to change
                 the unchangeable.”
                 Who says it’s unchangeable? We find out more about the
                 relationship between biology and behaviour all the time,
                 and our ability to modify biology via technology is
                 continually expanding. It may well be possible in the
                 future to modify human nature to get rid of sexuality
                 altogether.
                 At that point we’ll need to ask whether such a primitive
                 characteristic is worth hanging onto, and if so, why.
                 Human reproduction is not dependent on sexual behaviour,
                 the prisons are full of sex offenders, and as you say,
                 there’s a common attitude that “We both have it hard but
                 in different ways”…
                    #
                  Wicked One says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      If you can consciously stop being stimulated
                      Bubblecar I seriously doubt you were stimulated in
                      the first place.
                         @
                       Susan says
                              - July 10, 2018
                           Bubblecar did say he was a gay man.
                    #
                  AA says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      @bubblecar
                      “It may well be possible in the future to modify
                      human nature to get rid of sexuality altogether.”
                      You are deluded if you think science can explain the
                      causal connections between biology and behavior to
                      the extent that sexuality can be discarded.
                      Describing the anatomical sexual functions will get
                      you nowhere close to actually understanding the
                      meaning of sexuality on an ontological level.
               o
             Mazzakim says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 “We both have it hard but in different ways. Except men
                 dont whine on the internet about horrible this biological
                 predicament is.”
                 Except you just did:
                 “You think men have it any easier? We have to acquire
                 resources and status to get an attractive mate. And many
                 of us commit suicide when that fails.”
          +
        Wicked One says
               o July 10, 2018
            “Rather than blame individual women for wearing makeup or
            fashionable clothes that enhances their physical
            attractiveness, maybe focus on why our culture continues to
            value women primarily for their appearance and not their
            character or intelligence.”
            Some women are valued for character and intelligence, with or
            without looks. Someone like Audrey Hepburn became an icon for
            more than her (exceptionally) pretty face and no-one voted for
            Angela Merkel based on her looks.
            However, it isn’t a cultural reason that men value women
            particularly for looks. That’s a biological urge. That was the
            point she was making. If you flaunt it they will look. Men are
            also valued based on appearance, in particular height.
               o
             EK says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 Well, the Germans do call Angela “Mutti” (mother). I
                 wouldn’t bet her looks don’t have something to do with
                 the votes cast for her by the CDU in the Bundestag.
                 Besides, the Germans use a proportional election scheme
                 and very few Germans actually get to pull the lever for
                 Mutti Merkel, that should be obvious; the woman has made
                 some very bad decisions over the last 5 years.
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 10, 2018
            “Our cultures value women for their sexual and reproductive
            abilities and not their character or intelligence. This has
            been historically true”
            That isn’t, in fact, true. It is a drastic oversimplification
            made by extreme feminists. The great female figures of the
            Bible, for example, are known for their wisdom and character,
            and are presented as role models for those, not their looks.
            Of course until recently, reproductive abilities were
            crucially important to the survival of the family, the tribe,
            the nation, and so were valued accordingly, and that was
            women,s unique characteristics, they could give birth to other
            humans, a valued characteristic.
            Males were valued for their physical strength, courage,
            cunning, strategic thinking, i.e. their capacity to defend the
            family, tribe or nation.
            Both were valued for their character and wisdom in juggling
            the different constraints of their environments, physical and
            social, and their capacity for hard, productive work.
            It is only recently, in our own societies, that individuals
            have been valued for their individual uniqueness and
            originality, rather than for how much they contribute to the
            wider group’s wellbeing.
               o
             J.Ryall says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Why don’t we value women for their character and
                 intelligence? We do, actually. But in the mating game,
                 looks are the source of initial attraction. Whether you
                 like it or not, men will primarily be drawn to you
                 because we find you physically attractive. We are largely
                 visual–hence, why we are the main consumers of porn. What
                 separates a fling from a potential long term partner,
                 though, is intellectual compatibility (for me, anyway).
                 As much as women try to deny it, they are also the same.
                 Given two equally intelligent, kind, funny, etc. men,
                 they will pick the one they find “hotter”. That’s what
                 separates friends from lovers.
                    #
                  Just Me says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      True, there is a reason the Prince in fairy tales is
                      always handsome.
                      There is a reason in the US, anyway, the ideal man
                      is always “tall, dark and handsome”.
                      Looks matter to women, too.
          +
        nicky says
               o July 12, 2018
            “Animals do many things that humans find objectionable and
            immoral”, well I’d say that humans do many things that hummans
            etc. The torture instruments just designed for that are
            testimony.
            But the is a minor point.
            I think that social ‘science’ is way more culpable of
            neglecting biology than evolutionary biology is culpable of
            neglecting ‘culture’.
            Your example ” If society told young girls that they are
            supposed to wear green knit caps, oversized orange pumpkin
            costumes, shave their heads and paint their faces purple in
            order to be attractive and acceptable, guess what? You’d walk
            down the street and see young women in various shades of green
            hats, orange pumpkin costumes and purple faces.” is typical.
            No, I do not think so, possibly shaved head or purple face,
            but definitely not orange pumpkin costumes.
            There are traits that males find nearly universally attractive
            in women and the ‘taille’ (a modicum of hip/waist ratio) is
            definitely one of them. Culture goes just so far, Sexual
            jealousy? Lust after a ‘stiff booty’? Attraction to youth? Do
            you seriously think that can be ‘cultured’ out of males? And
            vice versa, there are certainly things women look for in
            males, regardless of culture.
   23.
   harland0 says
          + July 10, 2018
       https://youtu.be/Dg6j7tpk7m0?t=2039
       Here’s an amazing breakdown, by a woman, on what Animus possession
       is, and how it hijacks the minds of women
       Animus Possession is when a woman, who is angry at legitimately bad
       men, then talks to good men with all the anger she has for the bad
       men. It’s a false transference of negative emotion to people who
       don’t deserve it.
   24.
   Reading Nomad says
          + July 10, 2018
       @ Elissa
       I hear what you are trying to say. When you say:
       “If society told young girls that they are supposed to wear green
       knit caps, oversized orange pumpkin costumes…”
       And
       “…fashionable clothing and makeup is not done to attract men as
       much as to feel that the female is “good enough” and conforms to
       gender identity norms.”
       But the reason why women try to look attractive is largely to
       attract a partner and it is a biologically driven. What you
       describe is how this is manifested. Sure, fashion tastes change but
       what doesn’t changed is the need to look attractive. And this is
       true for all human societies on earth. So why is it that there
       never has been a culture where looking good wasn’t important?
       Again to your second point, these norms are controlled and dictated
       mostly by women themselves. These gender identity norms across the
       world in all cultures did not spring out of thin air, rather are
       biologically driven for the same purpose.
       Males who develop more of a feminine psychology and females with
       more masculine traits equally behave according to the above.
          +
        Becky says
               o July 14, 2018
            So since I have a mate and am not looking for a mate, what am
            I allowed to wear? I don’t want to have to give up this closet
            full of dresses that are each a gorgeous work of art, but I
            suppose since humans are such a simple minded species, I must.
            But I don’t know what a human female is supposed to wear to
            indicate “I am not looking for a partner.” Can you show me
            example photos of acceptable outfits? I also have a job, so
            they would need to meet “professional standards” as well as
            being comfortable.
               o
             Reading Nomad says
                    # July 14, 2018
                 @ Becky
                 Lol! Nice! But no… it has got nothing to with whether you
                 are consciously looking for a mate or not. Your
                 biological and psychological make is geared towards sex.
                 “But I don’t know what a human female is supposed to wear
                 to indicate “I am not looking for a partner.””
                 Doesn’t work that way. Have you given up on sex? Or
                 checking out other humans [men, women or both]? A “lurch”
                 somewhere before you get a conscious grip on your self?
                 “Can you show me example photos of acceptable outfits?”
                 Oh yes!
                 http://www.thetinyman.in/2015/12/funny-niqab-and-burka-pi
                 ctures.html
                 Oh be careful though… apparently that is a powerful
                 fetish! Errrrrrr…..
                    #
                  Becky says
                         @ July 15, 2018
                      So because my spouse and I are not celibate, that
                      means I subconsciously want to have sex with
                      everyone? I can accept that some individuals might
                      be rabid creatures, but not all of us are.
                      *Covers drink and walks away to the furthest edge of
                      the room.*
                         @
                       Reading Nomad says
                              - July 15, 2018
                           @ Becky
                           “that means I subconsciously want to have sex
                           with everyone?”
                           What? Everyone!? No. Just because you are with
                           someone the old machinery doesn’t pack up. The
                           conscious mind has hell of lot of control over
                           the body – your natural instincts. But not
                           absolute. So you don’t stop scoping the
                           potential to find those who are suitable.
                           I don’t know how much of that translates to
                           “actively” wanting to have sex with others
                           irrespective of being in a relationship or not.
                           “I can accept that some individuals might be
                           rabid creatures, but not all of us are.”
                           It isn’t about that though is it? We are, like
                           other sexual animals, geared towards
                           procreation. It is a powerful meaning of life –
                           genetic survival. Yes, there is part of us that
                           goes well beyond mere “lust” to forming deeper
                           & longer lasting “love” based relationships.
                           But the basic natural instinct is always there.
                           One’s biochemical functions do not just shut
                           down without reason.
                           This is why if love ends people can move on. Or
                           if we lose a partner through death. Or one can
                           still love a partner and still be overcome by
                           lust and seek others.
   25.
   Elissa says
          + July 10, 2018
       “But the reason why women try to look attractive is largely to
       attract a partner and it is a biologically driven.” So, women stop
       wearing makeup and fashionable clothing once they get married and
       reproduce?
       You’ve made a sweeping generalization. Women wear fashionable
       clothes and makeup for a variety of reasons, some due to a desire
       to be attractive, yes, but some is just to fit in to a cultural
       norm, some to appear appropriate for their gender, occupation, etc.
       It’s not all about men and biological reproduction, in other words.
       It’s not all about mating and sexual attractiveness.
       That’s biological reductionism and is a fallacy in addition to
       being bad logic and reasoning.
       We have this thing called culture. It is, as Brett Weinstein says,
       the software to biology’s hardware. It’s much more malleable than
       biology. In fact, it can completely escape its biological origins
       and take on a meaning completely abstracted from biology. The
       content and purpose of dress and makeup varies with history,
       culture and with a woman’s age and situation.
       You can’t tell me you think a 12 year old girl is wearing hi-tops
       and overalls (or whatever the fashion is) is to attract a mate.
       Those teens are busy wondering what their best friend thinks of
       them, or whether they look stupid or some other social peer group
       issue. When we were young teens, we used to call each other up the
       night before school to check what the others were going to wear the
       next day. It was to fit in with other girls, not to attract a mate.
       We were thinking of other girls and fitting in, not what the boys
       thought. We didn’t even talk to boys at that point.
       An 80 YO woman is not wearing lipstick to attract a mate so she can
       reproduce. She’s already done so. She may still have a mate. The 80
       YO is just trying to look the way she’s always looked, and that
       means wearing lipstick because wearing lipstick is what women do to
       look appropriate to their gender norms, which are cultural and
       shift with fashion trends.
       Again, this biological reductionism is bad science and bad
       reasoning.
          +
        John McCormick says
               o July 10, 2018
            @Elissa
            A twelve-year-old girl need know nothing about her body’s
            reproductive mission to obey it. None of us need to understand
            much of anything to reproduce. Culture merely provides
            additional criteria upon which we judge another’s suitability
            for mating or cooperation and is itself a product of
            biological adaptation to environment.
            Attempting to contradict facts based the study of many
            millions of years of evolution with a couple of decades of
            personal and uninformed experience indicates miseducation and
            indoctrination.
            Humans are animals. The study of humans requires the study of
            animals. Statements to the contrary are statements of
            religious belief.
               o
             EK says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 Years ago, in answer to the silly question: “Why is a
                 pilot better than a Tomahawk missile?”
                 One of the answers was: Pilots can be easily replaced
                 using only unskilled labor.
          +
        Colonel Muppet says
               o July 10, 2018
            Idiotic tautology going on here – typical of a sad post modern
            education.
            If old women wear make up then its just habit formed around
            the culture of mating.
            If young girls dress up then its in preparation for mating
            later in life.
            If a married woman dresses up then its to continue to appeal
            to her husband – to attempt to prevent him from straying.
            All biological at source
          +
        Reading Nomad says
               o July 10, 2018
            @ Elissa
            ” Those teens are busy wondering what their best friend thinks
            of them, or whether they look stupid or some other social peer
            group issue. When we were young teens, we used to call each
            other up the night before school to check what the others were
            going to wear the next day. It was to fit in with other girls,
            not to attract a mate.”
            Yes it is! You have described it perfectly here. You just
            refuse to see it. I guess ideology.
            “this biological reductionism is bad science and bad
            reasoning.”
            Says who? I think you will find feminist theorists such as
            Judith Butler wholly unqualified to make such claims.
            “The 80 YO is just trying to look the way she’s always looked”
            In other words it has become a habit. Yet the desire is still
            to look attractive. And sexual drive does not automatically
            die down in such old age!
            ” is what women do to look appropriate to their gender norms”
            Yes! And even being aware of this has not led us to abandon
            the conformity. In droves men and women stick to it. Why do
            you think that is?
          +
        Jen W. says
               o July 10, 2018
            @Elissa,
            Your arguments are just blame deflection. While much more
            subtle, the author was speaking to exactly this. Toxic
            femininity being a female’s insistence that any negative
            consequences she faces are the fault of something else. That
            she need not take any personal responsibility for any negative
            consequences of her actions at all, but insist that it’s
            everybody else’s fault, whether that’s society at large or
            another specific individual. Perhaps choosing to focus on how
            one dresses was not the greatest way of addressing this issue
            by the author, but from what I can tell, that is what Dr.
            Heying was trying to talk about.
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 10, 2018
            Women dress not just to attract a mate, of course culture is
            involved, but part of the culture is influenced by biological
            realities.
            Which produces a female hierarchy separate from a male
            hierarchy.
            And one aspect of the female hierarchy is women evaluating
            each other as rivals in the mating game, and the women who can
            best attract quality the sexual attention of quality males are
            at the top of that hierarchy. They can attract more resources
            for themselves, and eventually for their children.
            So there is competition on that among women, and even when
            some women give up early, or figure once married they don,t
            have to try anymore, or they are too old to care anymore, it
            is there.
            Some women like some men are more competitive than others, and
            will want to look good even when it doesn’t matter socially,
            just for their own self-esteem, i.e. to reassure themselves
            that they are still high in the hierarchy and could still
            attract a quality male if they wanted to.
            Of course some women decide consciously to renounce competing
            in that hierarchy and concentrate on other aspects of life,
            for religious or ideological reasons (nuns, lesbians, etc.),
            or they just have plenty of other sources of high self-esteem
            and don’t need one more.
               o
             Just Me says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Let me elaborate on “They can attract more resources for
                 themselves, and eventually for their children.”
                 The women who attract the high status males, first, get
                 to do more fun things that are prized in society: go to
                 expensive, glamourous events, drive around in fancy cars,
                 get expensive gifts of jewelry, clothes, get taken on
                 trips.
                 When they marry one, they also get a higher standard of
                 living, for themselves and their children.
                 That does not go unnoticed. Some women brush that off for
                 various reasons, some get envious and resentful, but it
                 is definitely a factor in how and why women evaluate each
                 other on a hierarchy of looks.
                 There are other female hierarchies as well of course,
                 like women judging each other on how good a mother their
                 are…
                    #
                  Just Me says
                         @ July 10, 2018
                      Another thought about women, attractiveness, and
                      female social hierarchies.
                      Although there re downsides to emphasizing women’s
                      sexual attractiveness, let’s not forget that it
                      provides a lot of women with a valuable asset and
                      bargaining chip in relationships with men, and the
                      equivalent of men’s superior physical strnght on the
                      job market.
                      Before industrialization and modernity, most men and
                      women didn’t ahave much freedom for “personal
                      expression”. Unless they were part of the noble
                      class, women were tied to the family, and men had a
                      limited number of choices of how to provide for that
                      family. They were peasants, farmers, or artisans
                      doing what their fathers had done, working with
                      their hands and muscles in their village or on the
                      farm.
                      With industrialisation, ordinary men and women could
                      get jobs in factories. With modernity and new
                      technologies though, women could get jobs doing
                      clerical work in offices, which was more desirable
                      than working on the farm or in factories, and gave
                      them some independence.
                      Then came The Movies – Hollywood, and the glamour
                      industry, and we were off to the races, so to speak.
                      Women could monetize their looks beyond just getting
                      a rich husband or lover.
                      They could become movie stars, or models, and become
                      independently wealthy and lead glamourous lives on
                      their own. From that came even more valuing of
                      women,s looks, and an industry promising to make
                      even plain women beautiful and glamourous. More and
                      more women dreamed of that kind of life.
                      That has reached an apogee in today’s world where
                      one can become a youtube or Instagram star,
                      influencer, etc. based on one’s looks, beauty tips,
                      etc.
                      Which, in suspect, is not unrelated to the whole MTF
                      trans phenomenon. when being a beautiful female
                      carries such social admiration and power, highly
                      status-conscious males become envious of beautiful
                      women’s social and emotional power at a very early
                      age, particularly if they are also getting the
                      message that masculinity is devalued…
                    #
                  Becky says
                         @ July 14, 2018
                      So then why are there so many lesbians who look
                      fabulous if they have renounced this competition in
                      the hierarchy?
                      What about someone like me who was born high status
                      and is overflowing with resources?
                      I know a lot of men like to think that we women are
                      just subconsciously obsessed with them, but really,
                      but believe it or not, sometimes our actions aren’t
                      all about them.
          +
        J.Ryall says
               o July 10, 2018
            True, the 12 year old may not be trying to attract a mate
            (though the 12 year olds I went to school with were very much
            interested in boys). However, learning to fit in is a key part
            of adolescence. Think about it: how many of those weird
            lonerish kids were successful at getting
            girlfriends/boyfriends?
            Before you get the wrong idea, let me clarify: there is more
            to life than having a partner, and those weird lonerish kids
            sometimes go on to do amazing things (which leads to them
            being viewed as desirable).
            You can try to discredit the biological argument all you want,
            but it remains true that humans, like all animals, are here to
            do three things: eat (i.e. self-preservation), pass on our
            genetics, and then die to make way for future generations.
            Everything else is either in service to those ends or simply
            frills.
   26.
   Rene says
          + July 10, 2018
       Fantastic article. Women and men alike, can learn much from Ms.
       Heying.
   27.
   JEA says
          + July 10, 2018
       Compare:
       “Any claim made by a member of an historically oppressed group is
       unquestionably true. Questioning claims is, itself, an act of
       oppression.”
       “[T]he Belief that there are such Beings as Witches is so Essential
       a Part of the Catholic Faith that Obstinacy to maintain the
       Opposite Opinion manifestly savours of Heresy.” –Malleus
       Maleficarum
       Assuming the truth of the first statement, I’m sure I’m not the
       only one that sees a parallel. The result of allowing a philosophy
       to morph into dogma. (Apologies for playing Captain Obvious…)
          +
        TarsTarkas says
               o July 10, 2018
            A heretic! A heretic! Burn the witch! Burn the witch!
          +
        Emblem14 says
               o July 10, 2018
            There should be a custom that anyone who proposes an argument
            that says questioning the argument automatically proves the
            argument, is simply ignored. It shouldn’t matter what the
            argument is. It’s just too stupid to spend time on.
          +
        roccocannoli says
               o July 10, 2018
            — except the Malleus Maleficarum was not consistent with the
            Catholic Faith, and was condemned by the Church. But then, the
            Church’s condemning it would likely also be seen as rooted in
            “dogma” and, therefore, a bad thing. The Church never wins.
   28.
   Loli says
          + July 10, 2018
       Thankyou very much.
   29.
   John McCormick says
          + July 10, 2018
       One great thing about articles like this is that comments show how
       many people cling to an essentially religious idea of the origins
       of humans. (I have self-professed atheist friends who are more
       religious than some churchgoers). Although they have learned that
       expressing belief or acceptance of evolution through natural
       selection is essential to being taken seriously, everything they
       say indicates that they neither believe it nor understand it.
       Fifty thousand years of religion is not going to be overcome in a
       few hundred years of reason, that is for sure.
       Humans are animals, and the foundations of understanding animals
       and their behavior is in Biology. All else is religion.
          +
        Elissa says
               o July 10, 2018
            Sorry, but no. Biology is one discipline in the sciences. It
            doesn’t explain – by a long shot – the social and cultural
            aspects of human civilization. Science is a means of producing
            knowledge of the physical world. Biology is a way of
            understanding life. There is a huge difference between humans
            and our next closest relatives (Bonobos) or other non-human
            non-primate animals that have some semblance of
            self-consciousness. Those differences matter and can’t be
            fully explained through reference to biology or physics or
            chemistry. Consciousness matters. It is an emergent property
            of biology but it can’t be fully explained via biology. The
            physical sciences alone are inadequate. We need the social
            sciences, such as history and sociology and political science
            and psychology to understand humans. Not everything can be
            reduced down to genes and evolution, except in the most
            reductionist logic.
               o
             Colonel Muppet says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Nah, a lot of it comes down to the biology I’m afraid.
                 The hierarchies are blends of environmental resources and
                 biology and the culture builds from that over time. But
                 the baseline is still the same and always will be
               o
             Reading Nomad says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 @ Elissa
                 “Those differences matter and can’t be fully explained
                 through reference to biology or physics or chemistry.”
                 Can’t they? Well how else are you explaining them? Our
                 more evolved brain is due to biology.
                 “It is an emergent property of biology but it can’t be
                 fully explained via biology. ”
                 Only because our knowledge so far is inadequate and
                 lacking.
                 “We need the social sciences, such as history and
                 sociology and political science and psychology to
                 understand humans.”
                 Yes. But you are confusing two things:
                 * What humans are
                 VS
                 * What humans do
                 “Not everything can be reduced down to genes and
                 evolution”
                 Otherwise broadly known as nature. Yes it can. Where else
                 do we come from. There is no other explanation!
               o
             John McCormick says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 @Elissa
                 The social sciences are not scientific. They are
                 philosophical. They use myth, history, literary themes,
                 and intuition to construct narratives that interpret
                 observations of the human condition into something that
                 sounds convincing to a selected audience. However, some
                 of them have chosen to put their practice on the firm
                 foundation of the fundamental laws of biology.
                 Biology, Zoology, and Ethology would be a lot farther in
                 being able to explain human behavior if universities were
                 not dominated by social scientists and humanities
                 “scholars” who threaten scientists who study human
                 behavior and who indoctrinate students to believe that
                 cognition is explainable only by unreformed social
                 scientists.
                 Brains and nervous systems are matter. Matter is
                 physical. Please take a qualitative course of some kind
                 concerning quantum mechanics and its implications for
                 cognition.
                 BTW, eugenics programs were carried out almost entirely
                 by social scientists and medical doctors. While science
                 is concerned with understanding the universe the way it
                 is, social science is concerned with correction of human
                 behavior in accordance with progressivist values.
                 Progressivism grew from the Great Awakening, yet another
                 “born again” movement among anglophone Protestants.
                 “Toxic masculinity” is merely another way of talking
                 about “males enthusiastically doing the devil’s work.”
                    #
                  Becky says
                         @ July 14, 2018
                      @John McCormick
                      “The social sciences are not scientific. They are
                      philosophical. They use myth, history, literary
                      themes, and intuition to construct narratives that
                      interpret observations of the human condition into
                      something that sounds convincing to a selected
                      audience.”
                      What social sciences are you talking about? I feel
                      like a lot of people on here have a very limited
                      understanding of what the social sciences actually
                      do. Sociology, anthropology, archaeology,
                      psychology, etc. all use scientific method. It’s not
                      philosophical just because they may look at the
                      philosophies of different cultures.
               o
             Razz says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Why so? Because youbsay it must be so? How about this for
                 a hypothesis…culture is a different method of evolution.
                 Instead of a biological process involving modification
                 through reproductive success it is a method for dealing
                 with environmental realities that can be instantly shared
                 through language and knowledge. The near infinite
                 possibilities are held within a matrix of tradition and
                 cultural expressions. This serves as a well that human
                 beings use to innovate and adapt far more swiftly that
                 wvolution which has something like a 1% success rate.
                 Still used for exactly the same essential success
                 measures as we would ascribe to biological evolution.
                 Which ultimately seems to encompass an escape from that
                 brutal process.
          +
        dirk says
               o July 10, 2018
            If you )John) consider culture and ideology as certain forms
            of religion (as does Yuval Harari), then you are right, maybe.
            Peterson bets on the crustaceae, and even uses them as a
            symbol of humanity.
               o
             EK says
                    # July 11, 2018
                 The chorus of “The Song of the Evolutionary Biologist.”
                 (Sung to the tune of “It’s a Long Way to Tipperary”)
                 It’s a long way from amphioxus
                 It’s a long way to us.
                 It’s a long way from amphioxus
                 To the meanest human cuss.
                 So goodbye to fins and gillslits
                 Hello lungs and hair,
                 It’s a long, long way from amphioxus
                 But we all came from there.
                 Read more:
                 https://muzikum.eu/en/123-26404-466516/unknown/its-a-long
                 -
   30.
   Bonos diablos says
          + July 10, 2018
       Mark Wahlberg/Chris Hemsworth (or any Hollywood heartthrob) could
       make a sleazy comment and get away with it, but YOU can’t gaze at
       my tits or arse. An annoying hypocritical double standard
   31.
   Baron baron says
          + July 10, 2018
       thank you great article
   32.
   Colonel Muppet says
          + July 10, 2018
       A few extra lessons at school would solve it all. Men’s sexual
       response is subconscious – it happens at a fraction if the speed of
       conscious thought, in some of the oldest brain structures –
       amygdala and hypothalamus.
       Telling kids we are all the same in our libido and in our desires
       is borderline criminal. More post modern progressive dogshit
       ruining any understanding between the sexes is disgraceful.
   33.
   J says
          + July 10, 2018
       I really wanted to love this piece, but I feel like it missed the
       mark at the beginning. To be clear, no one reviles the misandrist,
       deranged version of feminism that has become the norm more than I
       do. I will consistently point out the fact that toxic masculinity
       is used as the catchall for problems that harm men, while feminists
       will *never* use the term toxic femininity to explain women’s
       disadvantages and instead fight for systemic changes.
       However, for all their faults, I have to say that I don’t see them
       using the former term to describe something biologically intrinsic
       in men. Most of them don’t even think there are differences between
       men and women above the neck to begin with. They do love to berate
       and demonize men for our behavior, but the narrative is that we’re
       a product of a culture that makes us think we’re entitled to be
       violent or some similar nonsense. It’s absolute drivel, but we have
       to address the argument for what it is.
       That being said, I think your main example of toxic femininity is a
       very sound one. But I feel that this plays into a larger construct
       of femininity where women are supposed to be passive victims who
       cannot control their own fate, and it must always be men who
       change. Feminists seem to buy into this as well, just like how they
       pretend to care about the “damsel in distress” trope while milking
       it for all its worth. There are many additional examples I’d like
       to have seen such as women being reluctant to negotiate salaries,
       spend more time at work or assert themselves in general being
       addressed as forms of toxic femininity so that we can get rid of
       the “patriarchy” scapegoat.
   34.
   dirk says
          + July 10, 2018
       It’s a pity that only certain layers of society are reacting here.
       I would have liked to know the comments of muslims (moderate ,
       civilized ones). What they think of women dress norms, codes and
       morals. I fear the worst, for us unimaginable even.
          +
        EK says
               o July 11, 2018
            See: Rotherham.
   35.
   Tom says
          + July 10, 2018
       I’m sure Heather is well respected and knowledgeable in her field,
       but this article falls at the first hurdle. Masculinity /= men.
       Masculinity is a social construct, not a biological one. I know
       it’s more complex than that, but our behaviours are influenced by
       society as well as our genetic makeup. Likely more the former.
          +
        dirk says
               o July 10, 2018
            Male= biological
            Masculine= cultural/human
            See also in Sapiens, Yuval Harari, pg 167:
            female; ovaries, can produce milk etc
            Woman (historic,ancient Athens): can’t decide for herself who
            to marry
            Woman (now, in Athens, the West): can decide for herself who .
          +
        Paul Ellis says
               o July 10, 2018
            @Tom
            “Masculinity is a social construct, not a biological one.”
            Try telling that to your hormones. I tried telling mine, but
            they wouldn’t listen.
            If I see an attractive person I can choose not to act on my
            instinctual reaction to them: that’s voluntary suppression. If
            I convince myself I didn’t have an instinctual reaction in the
            first place, that’s repression. If I’m told never to act under
            any circumstances, that’s oppression. If I’m instructed that
            my instinctual reaction itself, unacted upon, is intolerable,
            that’s totalitarianism.
          +
        Rob says
               o July 10, 2018
            Nobody has argued we’re influenced only by biology. Ever. We
            do, however, see lots of people people deny that biology plays
            any role in our behaviour.
            The fact is that biology and culture both play a role. And
            pretending we aren’t animals, like any other, with powerful
            innate dispositions and impulses, is to be as defiantly
            ignorant of science as creationists are.
            For example, we crave salt and sugar. Are those innate
            cravings exploited in unhealthy ways? Yes. Would it be an
            effective health strategy to pretend cravings for salt and
            sugar are simply a social construct that we can choose to
            dispel? Nope.
   36. Pingback: Links 7/10/18 | naked capitalism | Me Stock Broker
   37. Pingback: Links 7/10/18 | naked capitalism – Courtier en Bourse
   38.
   samuelthefifth says
          + July 10, 2018
       I find this article’s frame much too limiting, because she sees
       toxic femininity purely as something that women do to men using
       their sexual power, and only if they’re hot. There is a much larger
       “Mean Girls” routine, which women use on each other too:
       1) Women excel at using social warfare on each other, and they
       don’t need men to do so. Controlling information, damaging people’s
       reputations, setting people against each other, calling each other
       sluts and bitches, using victimhood as leverage, running to the
       nearest authority, etc. Women are far more likely to pursue their
       grudges this way than men, who just prefer to fight it out openly.
       2) Women excel at violence-by-proxy, by recruiting men (and
       authority figures in general) to defend themselves against other
       men. Usually this is done by calling a man a pussy if he _doesn’t_
       fight. So it’s not about denying men strength, it’s denying men the
       ability to use their strength for their own interests rather than
       that of women.
       3) Women can use womanhood as a collective shield, generalizing
       their own interests and preferences as being universal. It’s a sort
       of weaponized in-group bias, and this is what a lot of contemporary
       feminism has turned into. Intersectionality has generalize this to
       other categories, where the experience of a black person, or an
       LGBT, or an immigrant, is transformed from anecdote into data.
       This leads to some pretty pervasive blind spots. One example is the
       moral panic about online harassment. It never seems to occur that
       maybe anonymous trolls could be women, they’re always implicitly
       male… But, if you look at e.g. what kinds of discussion happen in
       male-oriented spaces, it’s predominantly thing- or
       activity-oriented (such as video games, woodworking, cars, etc.).
       When women gather, it’s people oriented. If you look at e.g.
       “lolcow forums” like Kiwifarms, they strike me as very
       female-dominated. Not only do they enjoy slagging people off for
       fun, but they do this persistently, with months or even years long
       threads dedicated to specific individuals. This is not
       stereotypically male behavior: men will generally fight it out
       openly, and then let it go, while women will avoid direct conflict,
       but let it drag on indefinitely.
          +
        OleK says
               o July 10, 2018
            “I find this article’s frame much too limiting, because she
            sees toxic femininity purely as something that women do to men
            using their sexual power, and only if they’re hot.”
            I don’t think Heather thinks this or would deny any of your
            additional points. I think she just chose to focus on the
            points she did for the sake of brevity for the article.
               o
             Just Me says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Olek-
                 “I don’t think Heather thinks this or would deny any of
                 your additional points. I think she just chose to focus
                 on the points she did for the sake of brevity for the
                 article.”
                 Exactly, and because she is reacting to the whole #MeToo
                 movement and Peterson bein under attack for his comments
                 about makeup in the workplace.
                 I look forward to additional articles dealing with other
                 aspects of “toxic femininity”.
          +
        marms. says
               o July 10, 2018
            Samuel: What you describe is “ghetto” behaviour. Think about
            it.
            And: Re Heather’s solution to it all, “wear more clothes” and
            other arguments of that ilk, is blaming the women for men’s
            bad behaviour. If that were true, we wouldn’t have seen
            Lesbians and old women being beaten and dragged around at
            various gatherings. Lesbians nor elderly women not exactly
            known for decollatage and six inch fuck me shoes. We’d also
            not have men trolling for five-year old children to rape, or
            elderly nursing home residents being raped by male caregivers.
            Men beat, assault, and rape at will. No class of female left
            safe.
               o
             Just Me says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Here we have one of those feminists who aren’t supposed
                 to exist, folks – “Men beat, assault, and rape at will.
                 No class of female left safe.”
                 And no one is saying it’s *all* about the clothes, marms.
               o
             david says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 “Men beat, assault, and rape at will. No class of female
                 left safe.”
                 Oh dear. SOME men do. Particularly on the Subcontinent,
                 it seems, and also notably in an organised way in some
                 British cities. That said, some of the Subcontinental
                 rapists have recently been executed for what they did, so
                 perhaps ‘at will’ has its limits.
                 SOME women also do similar things, as, no doubt, do SOME
                 people of indeterminate gender. I’ve read that lesbian
                 relationships feature the most domestic violence. I
                 wonder whether a culture of habitual paranoiac projection
                 might have anything to do with this?
                 Given the size of the human population, statistically
                 there will always be SOME people who behave abominably,
                 and as a result, absolute safety for all is impossible.
                 As another poster has written: ‘The very communities
                 where ‘toxic masculinity’ is being discussed most are the
                 communities where the men are, in my experience,
                 compassionate, egalitarian, and not at all toxic.’
                 The acute problems lie elsewhere, in other cultures. Care
                 to address them?
                    #
                  marms says
                         @ July 11, 2018
                      Saying men includes saying some, Black, Indigenous,
                      disabled, gingers, etc. Some is an adjective. he
                      operative word is men. I’m not used to being
                      redundant. I’ll try harder.
                         @
                       david says
                              - July 11, 2018
                           @marms
                           If I understand your statement – I’m not sure
                           that I do – then it looks like another motte
                           and bailey to me. Explaining yourself clearly
                           without sweeping generalisations is not
                           ‘redundancy’, if that’s what you meant.
                         @
                       ga gamba says
                              - July 12, 2018
                           Oh, OK. Why don’t you test that out by
                           commenting in a forum? Try any of these.
                           Blacks are violent.
                           Jews are stingy.
                           Asians are sly.
                           Women are irrational.
                           And when the howls of protest and outrage start
                           then add another comment, “Saying ______
                           includes saying some,” and see how it’s
                           received. Do so quickly before your account is
                           banned and your comment deleted.
                           I’m old enough to recall when “not all” was
                           about black people. It was a justified
                           objection then as are the “not all” ones are
                           today.
                           If you’re too lazy or dogmatic to write and say
                           some then the problem is you or the ideology
                           you’re beholden to. The objections and
                           criticisms you receive are earned and well
                           deserved.
                         @
                       marms says
                              - July 15, 2018
                           Men rape.
                           https://archiveofthebitingbeaver.wordpress.com/
                           2008/05/31/the-rapist-checklist-repost/
                         @
                       david says
                              - July 15, 2018
                           @marms
                           ‘Men rape.
                           https://archiveofthebitingbeaver.wordpress.com/
                           2008/05/31/the-rapist-checklist-repost/‘
                           Apparently, so do women:
                           There. Now, where does this get us? To ‘humans
                           rape’, it seems. *All* humans are theoretically
                           capable of *any* behaviour, but it seems *most*
                           humans don’t do the really bad stuff, such as
                           rape.
                           That’s why qualifiers are necessary: they makes
                           your statements more reasonable and plausible.
                           If they undermine your ideology, then I think
                           your ideology is probably one of organised,
                           habitual paranoiac projection. Taking
                           responsibility for your own ‘dark side’
                           impulses rather than constantly projecting them
                           on others requires maturity.
                         @
                       david says
                              - July 15, 2018
                           I don’t know why my ‘women rape’ link wasn’t
                           posted:
                           https://duckduckgo.com/?q=female+rapists&t=osx&
                           ia=web
          +
        Susan says
               o July 10, 2018
            Based on the title, I thought the piece was going to be about
            “mean girls”-snarkiness, shunning, reputation damage. That has
            been my personal experience of toxic femininity as both a
            perpetrator and a victim starting about the age of 12. Of
            course, feminists are as good or better at it as anyone if one
            should stray from the conventional wisdom of the feminist
            line.
   39. Pingback: WANTED: Toxic White Female | Loki's Revenge
   40.
   jahmayakessler says
          + July 10, 2018
       I noticed so much tension in my body as I began to read this. But
       as I was able to breath through that, what I found here was a lot
       of relief in your words. I absolutely love the way this balances
       the larger #metoo conversation that’s been taking place for the
       last year. A friend sent me this after conversing about how
       masculine and feminine both have shadow aspects of their power. We
       were discussing how there is the potential for a beautiful dance to
       take place where pursuit can dance with enticement. There can be
       something natural and beautiful about the place where the masculine
       dignity and power can meet the complexity and subtlety of feminine
       humility and submission. And just because I use the words masculine
       and feminine doesn’t mean I’m boxing men or women as having to be
       either, the gender of sex is fluid, and the roles of the dance can
       take place on either side. With each power there is in turn a
       shadow way in which these powers can be used. This article so
       perfectly captures this truth.
       I loved this article and it feels like an extremely brave addition
       to the conversation. I love that it brings equanimity and composure
       to a conversation that has been, in many ways overdue and
       unquestionably righteous, but also at times tearing us apart. If
       everyone could take in what’s been said here, I believe it actually
       has the power to bring us closer. And wouldn’t that be one of the
       brightest possible outcomes of any movement?
       Thank you so much for this.
   41.
   David says
          + July 10, 2018
       Since the people who most loudly decry toxic masculinity also would
       have us accept infinite genders, does that mean we can now identify
       “toxic non-binaries” and “toxic queer”?
   42.
   Kels says
          + July 10, 2018
       COMPLETE strawman argument. Either that, or the author is clueless.
       Hint: No one is saying all men are toxic. “Toxic masculinity”
       refers to when traits like aggression (male trait that the author
       concedes) get out of hand.
       Your desperate dogma is showing, Heather.
          +
        Rob says
               o July 10, 2018
            The term toxic masculinity is used to malign entire
            communities, or society in general, not just the men who it
            applies to. More men than women enter STEM fields? Toxic
            masculinity at work. More men than women read science fiction?
            Toxic masculinity must be the culprit. A roleplaying game
            group is made up entirely of men? Toxic masculinity strikes
            again.
          +
        Paul Ellis says
               o July 10, 2018
            @Kels
            This would appear to be a fine example of motte and bailey, as
            described here by other commenters.
          +
        Michael Fiorillo says
               o July 16, 2018
            Yes, in addition to her failure to mention these behaviors as
            expressions of systemic patriarchy.
            It not males that are toxic, it’s patriarchy. While all men
            are beneficiaries and vectors (and victims) of it, only some
            manifest its most aggressive/destructive aspects.
            But I don’t think that’s the author’s purpose here; I think
            she (like her husband, btw, whose mistreatment by some idiotic
            college Identitarians is being used by the Right to further
            attack the Humanities) is claiming to take a very courageous
            stand, when in fact her arguments reinforce traditional power
            and gender relations.
            I’m not qualified to comment on the author’s scientific work,
            but I hope it’s superior to her cultural and social analysis.
               o
             Rob says
                    # July 16, 2018
                 Or perhaps her culture and social analysis does not share
                 the structuralist belief that we live in a systemic
                 patriarchy.
                 Are there patriarchal elements in our society? Of course.
                 There are all sorts of influences on our society: social,
                 tribal, genetic, sub-cultural. Some top-down, some
                 bottom-up. It’s complex. But the doctrinaire champions of
                 identity politics, like all ideologues, have an intense
                 aversion to complexity. They see only systemic racism and
                 sexism. Only power structures and oppression.
                 And their credo is ferociously hostile to any notion that
                 behaviour can have explanations rooted in biology. Those
                 who see everything through the lens of systemic
                 patriarchy dismiss the very legitimacy of evolutionary
                 biology. No doubt Heyer has encountered this hostility in
                 her academic life.
   43.
   Lucid says
          + July 10, 2018
       Although I very much agree that there are a whole host of things
       wrong with calling all men toxic, most feminists I know will just
       scoff and insist that toxic masculinity “only refers to toxic
       masculine norms.” I suspect a motte-and-bailey tactic, and I don’t
       doubt that you could furnish plenty of examples of the way people
       use the term to bash men at large and then present them to anyone
       who seeks to accuse you of attacking straw men. We see this all the
       time with terms like “privilege”; you object that white people are
       not unilaterally privileged, the progressive explains that
       privilege is just a way of describing the ways that a population is
       not disproportionately disadvantaged, and then people like Michael
       Eric Dyson and Tre Melvin talk about how white people have an
       inherent set of advantages due to their skin color. It’s
       ridiculous.
       I think it would have been worthwhile to examine the pseudoscience
       of “masculine norms.” One of the resources I’ve been pointed to in
       the past is the Conformity to Masculine Norms Index. The idea is
       that feminists in academia compiled a list of common behaviors
       among men, but employed a process that was riddled with bias. If I
       recall correctly, some man-hating white knight got a group of men
       and women together, assembled them into focus groups, and worked
       with them over several weeks to develop a list of norms. There’s an
       older channel on YouTube that goes by TL;DR, and he went into the
       process in detail.
       What interested me about this was that previous attempts to
       classify masculine standards of behavior often contained language
       that was much more positive, so much so that the ingrained
       prejudice is shocking when you contrast them. It’s also not lost on
       me that the social sciences tend to be disproportionately
       progressive, or that concern over indoctrination on college
       campuses is a common talking point among Anti-SJW’s. Here’s the
       list from the CMNI:
       Winning
       Emotional Control
       Risk-Taking
       Violence
       Power Over Women
       Dominance
       Playboy
       Self-Reliance
       Primacy of Work
       Disdain for Homosexuals
       Pursuit of Status
       And here’s the link to the index itself:
       http://www.psychwiki.com/dms/other/labgroup/Measu235sdgse5234234res
       Week2/Krisztina2/Mahalik2003.pdf
       One point of confusion for me is that domestic violence and murder
       of women (usually coined “femicide”) are the two instances of toxic
       masculinity that I most commonly see cited from activists and
       various self-identified feminists on the web and in public. This
       puzzles me, because any time I’ve asked a feminist to list
       masculine norms, they’ve cited things like “provide for women”,
       “dominant,” “aggression,” “be heroic” and so on. You can’t really
       extrapolate “kill your wife” from any combination of these traits
       unless you’re either playing fast and loose with the norms, or
       you’re representing the death and brutalization of women as some
       kind of tragic byproduct of foisting these norms on boys.
       Laci Green also posted a video on this topic, and to her credit,
       she didn’t omit toxic femininity. I couldn’t find her sources, but
       here’s the list of feminine norms from her video. I’m not sure that
       these are exactly right, but they give us a vague outline.
       Vagina
       Have Babies
       Emotional
       Supportive
       Nurturer
       Self-Critical
       Passive
       Gentle
       Weak
       Victim
       Afraid
       Irrational
       Small
       Pretty
       Graceful
       What does it look like when these traits are pushed to their
       limits, or become toxic? It’s tricky to extrapolate out exactly
       what femininity consists of, but I think you hit a few of the high
       notes. As I see it, it’s not just when a woman cries foul at a man
       who looks at her breasts when they’re hanging out of her low-cut,
       skin-tight top, but what that entails: an attempt to incite proxy
       violence or impose shame on someone, not as justifiable retaliation
       to a crime committed against her person or to prevent behaviors
       which are legitimately harmful to society, but to attract men, or
       just attention, or out of a vindictive desire to lash out at
       someone.
       I’d also argue that toxic femininity encompasses the abuse of the
       helpless, or of anyone under your care, usually for attention, but
       sometimes to be vindictive, or perhaps for reasons that are so
       alien to me that I simply cannot fathom them. In “The Origins of
       War in Child Abuse”, the author talks about how women used to line
       up in droves to throw newborn infants into the Tiber, and in
       Ancient Sparta, children dined with their mother and father but
       lived exclusively with women:
       “Thus Herodotus could admit that “a boy is not seen by his father
       before he is five years old, but lives with the women.”4 It was
       mainly the women of the gynarchy in every early state who
       determined the child’s personality through infanticide, incest,
       torture and domination, so early families are termed by historians
       as matrifamilies: “The family in Egypt was matriarchal. The most
       important person in the family was not the father, but the mother.
       The Egyptian wife was called the ‘Ruler of the House.’”5 Right up
       to the Reformation it was common that “a boy until seventeen should
       sleep in the same bed as his mother,”6 so that maternal incest was
       common.”
       The above author describes all manner of particularly horrifying
       manifestations of child abuse, often perpetuated by women out of
       jealousy, or else due to some fit of conveniently-temporary
       psychosis in which the woman claimed to be possessed. In one
       example, women who felt spurned by their lovers would give their
       lovers children–boys as young as five–over to visiting Athenians,
       to be raped. Sometimes they would murder one of their infant
       children and blame it on some form of temporary possession. I
       wonder if our ancestors bought it as easily as we do today?
       Infanticide (especially the murder of neonates shortly after
       they’re born) is a crime almost exclusively committed by women, and
       safe haven laws are justified on the basis that it’s better for a
       woman to abandon her infant at a fire station than to suffocate it
       to death and throw it in the trash, or stab it seventeen times and
       leave it in your neighbor’s shed. Of course, it’s not their fault:
       she was possessed by her thumos–erm, sorry, “struggling with
       postpartem psychosis”–so she can’t be held accountable for her
       actions. Gotta maintain that feminine hypo-agency. I’ve always
       suspected that munchausen by proxy was a classic example of this.
       Of course, none of these behaviors are exclusive to men or women.
       They’re just feminine or masculine norms. Male nurses can abuse
       people under their care as well, or murder infants, or manipulate
       authority for personal gain, or to be vindictive, or for attention.
       Women, likewise, can be violent (and arguably commit violence
       against men with far more frequency than men commit it against
       women, albeit with far less severity.) I appreciate you talking
       about some of these points. I think people ought to give due
       consideration to the full spectrum of human atrocity, rather than
       look at men as if we are uniquely responsible for all the evils of
       the world.
       Nobody really has clean hands.
          +
        Lucid says
               o July 10, 2018
            Blegh. A few editing problems, so I found the CMNI and then
            shared them after the following paragraph, which grabbed a few
            norms from Laci’s vide. It’s all pseudoscience anyhow, but at
            least you don’t have to play fast-and-loose with the first set
            to understand how taking them to extremes might be toxic. It’s
            trickier to do this with feminine norms, but I don’t recall if
            the same people who did the CMNI also did an index of feminine
            norms.
          +
        dirk says
               o July 10, 2018
            Women are good in poisoning their husbands or mates. That’s
            history, and logic.
   44.
   Lilly says
          + July 10, 2018
       Comparative evolutionary study between why cute is dominate in some
       cultures vs sexy when?
   45.
   Phil says
          + July 10, 2018
       https://images-fe.ssl-images-amazon.com/images/I/51yd7WJacfL.jpg
       Venus the dark side is a book that I procrastinated about reading
       it, for a number of years, and I finally read it,
       Toxic femininity has been a no go zone for decades, So finally
       information is starting to appear, And this article is just one
       step in the right direction,
       Esther Villar wrote the Manipulated Man, decades ago, and this book
       in itself is just another part of the jigsaw of human behaviour.
   46.
   All feminism is toxic says
          + July 10, 2018
       An accusation of “toxic masculinity” is no different to “you sound
       angry”. It’s a nonsense, designed to make the accuser’s position a
       fait accompli.
   47.
   Rob says
          + July 10, 2018
       The very communities where ‘toxic masculinity’ is being discussed
       most are the communities where the men are, in my experience,
       compassionate, egalitarian, and not at all toxic.
       ===============================================================
       I’ve noticed this paradox as well. The tabletop gaming hobby is in
       the throes of a moral panic around sexual harassment and misogyny.
       And yet the educated, nerdy young men who play Settlers of Catan
       and Pandemic are among the most mild-natured and fair-minded people
       on the planet. My wife laughed when she heard there’s an online
       movement to combat the alleged toxic misogyny of boardgamers, and
       commented that most of the gamers she’s met can’t even look women
       in the eye, let along catcall and grope them.
       Anyone who finds that community hostile and threatening must be
       completely unable to function in wider society. Which is sad for
       them, but we shouldn’t let our social norms be dictated by the most
       anxious and fragile people.
          +
        NeonCrusader says
               o July 10, 2018
            There’s no mystery there: Feminist activists go after the
            communities where men are (rightly or wrongly) assumed to be
            submissive towards women and eager to please. Much easier for
            a bunch of overweight, pink-haired feminists to subvert and
            control the chess club than to try to infiltrate and dominate
            the rugby association.
   48.
   Ryan Dube says
          + July 10, 2018
       Thank you so much for writing this Heather. It’s such a breath of
       fresh air in a hateful, toxic world.
   49.
   Karen O. says
          + July 10, 2018
       Great article ! Honest, clear-headed, thought-provoking and
       insightful. As a woman and a mom to both a son and a daughter (both
       young adults now), this is much needed discussion for young men and
       young women growing up being (unknowingly) brainwashed by the toxic
       media (both so-called left wing and right wing media, ‘two wings of
       the same bird of prey’).
       A big thank you to Heather Heying and to Quilette for publishing
       this ! Long over-due discussion – BRAVO !
   50.
   Christian says
          + July 10, 2018
       It’s very strange that something so obvious had to be written.
       However, I did find myself comparing TM to TF. In the way these
       terms have been defined, one is certainly worse than the other.
       We’d be better off not using the term “toxic”, which has become
       meaningless due to overuse. Instead, we should talk about behavior
       in a precise way.
   51.
   Dave Corey says
          + July 10, 2018
       Why do I get the sense that the author does not understand what is
       meant by toxic masculinity? She says that she doesn’t blame men for
       looking at women but that is not toxic masculinity. Toxic
       masculinity is when a man sees a woman and decides that nothing
       will stop him from getting her. When his friends and family say
       “don’t give up, she’ll eventually fall for you.” When people like
       herself say that women are responsible for the actions of men, just
       because of how they look.
       She says showing skin isn’t “asking for it” but rather “inviting
       trouble.” Asking = inviting. It = trouble. She conveniently doesn’t
       elaborate on what the difference is to her. Someone help me out
       here…
       She says that men shouldn’t be “subjugated when they show
       [masculine traits]” but that’s not what feminism does. It
       subjugates them when they act like animals, and when they defend
       others who do the same. Either she doesn’t know the goal of
       feminism or she actually thinks that committing sexual assault or
       rape is a defining trait of masculinity. THAT, crossing those
       boundaries that separate us from the lions and tigers, is what
       feminism is against.
       I mean, right in the middle of her argument she asserts that
       feminists actually think being male with being masculine. “Their
       maleness does not make them toxic, any more than one’s ‘whiteness’
       makes one racist.” Exactly, it’s the hardness, the lack of any
       sensitivity, the pressure to ignore and bottle up feelings that
       makes masculinity toxic. She really has no idea what she is talking
       about.
          +
        Dave Corey says
               o July 10, 2018
            typo in the last paragraph should read “actually confuse being
            make with being masculine.”
          +
        Kevin Herman says
               o July 10, 2018
            For a lot of third wave feminists acting masculine is acting
            like an animal. You ever hear of the dastardly male gaze? Even
            though men are generally expected to be the aggressor in
            romance its too much for some women to occassionally get
            checked out by males. Not even approached just a lingering
            glance is enough for the fainting couch. Some women wonder why
            they can’t get dates anymore its becaues men are terrified of
            acting like men.
               o
             Oregoncharles says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Better than “terrified,” some men are convinced that it’s
                 rude and inappropriate to act in the role they’ve been
                 assigned – by women, if only because women refuse to take
                 the initiative themselves.
                 Of course, in some contexts it could be career-ending.
                 Too bad work may be the only place some people meet.
               o
             pook says
                    # July 10, 2018
                 Apparently you don’t know what the male gaze is. It’s
                 actually a film-making term, referring to the assumption
                 that your audience is male. While sometimes that’s
                 relevant to sexuality (e.g. if a director makes every
                 female character hot and sluttily dressed even if they’re
                 professors or politicians), it doesn’t have to be – and
                 it’s not automatically bad, either (although it can be,
                 as in my example above).
                    #
                  Speaker To Animals says
                         @ July 12, 2018
                      The ‘male gaze’ is a psychoanalytical term from film
                      theory, not film making, unless the film maker in
                      question was Laura Mulvey.
                      Like most psychoanalytical terms it is utter
                      bollocks. It doesn’t just refer to the male POV, it
                      refers to the interpolation of the male viewer into
                      either the POV of a sadist or a voyeur; for the
                      woman there is only the POV of a masochist.
                      There’s a whole lot of associated bullshit that goes
                      with it, including the assumption that the female
                      viewer suffers guilt or shame at their ‘loss’ of
                      their phallus.
          +
        Oregoncharles says
               o July 10, 2018
            People ARE animals, Dave, and forever will act accordingly.
            They’re also human and social, which places all sorts of
            constraints and expectations, but the animal remains. Trying
            to deny that only leads to more trouble.
          +
        Razz says
               o July 10, 2018
            Actually Dave its about not allowing you emotions from getting
            out from under your control. A man who cannot control his
            emotions is toxic.
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 11, 2018
            “She says showing skin isn’t “asking for it” but rather
            “inviting trouble.” Asking = inviting. It = trouble. She
            conveniently doesn’t elaborate on what the difference is to
            her. Someone help me out here…”
            Simple.
            It’s like the police giving advice on how to prevent
            break-ins, or how to prevent getting pick-pocketed, or having
            your bicycle stolen, or advice given to travellers on how to
            avoid getting scammed abroad, or having their passport stolen,
            etc.
            Young men might be advised not to get drunk and pick up
            strange women in bars and take them to their hotel room when
            abroad, in, say, Thailand, for example. Or don’t go into dark
            alleys alone, late at night.
            If someone is aware of the advice, and nevertheless ignores
            it, and does not follow that advice, or is generally careless,
            that is “inviting trouble”. If they then get robbed, or
            scammed while traveling, or their house gets broken into,
            etc., most people are going to be sympathetic, and no one is
            going to defend the robbers or scammers for taking advantage
            of them because the person was “asking for it”…but they will
            say things like, “What were you thinking?!”
            Taking obvious steps so that bad things don’t happen to you is
            just common sense, and it doesn’t imply that the person doing
            the bad thing isn’t guilty of wrongdoing.
          +
        AA says
               o July 11, 2018
            @Dave
            I could just as easily say that it is the inability of women
            to bottle up their feelings that makes femininity toxic.
   52.
   Patriarchy Central (@PatriarchyCtrl) says
          + July 10, 2018
       It has been brought to our attention that some commentators here
       are criticizing The Patriarchy. This behavior is forbidden and will
       be punished accordingly.
       ~The Patriarchy
   53.
   Gareth Hart (@tgheretford) says
          + July 10, 2018
       The one thing I would note when it comes to toxic femininity is in
       relation to the type of men who give said women attention. There is
       quite the difference between men deemed attractive by a said woman
       compared to an unattractive one. The attractive male can get away
       with a lot more behaviour that an unattractive man could not. The
       recent allegations in UK Parliament after #MeToo began were largely
       complaints around behaviours by men the accusers deemed
       unattractive. The idea of a man asking out a woman, smiling at her
       or saying good morning being deemed harassment and worthy of career
       ending and potential liberty ending punishment by mob cheapens and
       belittles actual harassment, makes men more distrusting and distant
       from women, removing themselves from the dating pool and widens the
       gender divide purely because a number of women have complained
       about getting innocuous attention from men they deem unattractive,
       unworthy and therefore, guilty.
       The idea of men being punished and branded toxic purely on
       characteristics they can not change (easily) such as looks or
       height. No, I refuse to accept this.
          +
        J.Ryall says
               o July 13, 2018
            I think you raise a key point in all of this. Women are far
            more receptive to attention from men they consider attractive.
            If an extremely attractive man offers to buy them a drink or
            tries to start up a conversation, they’ll likely be okay with
            it. Conversely, if it’s a guy who they don’t find attractive,
            they’re more likely to call him a creep or consider the
            attempted interaction to be sexual harassment. That said, all
            I have is personal anecdotes to back this up, so it’s by no
            means an empirically supported hypothesis, but I’m reasonably
            confident it would hold up under analysis.
   54.
   Oregoncharles says
          + July 10, 2018
       Good article. I like to see anything that reminds us, cogently,
       that we are evolved animals. Helps deflate the hubris.
       I do have a quibble, with this statement: ” There are many ways to
       be female, and many ways to be male, and some of each are bad news
       for everyone but the individual employing them.” Ultimately,
       they’re usually also bad for those employing them, because they’re
       cheating and society has ways of punishing that.
   55.
   Jon says
          + July 10, 2018
       Spectacular article! Thank you.
   56.
   Devon Ironside says
          + July 10, 2018
       This is a brilliant article. I would like to pick up on one think
       the author said regarding universally agreed upon boundaries.
       “Every woman has the right not to be touched if she does not wish
       to be; and coercive quid pro quo, in which sexual favors are
       demanded for the possibility of career advancement, is
       unacceptable.”
       For the record, I agree 100% with both points. However, I would
       like to draw a distinction between two types of quid pro quo, one
       which is coercive and one which is not.
       Take the case of an aspiring actress in LA who has gone to
       thousands of auditions and faced nothing but rejection, landing not
       a single role. It’s not because she isn’t beautiful and talented –
       either she just didn’t quite fit, or she just got outclassed by
       ferocious competition. Until one day she meets an aspiring male
       writer/director who is investing his own savings in an independent
       feature film. This male director is not unattractive to women, but
       he’s had no success at finding a sexual partner because, like the
       actress, he keeps getting outclassed. There’s a supporting role in
       the film for a sexy female, a role for which the actress would be
       perfect. The actress senses the director’s sexual frustration and
       the director senses the actresses professional frustration. The
       actress hints that if the director gives her the role (and pays her
       for it at union scale), she’ll have sex with him. The director
       takes the hint and insists on sex first, role later. She trusts
       him, they have sex, she plays the role and they part ways
       (amicably, as friends).
       Is this coercive? Is it inherently toxic? The director is not
       Spielberg and the actress is not starving, just frustrated. He does
       not hold the key to her future career. At best, he can hire her for
       a day in a film that will likely be forgotten as soon as it is
       released.
       Should she be able to “come forward” 20 years later, when the
       director is at the peak of his career, and say he “coerced” her?
       I argue that the initial transaction, though clearly quid pro quo,
       is not coercive and not toxic. Crying foul about it would be toxic.
       The situation would be different if the director were a filmmaker
       as rich and powerful as Harvey Weinstein. He really did have the
       power to make or break careers. But our intrepid young filmmaker
       and would-be Romeo is in no such situation. If anything, I’d say he
       was at a disadvantage (depending on how strong his attraction to
       the actress was) and he knew it, which is why he demanded the sex
       first (since she could refuse sex more readily than he could refuse
       to cast her after sex).
       I close by restating my point that quid pro quo sex is not
       inherently coercive or toxic, but only becomes so when there is far
       more at stake for one person than there is for the other.
          +
        marms says
               o July 11, 2018
            Hello Harlequin.
            And we thought no one wrote bodice rippers anymore.
   57.
   mobile867 says
          + July 10, 2018
       Thank you for your courage to write this knowing the reaction it
       will recieve.
   58.
   HellionBleak says
          + July 11, 2018
       If women were bigger and stronger than men, feminists would be
       beating the hell out of their husbands, but they aren’t so they
       resort to jargon like “toxic masculinity” and “rape culture” to
       express their hostility under the guise of academic research.
   59.
   Ministry of Truth (@MephistoVim) says
          + July 11, 2018
       The Lion metaphor is an interesting one, I remember watching one of
       my favourite National Geographic documentaries, “Eternal Enemies”
       which covered a pride of lions and a pack of hyenas that operated
       in the same territory and the conflicts they had over the region
       and I remember reading comments from angry feminists about how
       toxic the patriarchal structure was given the female lions did the
       bulk of the hunting and they got to eat least, if the males left
       any food behind.
       On the surface it does seem cruel and uncaring, but there is a fine
       line between life and death when your struggle is day to day and
       the reality is if some female lions starve to death, the pride will
       survive, but the pride could be in jeopardy if the male isn’t
       strong. The documentary showed two significant clashes between the
       lions and the hyenas, in both clashes the pride leader, Ntwadumela,
       “he who greets with fire”, singled out the matriarch of the hyenas
       and killed them. In other skirmishes when the male wasn’t around,
       the hyenas killed female lions.
       What the documentary didn’t show, long after they finished filming,
       the bothers who ruled the pride became old and were driven off by a
       roaming pack of younger males, these younger males lead a different
       pride so didn’t remain. The pride was left without any males and
       all the remaining female lions eventually starved to death as the
       hyenas took anything that they killed and picked them off.
          +
        Jack B. Nimble says
               o July 11, 2018
            @MephistoVim
            Heying’s use of the lion metaphor is terrible!!
            ‘………Male lions can be monsters, murderous and focused. Toxic,
            if you will.
            Given the opportunity, male lions will kill the kittens in a
            pride over which they have gained control. They commit
            infanticide, which brings the new mothers, freshly childless,
            back into estrous. The females are quickly impregnated. This,
            we can all agree, is disturbing behavior, and may make some
            people feel rather less pleased with lions…….’
            Was she channeling her inner “Peterson” when she called some
            male lions monsters? Using terms like rape, murder and
            children to describe lion behavior postulates a close
            resemblance or correspondence between male lions and human
            males that just doesn’t exist.
            Look, female lions care for their young for 2-3 years, during
            which period they are reproductively unavailable. Kin
            selection theory predicts that males should favor their own
            genetic offspring over non-relatives, and in lions that
            sometimes leads to infanticide.
            If a male lion kills a juvenile, that is shocking to human
            sensibilities [just as if a juvenile lion were to be killed
            and eaten by a hyena], but not disturbing. That is just what
            lions and hyenas do.
            And humans? Step children are more likely to be abused or
            killed by men than are biological children, but whether this
            pattern is the result of kin selection or something else is
            controversial. See:
            https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cinderella_effect
            Heying’s article suffers from too many vague generalizations,
            of which the lion metaphor is just the beginning.
          +
        Jack B Nimble says
               o July 11, 2018
            @MephistoVim
            Heying’s use of the lion metaphor is terrible!!
            ‘………Male lions can be monsters, murderous and focused. Toxic,
            if you will.
            Given the opportunity, male lions will kill the kittens in a
            pride over which they have gained control. They commit
            infanticide, which brings the new mothers, freshly childless,
            back into estrous. The females are quickly impregnated. This,
            we can all agree, is disturbing behavior, and may make some
            people feel rather less pleased with lions…….’
            Was she channeling her inner “Peterson” when she called some
            male lions monsters? Using terms like rape, murder and
            children to describe lion behavior postulates a resemblance or
            correspondence between male lions and human males that just
            doesn’t exist.
            Look, female lions care for their young for 2-3 years, during
            which period they are reproductively unavailable to any males.
            Kin selection theory predicts that males should favor their
            own genetic offspring over non-relatives, and in lions that
            sometimes leads to infanticide.
            If a male lion kills a juvenile, that is shocking to human
            sensibilities [just as if a juvenile lion were killed and
            eaten by a hyena], but not disturbing. That is just what lions
            and hyenas do.
            And humans? Step children are more likely to be abused or
            killed by men than are biological children, but whether this
            pattern is the result of kin selection or something else is
            controversial. See:
            https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cinderella_effect
            Heying’s article suffers from too many vague generalizations,
            of which the lion metaphor is just the beginning.
   60. Pingback: Toxic femininity - Barrel Strength
   61. Pingback: Still Fearing Antifa Supersoldiers, Republicans in
       Congress Declare War on Masks: Reason Roundup – iftttwall
   62. Pingback: Still Fearing Antifa Supersoldiers, Republicans in
       Congress Declare War on Masks: Reason Roundup | Libertarian Party
       of Alabama Unofficial
   63. Pingback: Still Fearing Antifa Supersoldiers, Republicans in
       Congress Declare War on Masks: Reason Roundup – Michigan Standard
   64.
   Bee says
          + July 11, 2018
       I think maybe she forgot that there are men who will try to stalk,
       attack, and intimidate women not dressed provocatively and not for
       any sexual reason but to display their power over them. I’m not
       saying that every man does this, just in case some of you like to
       take anything i say to the extreme, even when not implied, but
       there is a culture of male violence in many societies, some more
       than others, both again other men and against women. Men are often
       taught to only have two emotions: horniness & anger. Perfect
       example – what kind of media are men taught to like? Women are
       portrayed as only valuable if attractive, dumb and weak in most
       media out there today. Have a look at pornhub and see how women are
       treated – most would find it pretty disturbing, violent and
       uncomfortable to watch, but there are stupid men out there that
       take the bait and actually like this crap. This is what men are
       taught, and many don’t question it, and this is the idea behind
       toxic masculinity. The fact that she doesn’t understand it just
       makes her look ridiculous. I guess not every evolutionary biologist
       is also an expert in sociology.
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 11, 2018
            “what kind of media are men taught to like”
            You have it the wrong way around.
            This is the kind of media men flock to when left to their own
            devices. It speaks powerfully to their natural biological
            urges.
            Well socialized male learns to control those impulses, and
            direct them in more socially beneficial ways.
            Unfortunately some males do not get properly socialized.
          +
        Susan says
               o July 11, 2018
            “I think maybe she forgot that there are men who will try to
            stalk, attack, and intimidate women not dressed provocatively
            and not for any sexual reason but to display their power over
            them.”
            Bee, I heard all my life that rape was about power, not sex,
            but Steven Pinker, in “The Better Angels of our Nature” says
            that this concept (power, not sex) originated with Susan
            Brownmiller in “Against Our Will” (1975) and “… Brownmiller
            wrote that she adapted the theory from the ideas of an old
            communist professor of hers, and it does fit the Marxist
            conception that all human behavior is to be explained as a
            struggle for power between groups.” Pinker stated that there
            was never any evidence for the “power” theory nor has there
            been any subsequent evidence in any study.
            I expressed my astonishment to my husband who responded along
            the lines of “duh”. I asked him why this was not more widely
            known and he said, “Right, ‘mansplain’ rape to a woman?”
   65.
   Sam Butler says
          + July 11, 2018
       A much-needed article. When people talk about ‘toxic masculinity,’
       though, I think they’re often talking about the much higher rates
       of male violence. That’s why I think when we talk about ‘toxic
       femininity’ – which we obviously need to more – we should focus on
       the scientifically well-established lead that women have in terms
       of ‘indirect aggression,’ i.e. gossip, slander, and so on. As the
       excesses of the #metoo movement have demonstrated, this kind of
       toxic female aggression is just as adept as male violence at
       ruining lives.
          +
        C Young says
               o July 12, 2018
            Took the words out of my mouth. Another male-female dimension
            worth exploring is Baron Cohen’s Empathizing-Systematising
            spectrum. Opposition to science, due process and law from
            identitarians is typically a product of empathy trumping
            systematising e.g. the claim that women’s feelings should
            trump male rights in the Galloway case, or the idea that some
            types of science should be suppressed because they hurt
            people’s feelings.
            Excessive empathy can be toxic. Fetal testosterone may
            suppress it.
            We are quite happy to talk about the pros and cons of the
            ‘extreme male brain’, perhaps the inverse should feature.
               o
             J.Ryall says
                    # July 13, 2018
                 A minor quibble here: the identitarian left is all about
                 sympathy, not empathy. To empathize would entail an
                 honest attempt to understand the situations of other
                 people and the reasons why they act as they do. For
                 example, identitarians have no interest in trying to
                 understand why Trump supporters voted for him, preferring
                 instead to simply cast them as racist, sexist, bigots
                 (disclaimer: not a fan of Trump, personally). The
                 obsession with white privilege and their dismissal of
                 uniquely male problems (ex. disproportionately high
                 suicide rates) is another good example.
                    #
                  Sam Butler says
                         @ July 15, 2018
                      I also wonder whether social media is making it
                      easier for women to dominate society through the
                      competitive advantage they have in indirect
                      aggression:
                      https://heresyblog.weebly.com/home/why-toxic-feminin
                      ity-is-winning
   66.
   seekinghealthandwisdom says
          + July 12, 2018
       “Young women have vast sexual power. Everyone who is being honest
       with themselves knows this: Women in their sexual prime who are
       anywhere near the beauty-norms for their culture have a kind of
       power that nobody else has…”
       This! There is no greater ‘unearned privilege” in western society
       than being a beautiful young women. All you have to do is smile
       periodically and the world is yours. You can have unlimited access
       to power, resources, status … anything you want, just by virtue of
       being young and beautiful.
       If you are one of these young beautiful women, I hope you use your
       precious power wisely when it is at it’s peak.
          +
        dirk says
               o July 12, 2018
            I wonder what the answer on This! will be from our feminists?
            Affirmative, or negative? I wouldn’t know! It’s essentialist,
            that’s for sure.
               o
             Sam Butler says
                    # July 15, 2018
                 Sorry to link to my blog again, but I just wrote a post a
                 few weeks ago on precisely this point:
                 https://heresyblog.weebly.com/home/hot-girl-privilege
   67.
   Just Me says
          + July 12, 2018
       “Given the opportunity, male lions will kill the kittens in a pride
       over which they have gained control. They commit infanticide, which
       brings the new mothers, freshly childless, back into estrous…
       Given the opportunity, the vast majority of modern human males
       would do no such thing.
       … As such, and because few human cultures would tolerate such
       behavior, the vast majority of men would not and could not kill
       babies…”
       Um…actually, infanticide has been quite common across history and
       cultures.
       https://www.wikigender.org/wiki/history-of-infanticide/
       “nfanticide has been the norm within many cultures throughout
       history. Child sacrifice to ancient deities and spirits was quite
       common during ancient times. Anthropologist Laila Williamson
       observes has been practiced on every continent and by people on
       every level of cultural complexity, from hunter gatherers to high
       civilizations. Rather than being an exception, then, it has been
       the rule”[1].”
       Evolutionary psychologists would be more convincing if they paid
       more attention to anthropological evidence…
          +
        Just Me says
               o July 12, 2018
            ..and historical evidence.
            The notion that all babies have equal worth as humans is not
            self-evident, and is a “social construction” introduced by
            Christianity:
            “Christianity abhorred infanticide. In Apostles it was
            written, “You shall not kill that which is born” [8]. In 318
            AD Constantine I felt that infanticide was a crime. In 374 AD
            Valentinian stated that people must rear all children. The
            Council of Constantinople issued that infanticide was murder
            and in 589 AD the Third Council of Toledo worked on ending the
            Spanish custom of killing their children.”
               o
             Just Me says
                    # July 12, 2018
                 This is not to say that infanticide was committed for the
                 same reason male lions kill cubs, but it does indicate
                 that humans, male or female, are not biologically averse
                 to killing even their own babies when they deem it
                 advantageous.
          +
        EK says
               o July 12, 2018
            You’re overstating your case.
            On the family level, infanticide in the West is closely
            associated with periods of famine. It is something like
            utilitarian triage. Cf.; Hansel and Gretel, although it was
            the evil step-mother who insisted upon abandoning the children
            in that case.
            On the community level, ritual infanticide is closely
            associated with other sorts of acute crises.
            I don’t know of any stable society in the West or elsewhere
            that has have ever condoned the routine killing their own
            children.
            Perhaps your authorities have been a bit careless with their
            use of the words “quite common” and “norm.”
               o
             Just Me says
                    # July 12, 2018
                 EK-
                 The problem in these debates seems to be with the
                 definition of what “the norm” means.
                 It doesn’t mean most people actually do it, it means it
                 is deemed acceptable, “normal”, praiseworthy, etc.,
                 rather than being decried, looked down on, etc.
                 In this case, it has been deemed a perfectly acceptable
                 response to certain situations.
                 Unlike our own society, which deems it a horrible crime,
                 no matter what the circumstances.
                    #
                  Rob says
                         @ July 16, 2018
                      A better characterization of infanticide is “a
                      painful but sometimes legitimate response to
                      crisis.”
   68.
   dirk says
          + July 12, 2018
       What I know from the Inuit, Eskimos, before giving a name, a baby
       was not yet human, and could be killed ( as were very old people),
       a normal thing to do in a scene where different rules reign,
       because of available food and other conditions.
   69. Pingback: Links for the Week of July 9, 2018 – Verywhen
   70.
   Vince says
          + July 13, 2018
       “Everyone who is being honest with themselves knows this: …”
       Ah yes, the old bandwagon approach fallacy, designed to conceal
       what is in reality a very weak argument (or in this case, the
       complete lack of an argument).
       Toxic femininity exists, of course, in female aggression or
       passive-aggression (or, to be more accurate, the types of
       aggression more often performed by women), whether verbal,
       emotional, or in other ways, which infringes on the rights of
       others.
   71.
   Evan Myers says
          + July 13, 2018
       Uniforms in the workplace. No make up.
       That’ll sort it.
   72.
   Jorge Espinha says
          + July 13, 2018
       Great article. Thank you.
   73.
   Dave says
          + July 14, 2018
       The Cinderella effect is real — correcting for race and social
       class, a child living with a step-parent is about seven times more
       likely to be abused or neglected than a child living with both
       biological parents.
       Humans are different from animals in that we invented Patriarchy, a
       system that bonded each woman to one man and each man to one woman,
       and provided the family stability needed by a species whose young
       require at least fifteen years to mature. Except for a brief period
       of courtship leading to marriage, showing the slightest sexual
       interest in anyone you weren’t married to was a serious offense,
       even if that interest was mutual!
       Now that we’ve smashed the patriarchy, all females are fair game
       regardless of age and marital status. All that matters are her
       feelings — if she likes you, you’ll get laid; if she thinks you’re
       a creep, you’ll be permanently unemployed. Or she might have sex
       with you and later decide that you’re a creep.
       With females in control, humans are reverting to more animalistic
       mating patterns, where women have a series of unstable
       relationships with impulsive, low-achieving sexy bad boys. I live
       in a white rural area and half my kids’ classmates have daddies in
       prison, so if you think “toxic masculinity” is bad now, wait til
       this generation grows up!
          +
        Becky says
               o July 14, 2018
            You know feminism is supposed to be about equality and not
            just females being in control, yes? Because I think if
            everyone was on the same page with that, this would be a lot
            easier.
               o
             Dave says
                    # July 15, 2018
                 Nature gives women tremendous power. As they hold the
                 keys to the next generation, women wield great influence
                 even in societies that treat them as property, so
                 political “equality” is in effect total female
                 domination.
                 Although men are slightly smarter on average, and vastly
                 stronger than women, they have no intrinsic value because
                 sperm is cheap. My daughter cannot see how lucky she is
                 to have a hitherto unspoiled womb that she could contract
                 to a good man in exchange for a very comfortable suburban
                 lifestyle, something for which her brothers might toil
                 for many years and still fail.
   74.
   Stephen J. says
          + July 14, 2018
       Thank you, Professor Heying.
   75.
   Cool Guy Sexhaver says
          + July 14, 2018
       Holy shit, this bitch is still mad she didn’t get invited to any
       sleepovers.
   76.
   jsolbakken says
          + July 14, 2018
       “Holy shit, this bitch is still mad she didn’t get invited to any
       sleepovers.”
       I thought the comments were getting stupidly off track and then you
       came along. Congratulations on being the idiotic jackass that makes
       the rest of the commenters look like erudite geniuses.
          +
        Becky says
               o July 14, 2018
            Hey, it’s a tough job, but someone’s gotta make the rest of us
            look good 😉
   77.
   Becky says
          + July 14, 2018
       Manboobs has some great commentary:
       http://www.wehuntedthemammoth.com/2018/07/12/women-wearing-makeup-t
       hat-hints-at-orgasm-cant-complain-that-men-leer-intellectual-dark-w
       ebber-heather-heying-argues/
   78.
   Morgan says
          + July 14, 2018
       Requiring sex in exchange for career advancement IS unacceptable.
       But once you’ve accepted, you can’t really complain about anything
       but your own amoral ambition.
       I liked this part: “It is a game, the benefits of which go to a few
       while the costs are shared by all of us.” This is the case, of
       course, because it’s a free market. Whatever a person wants to do
       with their value is fine, and since young women near the beauty
       standard are the social equivalent of billionaires (or rather, the
       children of billionaires), some of them do terrible things, and
       they get away with it due to their ability to exchange value for
       favorable treatment in spite of their behavior.
   79.
   Elizabeth says
          + July 15, 2018
       As a beautiful woman, now of a certain age, I found myself agreeing
       to a lot of this until the very end, although there was one red
       flag in the middle, when the only job-related marker of toxic
       masculinity was the idea of requiring sex in exchange for career
       advancement (a self-serving transaction that she views as a “game”
       that benefits the parties directly involved). She forgets entirely
       that for many women, the scenario is more like requiring sex (or
       tolerance of leering, groping, etc.) in exchange for keeping your
       job at all. This omission suggests a major blind spot, which is the
       reality that, while women can tart themselves up all they want, men
       largely hold all of the economic, political and physical power in
       our society..
       So the author’s conclusion seems like a real manifestation of
       Stockholm syndrome:
       “The sex-specific toxicity that I have seen, when it has been
       obvious, has mostly been in the other court.”
       Uh, no. The fact that women can make men horny and then decline to
       put out is not remotely symmetrical with men’s ability to rape,
       intimidate, humiliate and fire women.
   80.
   Paul Wary (@PrinciPauly) says
          + July 15, 2018
       Women’s (and particularly feminist’s) complaints against men would
       not be so insidious if they were consistent. Complaints against
       over-competitiveness, aggression, sexual forwardness etc would have
       more authority if women didn’t then proceed to select just such
       characteristic in their partners. What they are really complaining
       about is the men who approach them who they consider to be of
       lesser value, which for most women is around 80% of men.
          +
        Rob says
               o July 16, 2018
            There’s also a class element at work. Most feminists come from
            the Brahmin class, and have little knowledge of working class
            and lower middle class culture. They come from a very
            reserved, nerdy, neurotic strata of society. They may not be
            attracted to muscular, assertive men (or not willing to
            acknowledge the attraction anyway), but a great many women
            are. Camile Paglia has pointed out that many working-class
            women are attracted to such men simply because the sex is
            good, a reality that’s too uncomfortable for fainting-couch
            women’s studies graduates to acknowledge.
          +
        hodgicus says
               o July 19, 2018
            Whoa! Not so very Wary, Paul! Correct, though, imo.
   81. Pingback: I’m Toxic, You’re Toxic | Nick Wolven's Place
   82.
   markxneil says
          + July 17, 2018
       “The very communities where ‘toxic masculinity’ is being discussed
       most are the communities where the men are, in my experience,
       compassionate, egalitarian, and not at all toxic.”
       I actually quite disagree. It is the communities where toxic
       masculinity is being discussed that contain the most toxic
       masculinity. Time and time again, we see prominent male feminists
       being accused, even charged, with sexual crimes. These men are
       willing to do anything, including condemning all of men and
       masculinity, to reinforce the idea that police won’t help rape
       victims, and thus, shouldn’t report to police (what better message
       could a rapist want to spread with the credibility of the feminist
       movement behind it?), harming not only his own victims, but all
       victims (as well as future victims that could have been prevented
       had the victim gone forward) who believe that message, as well as
       society in general, as faith in the services designed to protect us
       and maintain order are undermined.
       No no no. The communities the topic of toxic masculinity are
       discussed in… they are rife with toxic masculinity. Moreso than the
       general population.
          +
        markxneil says
               o July 17, 2018
            I should note. Other than this one point, I largely agree. I
            should note (and you did skirt this point, but only briefly),
            that toxic masculinity originally began by describing
            something real…it began by describing a behaviour that took
            traditionally masculine characteristics, and ramped them up to
            unreasonable levels. This is something that can be discussed.
            But very quickly, ideologues began tacking on anything they
            didn’t like onto the term, and so homophobia became an example
            of toxic masculinity (and if toxic masculinity is a ramped up
            attribute of normal masculinity, then that means homophobia is
            being described as inherently masculine). eventually, the term
            toxic masculinity morphed yet further to describe masculinity,
            in general, as something inherently toxic.
            This transformation of the term clear shows a disdain, even
            hatred of men, and is routinely used by those who espouse
            these transformed versions, to spread their misandry and
            denigrate men in general. And in doing so, helps create the
            very divide in the relationship of the sexes you mentioned.
          +
        dirk says
               o July 18, 2018
            @mark: but you know that in Sweden, where kids are educated
            completely a-sexual and equal, the toxic masculinity (in
            crime) and the misfits are higher than everywhere else in
            Europe (especially compared to the Southern parts, where male
            attitudes still count?
          +
        Empty Space says
               o July 20, 2018
            “Time and time again, we see prominent male feminists being
            accused, even charged with sexual crimes.” I don’t know where
            you came up with that from I suspecty those men are greatly
            outnumbered by the non-feminist feminist men who are
            accused/charged.
   83.
   Andrew Meyer says
          + July 17, 2018
       You are to be congratulated on generating so much controversy, but
       please forgive me if any of my remarks here are redundant in this
       thread. Also, advanced apologies for “mansplaining” (though, if I
       understand your argument correctly, by extending you such regrets I
       may be communicating suspicion of toxic femininity). I think you
       are making some conflations and false equivalencies. Was the young
       woman in a swimsuit you describe really guilty of the same error
       (in either kind or degree) as the young man that cornered you
       behind the catering hall? I would argue that the latter is much
       worse, and that the contrast undermines the implicit symmetry your
       nomenclature encodes- “toxic femininity” simply isn’t the same kind
       of moral lapse as “toxic masculinity.” They are so different as to
       constitute different species of error, undeserving of names that
       mirror one-another so closely. I think also that your analysis
       radically underestimates the breadth and scope of the damage that
       toxic masculinity does. All women may not be “victims,” but the
       quality of all women’s lives is materially eroded by the prevalence
       of toxic masculinity in our culture. If one in ten men is toxically
       masculine in the manner of the man that accosted you (and
       statistics indicate that at least that many are, with your accoster
       exemplifying the very low end of the spectrum among that toxic
       10%), every women can expect to encounter toxic masculinity
       frequently enough and to a degree that will add serious stress to
       her life (with effects ranging from annoyance through neurosis and
       up to trauma), and some will suffer quite a bit worse. “Toxic
       femininity” surely has adverse effects on men, but I would be
       willing to bet a lot of money that one could devise empirical tests
       to prove that, taken across society at large, its impact is
       infinitesmal by comparison. Moreover, your construction of the
       category takes in so much that the concept collapses from
       vagueness. Why should a woman’s belittling a man’s strengths
       necessarily be “toxic femininity? Why should her gender be
       complicit? Maybe she is just a bigot who, like bigots of all
       genders, targets people that are different than her. Finally, I
       would argue that you are giving too little shrift to the ways in
       which male power is perpetuated in many societies. You are no doubt
       right that someone (man or woman) who is dressed to broadcast
       attractiveness is silly to resent being looked at, but there is
       looking and there is looking. No matter how a woman is dressed, she
       has a right to expect to be spoken to and looked at with respect.
       Men who leer, catcall, or insult her are not doing it out of some
       kind of uncontrollable evolutionary impulse, but to put her in her
       place. “Toxic masculinity” is not biological, it is social- a way
       of institutionalizing male privilege. Blaming women for “making
       themselves” the targets of such assaults only serves to reinforce
       the rules of a game that is designed to deprive women of freedom
       that men take for granted for themselves.
   84.
   Indie Wifey says
          + July 18, 2018
       We subsist in a promiscuity culture, thanks to the free love
       movements of the 60s. Our so called strong and independent women
       are throwing themselves about sexually – what kind of meta image do
       all those swipe n hookup participants think they have created? And
       “success” in that realm? It has nothing to do with attractiveness…
       “We” with this infinitely broadened stage (w tech) have too much
       attention to pursue. Shallow approval is everything to many. Tact
       and Resraint – allure – are back seated. I eagerly await them to
       cycle back in. I’m waiting for it to be way cool to be a lady
       again. and in the reacceptance of gentlemen and men as men. Wow –
       unicorns and rainbows eh?
       collective, cultural sour grapes feed the intertwined and symbiotic
       sj and feminist warring. equal outcome insistence of our entitled
       generations sets up so very many for disappointment, and the
       current climate fosters the leveling of fields as a taking down of
       all to the lower levels – it’s not diversity we are headed toward;
       rather homogenization of the collective “as is”.
   85. Pingback: Female prof ‘in exile’ calls out ‘toxic femininity’ and
       defends men: ‘Not all women are victims’
   86. Pingback: Female prof ‘in exile’ calls out ‘toxic femininity’ and
       defends men: ‘Not all women are victims’ | CauseACTION
   87.
   Michael says
          + July 18, 2018
       The problem with attempting to legitimize a term like “toxic
       masculinity” in any form is that it keeps it alive for anyone to
       apply where they see fit.
       Why are we so uncomfortable judging people and events based on
       their individual traits. A man who backs you into a dark corner at
       a party isn’t being “masculine” he’s being threatening, he’s being
       dominating, he’s being an asshole.
       It might make us feel better to find a category for things, like
       “masculinity,” it rarely helps our culture. It automatically fails
       to appreciate the actual situation and simply files it in the
       “proper” place for easy judgment.
   88.
   Terry G says
          + July 18, 2018
       Heather, thank you for putting yourself “out there” by writing this
       article.
       I think your points are “right on”. That may be because I agree
       with pretty much all of them.
       I am a male in my late 70’s and have been observing male-female
       interactions and trying to make sense of them for a long time.
       My basic conclusion is that humans continue to exist because of the
       survival drives embedded in our DNA as a result of many millions of
       successful experiments during our existence.
       That also works in the Lions, of course. The female lion does not
       just “decide” to be receptive. Her DNA does that for her. Genes
       want to survive and one way or another, they will.
       These drives seem to have worked well in the conditions where they
       developed (individuals and separated small groups). The problems
       come from when we began to live in larger groups with individuals
       close together. This was a new survival tool for the human race
       developed quickly more by intelligence than slow DNA experiment. In
       order to live close together and not kill each other, we developed
       social rules (laws and moral beliefs) that were intended to control
       our more destructive basic DNA drives. We have not lived close
       together long enough for the these old drives to change much.
       Many (if not most) people seem to think that these social artifacts
       are what control and drive us now. This is evidenced by many of the
       comments on your article. The thin layer of civilization is easily
       removed in some conditions and results in a violation of these
       social laws.
       Many of the comments reveal that the people think (or believe) that
       they consciously control all of their daily thoughts and actions.
       What we wear and how we act are strongly influenced by our
       underlying DNA drives without rising to the level of consciousness.
       Since we have a continuous spectrum of male-female ability to
       “control” ourselves, we have people on both ends of that spectrum
       that will “push the envelope” to try to satisfy their basic DNA
       drives.
       These are the “toxic” people and they can make it hard for the
       others to not break the law or customs.
       They are still part of the experiment.
       Even in my late life status, I will look at a “hot” woman. It is in
       my DNA and not easily controlled. I am not dead yet and my DNA
       drives are still very active.
       In my case, a “hot” woman is not necessarily young, sexy dressed,
       etc. A reasonably fit, intelligent, open, funny, engaging older
       woman, will get my attention, also.
       So, onward with the experiment!
       What will we be like in a few hundred or thousand more years?
       Assuming we make it that long.
   89. Pingback: Refreshing Common Sense: Female Biology Professor Writes
       Brilliant Essay, Calls Out ‘Toxic Femininity’ – Usa 24 FLASH
   90.
   David C Levy says
          + July 19, 2018
       Toxic feminism includes threatening men with false accusations of
       harassment or even assault in order to gain advantage. Like in
       college student to professor – give me a better grade or I will
       accuse you of touching me inappropriately.
   91.
   Marvelous Marvin says
          + July 19, 2018
       I would love to send quotes of your article, or a link to it, to my
       female Professor colleagues in an academic department at a major
       university. But if I (a white male, the only illegal alien in
       liberalism) send it, I shall be subject to an inquest. If I ascribe
       value to it, the female lionesses will show up to gobble up my
       whelps and demand that I shall never be allowed to create any new
       ones. And they shall be quite certain of their own superiority and
       shall be immediately reinforced by jeering gangs of chorus. Thanks
       for writing it, but there is no hope. The toxic female has siezed
       power, rules, and will only be dislodged with the collapse of the
       society.
   92.
   Empty Space says
          + July 20, 2018
       There’s definitely some truth in this article but it’s also a bit
       of a straw man argument. The 90% naked princess whining about the
       men staring at her sounds more like a comic book character than a
       real brain-dead amateur feminist & liberals don’t always assume
       anything a member of an officially certified oppressed group says
       is irrreproachable truth. Look at how much they hate Clarence
       Thomas.
   93. Pingback: Toxische Weiblichkeit | Alles Evolution
   94.
   Richard Baxter says
          + July 23, 2018
       While leading a discussion on the nature and effects of sexual
       objectification (“She dresses to attract, he perceives seduction: a
       gender gap in attribution of intent to women’s revealing style of
       dress and its relation to blaming the victims of sexual violence”;
       Moor 2010), I remember being asked what is the point of all this
       research, why am I interested in asking about presentation? Do I
       think it causes the abuse of a person? I responded by saying not
       necessarily; in terms of sexual assault the misinterpreted prime is
       more likely to be taken out on a more vulnerable member of the
       group.

   Comments are closed.

   Previous PostThe Fear of White Power
   Next Post‘Grope-gate’ and #MeToo’s Crisis of Legitimacy

Narrated

   Narrated, Top Stories

NARRATED: How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life

   Greg Ellis reads How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life, Stephen
   Elliott’s essay about being accused of rape on the Shitty Media Med
   list in 2017. It was published...

   October 3, 2019

Podcast

   Podcast, Top Stories

PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of Crowds

   Conservative intellectual Douglas Murray talks to Toby Young about the
   moral shortcomings of identity politics and the Marxist underpinnings
   of the Social Justice movement, both subjects of his new...

   October 3, 2019

Top Stories

     * The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
       The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
     * 'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
       'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
     * Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
       Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
     * From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
       From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
     * PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
       PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
     * 'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
       'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
     * Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
       Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
     * The Case for Black Optimism
       The Case for Black Optimism
     * Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America
       Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America

   [merchstoread.png]

Share

     * (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)

   Help free thought live

   Close and accept
   Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this
   website, you agree to their use.
   To find out more, including how to control cookies, see here: Cookie
   Policy

   Free Thought Lives

Follow Us

     * Menu Item
     * Menu Item

     * Copyright © 2019 Quillette Pty Ltd | All Rights Reserved

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.
   #Quillette » Feed Quillette » Comments Feed Quillette » Explaining
   Monogamy to Vox Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * Home
     * About
     * Subscribe
     * Donate
     * Quillette Circle

Quillette

Free Thought Lives

   Menu

     * Features
     * Science / Tech
     * Politics
     * Review
     * Podcast
     * Narrated

   Close Menu

   Media, Sex, Social Science
   Published on June 7, 2018

Explaining Monogamy to Vox

   written by William Buckner

   In the first episode of their new Netflix series, entitled Explained,
   the folks over at Vox set out to explain monogamy. Or at least, that is
   what the title (“Monogamy, Explained”) appeared to promise. But by the
   time it was over, very little seemed to have been explained. The
   central arguments, as I understand them, are that monogamy didn’t exist
   until after the invention of agriculture, marrying for love didn’t
   exist until roughly 1700 AD, and the concept of sexual selection was
   developed by Victorian scientists like Charles Darwin in part to
   justify traditional gender roles.

   IFRAME: https://www.youtube.com/embed/DCGyLjBjuGI

   Vox interviews four experts for their video: relationship advice
   columnist Dan Savage, historian Stephanie Coontz, author Christopher
   Ryan, and evolutionary biologist David Barash. Of these contributors,
   Barash is given the least screen time. He is allowed to provide a brief
   description of classic sexual selection theory, noting the problem of
   paternity uncertainty for males, and that because of differences
   between sperm and eggs, males can have larger fitness payoffs by being
   more promiscuous than females generally can. The narrator, however,
   dismisses this idea, announcing that there’s a “big issue” with it
   (more on this later).

   Ryan gets the most screen time, and the video devotes most of its time
   and energies to the promotion of his ideas, sometimes to comical
   effect. Ryan argues for the importance of sperm competition among
   humans—the idea that females throughout our evolutionary history were
   having sex with multiple males in quick succession, leading to
   competition between different men’s sperm to fertilize a woman’s eggs.
   He makes the claim that human testicle size is “intermediate” between
   that of gorillas, and chimpanzees and bonobos (among primates, greater
   sperm competition is associated with larger testicle size). As he says
   this, a graphic appears showing Human (34g), Gorilla (23g), Chimpanzee
   (149g), and Bonobo (168g) testicle size.

   Vox’s image on Primate testicle size.

   Saying human testicle size is “intermediate” between gorillas, and
   chimps and bonobos, is like saying Lebron James (2.03 m) is
   intermediate in height between Peter Dinklage (1.32 m) and three
   basketball hoops stacked on top of each other (9.15 m).

   The fact that both chimps and bonobos have such large testicles means
   we can tentatively infer that our Last Common Ancestor before our
   lineage split from theirs likely had large testicles as well. If
   anything, this points to a significant decline in testicle size over
   the course of human evolutionary history, as sperm competition became
   less important and humans transitioned to pair-bonding.

   Funnily enough, in the source from which Vox sources its testicle size
   data, the volume Sexual Selection and the Origins of Human Mating
   Systems (2009), primatologist Alan F. Dixson argues against the ideas
   Ryan describes regarding sperm competition in humans. Dixson writes
   that, “the assumption that sperm competition has played a significant
   role in the evolution of the genus Homo is not supported by extensive
   comparative studies of the reproductive anatomy and behaviour of extant
   primates.”

   Dixson further adds that, “Human testes sizes are unexceptional and
   consistent with an evolutionary history which involved pair formation
   or polygyny as the principal mating system. Sperm competition pressure
   would have been low under these circumstances.”

   In the video, Ryan also presents a fairly gentle picture of communal
   caregiving in hunter-gatherer societies, claiming that “If a child is
   crying, the adult nearest to that child picks it up. Nobody says, ‘Hey,
   Hey, your kid’s crying!’ There is a commonality to parenthood among
   hunter-gatherers.” The narrator then goes on to describe partible
   paternity (the idea that a child can have more than one father), which
   is found among a number of Amazonian societies.

   Now, let’s compare Ryan’s claims with an excerpt from anthropologists
   Kim Hill and Ana Magdalena Hurtado’s work on the Ache of Paraguay. The
   Ache are hunter-gatherers, and also believe in partible paternity. Hill
   and Hurtado interview an Ache boy, who says that:

     Bejaro-the-killer was really mean. Really really mean. He came back
     from hunting and heard my brother crying. My brother was crying a
     lot and wouldn’t shut up. Then Bejaro slammed him against a tree. He
     slammed him and he was dead. My mother was crying when my father
     returned from hunting. My father didn’t do anything. He was upset.
     He didn’t do anything. He was really afraid of Bejaro-the-killer.
     Bejaro was really strong. (Hill & Hurtado, 444)

   Among the Ache, children whose fathers have died are also significantly
   more likely to be killed by adult men than children with fathers. This
   is precisely because people often don’t want to care for other people’s
   children. Further, despite what you may expect, having lots of fathers
   doesn’t necessarily help increase survival. As Hill and Hurtado write:

     Presumably women who produced children with more than two fathers
     greatly reduced the confidence of paternity for all the candidate
     fathers and risked losing parental investment altogether. Probably
     for this reason children with three or more fathers appear to have
     fared worse than those with only one or two fathers. (Hill and
     Hurtado, 444)

   Notice that this corroborates what David Barash had to say about the
   problem of paternal uncertainty, and which the Vox narrator casually
   dismissed.

   Hill and Hurtado add that the personal stories they hear from the Ache
   themselves “suggest the theme of never-ending conflict between men and
   women over spreading of potential paternity and the production of extra
   children outside the marriage.” For example, an Ache child says:

     My uncle was disliked [by the speaker’s father]. My dad would split
     his brother open and knock him down with a bow. After some point in
     time my father never liked his brother any more. He hated him. (My
     uncle) would have sex with his (my dad’s) wife. My father never
     liked again the one that used to have sex with his wife. He would
     club fight with a bow then. In the forest they would club fight with
     bows. (Hill and Hurtado, 443)

   Another society that believes in partible paternity are the Mehinaku of
   Brazil. During the video, after Barash’s brief discussion of the kind
   of sex differences we might predict in the light of traditional sexual
   selection theory, the narrator criticizes his explanation, saying, “But
   there’s one big issue with that explanation of promiscuous, possessive
   men and demure women. At lots of points of time in places of the world
   people didn’t follow it.” As she says this, images of a number of
   individuals and societies are displayed and labelled for the viewer,
   one of which is the Mehinaku.

   The main source of information on the Mehinaku is anthropologist Thomas
   Gregor. In Gregor’s work, we in fact see an affirmation of the
   “traditional story,” briefly mentioned by Barash, before being waved
   away by Ryan and the narrator. Gregor writes that:

     “All men,” Ketepe informs me, “like sex. But women are different.”
     My data supports Ketepe’s belief to the extent that sexuality has a
     somewhat different meaning for the women than it does for the men.
     Men are more overtly sexual, and hence it is possible for women to
     use their sexuality to secure food and support in exchange for
     intercourse. (Gregor, 33)

   Gregor expands on this, and describes how Mehinaku social norms and
   ideology police female sexuality:

     Moreover, women are subject to repressive beliefs and practices that
     confine and even suffocate their sexual natures. From an early age,
     a girl knows that she is “just a girl” and in many respects inferior
     to boys. As she matures, she learns that her vagina is “smelly” and
     “disgusting.” She must take care that others do not see it when she
     sits or walks. With her first menses, she discovers that she is a
     danger to others. She can be held responsible for contaminating
     food, defiling sacred rituals, and making men sick. When she enters
     the network of sexual affairs, she finds that she must comport
     herself carefully. A casual boyfriend may seize on any unusual or
     uninhibited conduct in sexual relations and joke about it among his
     friends. One of the reasons that a woman expects gifts of her lovers
     is that a token of commitment is insurance that she will not be
     denigrated in village gossip. Even discreet sexual relationships are
     risky, however, since pregnancy is known to be painful and
     dangerous. A Mehinaku woman’s sexuality is thus linked to a sense of
     inferiority to men, to feelings of disgust about the genitalia, to
     concern about menstrual contamination, and to fear of unwanted
     pregnancy. (Gregor, 33)

   Exactly as Barash said, and pace Ryan and the narrator, we see strong
   male coercion and control of female sexuality, and comparatively
   ‘demure’ women (though in this circumstance, we see the role of culture
   in enforcing this). The Mehinaku have a strongly masculine culture,
   with male self-worth tied characteristics such as height and body size
   and skills in wrestling. The Mehinaku are one of a number of strongly
   patriarchal societies that have ‘men’s cults.’ Women who challenge the
   status quo or glance at the men’s sacred instruments are threatened
   with gang rape. If this society is supposed to be an example of people
   not following ‘traditional’ gender roles, then it’s only an example
   insofar as they represent one of the more extreme manifestations of
   such behaviors.

   Despite the glamorized picture of partible paternity painted by the
   video, as we can see with the Mehinaku, there is often still some male
   control over female sexuality. In a review article, anthropologist
   Robert S. Walker and his colleagues write that among societies with
   partible paternity, there is the “common theme of men allowing sexual
   license to wives among special male friends (e.g., Arara, Arawete,
   Canela, and Guaja), among real and classificatory brothers (e.g.,
   Curripaco, Matis, Wanano, and Yanomami), and between fathers and sons
   (Matis).” Beliefs about partible paternity are often used by males to
   benefit male coalitions between friends and kin. Further, Walker et al.
   add that, “higher-status men…can garner female attention through better
   gifts, good health, and social capital. Partible paternity beliefs
   allow these men to father more offspring with more women and fewer
   repercussions (i.e., lower risk of retaliation or infanticide by
   jealous husbands).”

   Among the Mehinaku, in Gregor’s (admittedly small) sample, the four
   taller, highest status males had more than double the amount of sexual
   partners on average than the 11 shorter, lower status males. Rather
   than reducing mating inequality, partible paternity tends to exacerbate
   it, with males having even larger variance in reproductive success in
   these societies, with high-status males often reaping the benefits.

   There is a reason why anthropologist Joseph Henrich describes normative
   monogamy as “sexual egalitarianism.” It’s not that a monogamous
   marriage itself is unique—across the vast majority of societies, the
   majority of marriages have nearly always been monogamous—the key
   difference is primarily in the way normative monogamy acts to prevent
   polygyny, through social norms and legal enforcement. The main
   alternative to monogamy throughout history has not been an egalitarian,
   polyamorous free for all, but rather a relatively small number of elite
   males having multiple, sometimes even dozens, of wives. There are rare
   examples of polyandry being practiced, as I described here, but they
   are generally restricted to very specific socioecological conditions
   (such as a highly skewed sex ratio, high male mortality, extended male
   absence, or among brothers to maintain land inheritance) that don’t
   often co-occur.

   In the Ethnographic Atlas, 85 percent (1041 out of 1231) of societies
   are coded as practicing at least occasional polygyny, with 15 percent
   (186 out of 1231) practicing only monogamy, and less than one percent
   (4 out of 1231) practicing polyandry.

   Towards the end of the video, we hit aggressive levels of self-parody,
   when the narrator implies that the idea of sexual selection represented
   a Victorian-era conspiracy by patriarchal male scientists, and that
   monogamy is a “made up construct” and a “way to enforce gender roles”.

   Yet, as Henrich and his colleagues persuasively argue, “In suppressing
   intrasexual competition and reducing the size of the pool of unmarried
   men, normative monogamy reduces crime rates, including rape, murder,
   assault, robbery and fraud, as well as decreasing personal abuses.”
   Henrich et al. sum up their argument, writing that:

     We propose that the unusual package of norms and institutions that
     constitute modern monogamous marriage systems spread across Europe,
     and then the globe, because of the package’s impact on the
     competitive success of the polities, nations and religions that
     adopted this cultural package. Reducing the pool of unmarried men
     and levelling the reproductive playing field would have decreased
     crime, which would have spurred commerce, travel and the free flow
     of ideas and innovations.

   Normative monogamy seems to have important group-level benefits, and
   tends to reduce the kinds of harmful behaviors associated with greater
   intrasexual competition, among both males and females.

   Across sub-Saharan Africa, women are twice as likely to justify
   wife-beating as men are, and “the odds of women justifying IPVAW
   [intimate partner violence against women] more than men increased with
   increasing country polygamy rate.” If polygyny exacerbates intrasexual
   competition, then women may be more likely to support norms of intimate
   partner violence against co-wives or other women they’re competing
   with. And, as I noted in a previous article for Quillette, on the
   behavioral ecology of male violence:

     There are other socioecological factors where we see an association
     with lethal conflict, such as the link between polygyny and war.
     Terrorist organizations such as Boko Haram and ISIS have exploited
     marriage inequality among young males by paying the brideprice
     (money or gifts given to a potential wife’s family), or providing
     wives, for recruits in the Middle East and West Africa.^35 When some
     males monopolize access to wealth or mates, young males who are left
     out may behave violently to try and distinguish themselves,
     competing for control of such resources.

   Despite the claims in the video that marrying for love is a recent
   phenomenon in human history, there are plenty of examples of it
   occurring across societies, even where marriages are usually arranged.
   The Kurnai of Australia had an expansive kinship system that classified
   many unrelated, nearby individuals as close relatives. They also had
   strong prohibitions against incest, and the punishment for violating
   them could be severe beatings or death. In such circumstances, there
   were numerous accounts of young women and men, who were considered
   ‘brother’ and ‘sister’ fleeing and eloping, while risking being killed
   by angry relatives. In some cases they’d spend a year ostracized, only
   to return a year later with a child, and grudgingly brought back into
   the fold. These were couples who loved each other so much, they were
   willing to risk being killed by their own family to be together.

   Someone who fails to follow prescribed marriage rules may receive
   strong objections from their kin, yet you can find examples of this
   across numerous cultures. As anthropologist Bruce Knauft writes in his
   work on The Gebusi (2015) of New Guinea:

     These “unreciprocated” unions provoke strong objections from the
     young woman’s fathers and brothers. But the young couple can prevail
     if the woman is strong willed or runs away with her new husband.
     Though the parents or brothers of the woman get upset and might beat
     her if they find her, many of these romantic unions endure and are
     ultimately accepted as marriages. (Knauft, 70)

   Marrying for love isn’t new: what’s new is that people in the West
   today tend to have much greater freedom to do so. In his volume on The
   Dobe Ju/’hoansi (2013) hunter-gatherers of the Kalahari Desert, Richard
   Lee writes that:

     All first marriages are arranged by parents, and the girls have
     little say in the matter. If the choice is unpopular, the girls will
     show their displeasure by kicking and screaming, a way of asserting
     their independent voice in decision making against the alliance of
     parents and potential husband. If they protest long and hard enough,
     the marriage will be called off. (Lee, 89)

   Some young girls have even attempted suicide in order to get out of
   arranged marriages. Lee notes that close to half of all first marriages
   fail, and that the early periods of marriage are often turbulent.
   However, he also adds that:

     …this level of conflict is not sustained indefinitely. After the
     initial stormy period Ju/′hoan couples usually settle down in a
     stable long-term relationship that may last 20 or 30 years or more,
     terminating in the death of one or another spouse. There is ample
     evidence that Ju men and women develop deep bonds of affection,
     though it is not the custom of the Ju/′hoansi to openly display it.
     Successful marriages are marked by joking and ease of interaction
     between the partners. Only about 10 percent of marriages that last
     five years or longer end in divorce. (Lee, 90)

   We can see that the practice of arranged marriages, commonly found all
   over the world, primarily to form alliances or for economic reasons,
   often does impede a person’s ability to choose a partner for
   themselves. Yet even in societies with more coercive marriage
   practices, you find numerous examples of people rebelling against kin
   obligations, and prevailing norms, to marry for love.

   The Himba pastoralists of Namibia have both arranged marriages chosen
   by kin, and ‘love matches’ determined by personal choice. While the
   Himba have a significant amount of ‘extra-pair births’ and high rates
   of adultery, there are striking differences between couples in arranged
   marriages compared to those in ‘love matches.’ Anthropologist Brooke A.
   Scelza found that, “In this sample, 31.8 percent of Himba women had at
   least one extra-pair (omoka) birth during their lifetime. This accounts
   for 17.6 percent of all marital births.” However, despite this
   high-rate, “Women in ‘love matches’ were significantly more faithful to
   their husbands than women in arranged marriages. There were no omoka
   children born within love matches (0 of 79), compared with 23.2 percent
   omoka children from arranged marriages.”

   People often choose to be in monogamous pairings. Despite the
   perception that monogamy is coercive, overall normative monogamy
   constrains the behavior primarily of higher-status males, seemingly to
   the benefit of the rest of society.

   Rather than explaining monogamy, the Vox video portrays it as something
   alien and largely useless. It seems like this particular narrative was
   deliberately chosen before a frame of video had been shot. The expert
   they interviewed who got much of the detail right was David Barash, yet
   he was given the least screen time. I suspect they chose him because he
   wrote a book (which the makers of the video almost certainly did not
   read) called The Myth of Monogamy. But once they started talking to him
   they were perhaps disappointed to discover that the title refers to the
   historical prevalence of polygyny, and not the polyamorous utopia
   described by Christopher Ryan.

   Near the beginning of the video, soon after asserting that humans are
   “terrible” at monogamy, the narrator asks a central question: “Why
   would humans all around the world invent a rule that’s so difficult to
   follow, and treat breaking as such an enormous betrayal?”

   I’m not sure humans are actually “terrible” at monogamy. Rather, the
   difficulty often lies in finding the right person, and the cultural
   norms and socioecological conditions that effectively promote it.
   Nonetheless, the question the Vox narrator asked is a fair one, which
   makes it all the more unfortunate that the video never attempted to
   answer it. We can ask this question about any number of other social
   norms and institutions found all over the world, such as prohibitions
   against theft, violence, corruption, or lying. It’s easy for many
   people to understand why those sorts of behaviors would be forbidden:
   they’re bad for society, they’re bad for the people being hurt,
   cheated, or deceived, they set bad examples for everyone else, etc.
   It’s a shame that Vox was unwilling to consider the possibility that
   normative monogamy fulfilled a similar function.


   William Buckner is a student of Evolutionary Anthropology at UC Davis.
   He is interested in cultural evolution and understanding human conflict
   patterns across cultures. He can be followed on
   Twitter @Evolving_Moloch

Share this:

     * Pocket
     * WhatsApp
     *
     * Email
     * Print
     *

Related

   Listen to this article
   [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1] [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1]
   Voiced by Amazon Polly Voiced by Amazon Polly

   Filed under: Media, Sex, Social Science

97 Comments

    1.
   The Renegade of Funk (@renegadetensai) says
          + June 7, 2018
       It’s Vox. One can hardly be surprised. They’re married (see what i
       did there?) to their agenda. The dishonesty of calling obvious
       propaganda an, “explanation,” is precisely why the term “fake news”
       is so popular these days. Sad!
          +
        Yuge Trax (@TexastraxYuge) says
               o June 8, 2018
            Well said.
    2.
   MF says
          + June 7, 2018
       If your portrayal of the Vox series is correct, it brings out some
       of the worst in interdisciplinary work. There is a tendency in poor
       interdisciplinary work for one side, usually the less rigorous of
       the two involved, to co-opt the empirical strength of the other
       discipline to prop-up its own narrative.
       In this case, the Vox team is using a very small portion of Brash’s
       work to add a veneer of scientific respectability to their
       argument. As the author here explores, Vox’s team either were
       ignorant of Brash’s broader argument or simply choose to ignore the
       pieces that countered their argument. They were more than happy
       however to include Brash insofar as he strengthened their
       scientific credibility with what he presented, but were willing to
       exclude the parts that did not.
       Its a depressing state of affairs, since the idea of being
       interdisciplinary is to attempt to present a more holistic
       understanding of an issue that crosses multiple disciplines.
          +
        Peter says
               o June 9, 2018
            It is true and you are right. Look up any (ANY!) Vox video
            online and you’ll see that they do not ask questions, they
            only want you to believe their answer. They are the most
            dishonest people ever and they hate society.
          +
        ccscientist says
               o June 10, 2018
            Since there is no truth but only competing “narratives”, this
            is a dandy way to proceed /sarc
    3.
   Ian says
          + June 7, 2018
       I have always imagined that a future polygamous society, would
       birth people in labs and have sex for entertainment, while everyone
       makes it their duty to never neglect anyone, thereby restricting
       violent reactions from people in pain. Or at least something like
       that, where we live in the future.
       Because of this, I find it strange that anyone would look to the
       past, and consider things from the past to be good arguments for
       how humans should behave in the future.
       “… then women may be more likely to support norms of intimate
       partner violence against co-wives or other women they’re competing
       with.”
       I have my doubts that educated people would do this. Or people with
       a happy upbringing. In which case, such evil can be extinguished.
          +
        Shenme Shihou says
               o June 7, 2018
            I wouldnt be so sure. Evolutionary psycologist Gad Saad argues
            that the #1 factor of child abuse is a step parent in the
            home.
               o
             Jonathan says
                    # June 7, 2018
                 Data strongly supports this in the Unites States. The
                 Fourth National Incidence Study of Child Abuse and
                 Neglect, for example, reports that abuse is 10 times more
                 likely with a step-parent living in the home, and 20
                 times more likely with an unmarried partner present.
                 Full report linked below:
                 https://www.acf.hhs.gov/sites/default/files/opre/nis4_rep
                 ort_congress_full_pdf_jan2010.pdf
                 See particularly section 5.3.2: “Differences in the
                 Incidence of Endangerment Standard
                 Maltreatment Related to Family Structure and Living
                 Arrangement” on page 5-30.
                 Another study (link below), using data from Missouri,
                 concluded that “child death resulting from inflicted
                 injuries” (murder) is nearly 50 times more likely when
                 “young children reside in a household with unrelated
                 adults” (step-parent, boyfriend, etc.).
                 http://pediatrics.aappublications.org/content/116/5/e687
                    #
                  Micha Elyi says
                         @ June 12, 2018
                      #1 likeliest abuser is bio-mom. If someone else
                      abuses, bio-mom is enabler #1.
               o
             markbul says
                    # June 7, 2018
                 More accurately, it’s the presence of the man in the
                 child’s life during the first three years. If they aren’t
                 there then, they don’t see the child as family.
          +
        roccocannoli says
               o June 8, 2018
            Tradition, the democracy of the dead, as Chesterton put it.
            Makes sense to me to look to an effective past.
          +
        HOLF HALEY says
               o June 9, 2018
            Hi, this happens in third world countries amongst well
            educated women. I’m from Nigeria and it’s really not that hard
            to imagine something like that here,where the male is
            basically treated like a good, especially amongst the Muslims.
               o
             Micha Elyi says
                    # June 12, 2018
                 In America “well educated women”also treat men like a
                 good, an economic good, not like a full human being.
          +
        Ursus Maritimus says
               o June 11, 2018
            Ian said
            “I find it strange that anyone would look to the past, and
            consider things from the past to be good arguments for how
            water molecules should behave in the future.”
            Anyone who says “why should we look to experiments in the past
            to see how bridges, or engines, or cats, or potatoes, or
            mathematics, or whatever should behave in the future.” is a
            fantasist who should be kept away from things that matter.
    4.
   Naava (@Naava_Shoshan) says
          + June 7, 2018
       Fascinating read, thank you.
    5.
   Jack B. Nimble says
          + June 7, 2018
       “………..People often choose to be in monogamous pairings. Despite the
       perception that monogamy is coercive, overall normative monogamy
       constrains the behavior primarily of higher-status males, seemingly
       to the benefit of the rest of society……….”
       I think that Buckner is right here, except that I would change
       ‘rest of society’ to ‘rest of the adult males.’
       To some degree, we can interrogate past cultures regarding variance
       in male and female reproductive success [RS] with genetic data. In
       a hypothetical perfectly monogamous species, the variance in male
       RS should equal that among females, whereas in polygynous
       societies, male variance in RS can greatly exceed female variance.
       Y-chromosome data suggest that pastoral nomadic cultures in Asia,
       for example, were characterized by large variance in male RS:
       https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC4430317/
       Buckner’s last paragraph tiptoes around something that should be
       stated outright: in many ancient cultures for which we have written
       records [the Bible, for example], daughters were considered to be
       the property of their fathers until marriage, when they became the
       property of their husbands. Violations of sexual norms were largely
       viewed in the same light as property crimes like theft or cheating.
       For example, rape was treated primarily as a property crime, with
       the rapist being forced to marry the woman he had raped. An
       unmarried woman who was raped was otherwise not marriageable and
       thus would have been an economic burden on her father.
          +
        Crispin Robinson says
               o June 9, 2018
            “………..People often choose to be in monogamous pairings.
            Despite the perception that monogamy is coercive, overall
            normative monogamy constrains the behavior primarily of
            higher-status males, seemingly to the benefit of the rest of
            society……….”
            One could just as easily come to the conclusion that normative
            monogamy constrains the behaviour of hypergamous females…
            Perhaps it constrains the worst excesses of both sexes…
          +
        Micha Elyi says
               o June 12, 2018
            You are wrong about the Bible and ancient societies, Nimble.
            No, females were not “considered to be the property of their
            fathers until marriage” but I see how you would make such a
            simpleminded error. You try to shoehorn ancient societies you
            do not understand into a modern secularist understanding of
            words and phrases like “property”, “sexual norms”, and “rape”.
               o
             jeremiah black says
                    # June 17, 2018
                 True. It’s probably more accurate to say that women were
                 under the protection and care of their fathers than they
                 were their property in the sense that slaves or items
                 might be.
    6.
   K says
          + June 7, 2018
       I can’t help but read male SJW/feminist behaviors as a reproductive
       strategy. I have only my observations to go on, not any real
       research, but it would be intereting to see if any qualified
       scientists have reached the same conclusion.
          +
        Johan says
               o June 7, 2018
            @K…Joe Rogan (JRE podcast) constantly says this…Beta males
            only shot at getting laid…
          +
        Rob says
               o June 8, 2018
            When I covered student politics for the campus newspaper, the
            male activists were engaged in what I’d call rapid serial
            monogamy.
            Jian Ghomeshi, the Canadian broadcaster who had several sexual
            assault charges brought against him, was the social justice
            champion during his student days, leading the students union,
            welcome in the feminist clubs, and always surrounded by young
            women.
            So yeah, it absolutely is a mating strategy, and a very
            effective one.
               o
             Slutocrat (version 2.0.1.8) (@Slutocrat) says
                    # June 12, 2018
                 It’s possible that (a very small minority of) men may
                 pretend to be feminists in order to “score” with more
                 women. Obviously, abusive partners don’t punch a woman
                 out on the first date, but instead woo her with
                 old-fashioned charm. And abusers groom victims; even
                 those who don’t will act very respectably to throw people
                 off the scent, as indeed most smart criminals do. So I
                 guess K could be right that a minority of women pretend
                 to be feminists as a mating strategy, perhaps to weed out
                 abusive men and only get together with safe men or men
                 who share their values. But you could say that for any
                 political opinion, religion, belief, identity, sport or
                 hobby. Don’t most people prefer partners (and friends)
                 who share at least some of their values? So unless
                 explored further, I don’t see this as a particularly
                 insightful idea.
                    #
                  K says
                         @ June 13, 2018
                      My comment wasn’t as clear as it could have been. I
                      was talking about male feminists using the trappings
                      of feminism in order to gain access to potential
                      mates.
    7.
   Christopher Ryan says
          + June 7, 2018
       This strikes me as a pretty fair-minded and balanced critique, and
       the author makes some solid points. In Sex at Dawn, we present far
       more evidence than the admittedly unconvincing “intermediate”
       testicular volume in support of ancestral promiscuity (penis
       morphology, repeated thrusting movement, frequent non-reproductive
       sexual behavior, female multiple orgasm, female copulatory
       vocalization, etc.), so our argument is quite a bit more
       comprehensive than what the Vox piece could present in a few
       minutes. (And, for what it’s worth, I agree that the piece would
       have benefitted from giving Dr. Barash more screen time and less to
       me.)
       As for the parenting issue, the anthropological literature is rich
       with examples of pretty much anything you’d care to argue. Our book
       has dozens of examples of foragers (and bonobos) caring communally
       for young. Sarah Hrdy’s writing on this is well-respected among
       anthropologists, as I’m sure the author is aware. The notion that
       foraging societies are and were deeply interdependent and
       egalitarian is well-established and not, despite the examples of
       abuse cited here, a subject of much dispute among experts.
       Still, there are many unanswered questions concerning the
       evolutionary roots of human behavior, and I appreciate Mr.
       Buckner’s perspective.
          +
        K says
               o June 7, 2018
            Your comment reminds me of a world I once knew. Where has that
            world gone, I wonder?
            Kudos to you for such a decent reply.
          +
        Johan says
               o June 7, 2018
            @ Christopher Ryan…Nice of you. Well behaved.
          +
        seekinghealthandwisdom says
               o June 7, 2018
            Honest Question for you: are there examples in human cultures
            of men sincerely and lovingly caring for, and raising
            long-term, children that they know are not their own? Broadly,
            across all swaths of the society?
            Given the spectrum of temperament for men, I personally find
            this unfathomable. Which makes me curious.
               o
             Christopher Ryan says
                    # June 7, 2018
                 Yes. We discuss this at some length in Sex at Dawn. The
                 Mosuo of China are a solid example of a society in which
                 men raise their sisters’ children and have little or no
                 role in raising their biological children.
                    #
                  David says
                         @ June 8, 2018
                      I remember there being an African tribe where the
                      males raised the children whilst females hunted. Yet
                      on further investigation it was found that the males
                      were raising the children to simply raise their
                      status with females. A different behaviour expressed
                      by the sexual selection motivation.
                      From an evolutionary perspective, males raising
                      their sister’s offspring will still provide
                      evolutionary benefit for genetic survival, although
                      greatly diluted.
                      Could the Mosuo be an example of R/K selection?
                    #
                  Robert Paulson says
                         @ June 8, 2018
                      @Christopher Ryan,
                      That would be the uncles looking after the their
                      nieces and nephews, so they are still related
                      through close kinship. Do you know if any examples
                      where men communally raise children, even those whom
                      they have no familial relation to?
                         @
                       Christopher Ryan says
                              - June 8, 2018
                           You have to keep in mind that in small h/g
                           bands, people are all related to some extent.
                           The gene pool is not sufficient for there to be
                           children who have no genetic overlap with the
                           adults. So the examples you’re asking for
                           really cannot exist. But it’s clear that many
                           societies don’t value kinship over other forms
                           of relatedness, like belonging to the same
                           clan, for example. The assumption that genetic
                           relatedness trumps all other forms of social
                           organization in all human societies appears to
                           be unwarranted.
                         @
                       Henry A. says
                              - June 11, 2018
                           Just like your analysis of the Ache, I think
                           such view of Musuo lacks depth. While on the
                           surface it looks one way, a more rigorous
                           approach highlights something different.
                           https://anthrosource.onlinelibrary.wiley.com/do
                           i/abs/10.1111/aman.12125
                           However, it is true there is no stated
                           obligation for the father to care for its own
                           children, especially since he is already
                           *forced* to care for his sister’s (but the fact
                           they still often do says a lot in favor of a
                           biological approaches)
                           Also, the Musuo women often have a single
                           partner at a time which can last a lifetime.
                           Now, I can grant you that there is no moral
                           pressure against promicuity (though it only
                           makes your case weaker).
                           Lastly even on a logical standpoint, your
                           thesis has a problem: you say
                           ” The assumption that genetic relatedness
                           trumps all other forms of social organization
                           in all human societies appears to be
                           unwarranted. ”
                           But in society you admit to be genetically
                           homogeneous ( ” You have to keep in mind that
                           in small h/g bands, people are all related to
                           some extent ” ), the fact that bloodline, in
                           the form of sister’s children, trumps is
                           actually in your disavantage.
                           In addition of all that, you also have to fight
                           against statistics and trends: 85% of societies
                           are more centered around polygyny VS less than
                           1% practice polyandry. Exceptions, especially
                           flawed ones, cannot repel statististics.
          +
        Bill says
               o June 8, 2018
            I’ve gone back and forward on this issue for awhile since I
            feel there is probably (or there will be) a preferable
            alternative to the current “least bad option” of monogomy but
            the biggest issue that keeps me from not endorsing an
            alternative to it is the practical issue of “high status”
            males hoarding multiple mistresses and a massive increase in
            desperate low status males, almost of whom will suffer in some
            way from a shortage of mates and some of whom may resort to
            violence.
            What would be your answer/solution to the idea of issue of
            extreme “sexual inequality” that could result from jettisoning
            monogomy, especially in a time where some men have enormous
            wealth they can use to support multiple wives which other
            males can’t hope to compete with?
          +
        AARON D JENSEN says
               o June 13, 2018
            Chris your a class act, and I have long appreciated your
            counter narrative on this topic.
          +
        jeremiah black says
               o June 17, 2018
            Very good of you to leave a comment. Cheers. I do tend to
            agree with Buckner’s overall thesis here, as I have personally
            witnessed in several communities that the absence of monogamy
            and exclusive pairings does tend to merely produce a society
            of high status males with multiple female partners, not the
            equitable polyamorous free for all that many expected, and
            that monogamy is quite obviously a large developmental benefit
            to societal success, despite its problems. (The fact that we
            have to seek out far less developed societies to find data on
            normalized non-monogamy should have perhaps been a giveaway).
            Regardless, very nice of you to pop by with a civil addendum.
            Happy fathers day and/or your dad.
    8.
   Supra says
          + June 7, 2018
       This show popped up in my suggestions on Netflix last night. As
       soon as I saw “Vox” I immediately decided not to waste my time.
       They would kill a small child if they thought that it would benefit
       their agenda.
    9.
   Alex Popkin says
          + June 7, 2018
       This is an excellent article: thorough research, numerous
       citations, clarity and careful attention to detail. It thoroughly
       demolishes the video from Vox, and after reading this, no
       intelligent person could possibly take the video seriously.
       Past experience tells us, however, that there’s no chance of Vox
       acknowledging the well-founded criticism made against them or
       admitting any mistakes. I’m glad that Buckner said the video is
       close to self-parody. The same could be said for almost anything
       that Vox coughs up.
       To read a thorough demolition of Vox in its entirety, see
       “Explaining it all to you” in Current Affairs, Nov. 2016.
       https://www.currentaffairs.org/2016/11/explaining-it-all
          +
        OleK says
               o June 8, 2018
            That Current Affairs article is awesome.
   10.
   Franco León says
          + June 7, 2018
       Quite a civil reply sir. It’s surprising to find you here. (If it’s
       indeed you). Nevertheless it is good to see that you are able to
       leave the door open for discussion. The author does it at the end
       of the article, and you do it in your comment. It’s actually
       heartening.
       If there is consensus to be built here, is that we ought to have
       the right to pursue our sexual and sentimental happines the way we
       see fit. Then the argument is what model is better for society.
       I, personally, have no problem with people proposing a new way of
       doing things, who believe monogamy is either a failure or does not
       work for all (though i disagree). The thing with Vox is the
       dishonesty with wich they presented the subject.
       For instance, instead of “Monogamy explained” as title it would
       have been better “Why Monogamy is a failure”, so that the
       espectator would know where Vox stands.
       What we need is an honest discussion around the subject.
       I’m glad to see that it may be possible.
   11.
   Bobster34 says
          + June 7, 2018
       What is doubly strange is that they seemed to have chosen this
       narrative solely in response to a comment by Jordan Peterson.
       I can’t see why exactly that narrative should be considered
       “progressive.”
          +
        Robert Paulson says
               o June 8, 2018
            I had a far-left anthro professor whose goal seemed to be to
            “debunk” every traditional Western institution for its own
            sake: “See, marriage is arbitrary since some booga-booga tribe
            in the middle of the forest has polygamy!” Although she never
            explicitly said so, the implication was that the mere
            existence of such alternative arrangements somehow invalidated
            traditional Western ones. It revealed a deep intellectual
            laziness since she was unwilling or unable to explore the
            differences between things beyond simply noting their
            existence and concluding the ways of the “noble savages” were
            superior to ours.
   12.
   Dan Meisels says
          + June 7, 2018
       Great read I love the debunking of the noble freelove savage. I
       only worry that that vast majority of the people that watch the Vox
       show will never read it. I wonder if Vox will bother to pen a
       rebuttal. Probably not as it would bring critical attention to
       their new show, but if they want to be intellectually honest they
       would. What ever they do you Mr. William Buckner are crushing it;
       top marks to you and to Quillette for giving you an outlet.
          +
        Robert Paulson says
               o June 8, 2018
            At the time of writing, the video has 29K likes and 4.8K
            dislikes. It makes me sad to think of people using this kind
            of nonsense to justify bad behavior in their personal lives.
            I’ve known some people that rationalized cheating on their
            partners with the “humans just weren’t meant to be monogamous”
            argument.
   13.
   Craig Willms says
          + June 7, 2018
       Extremely interesting topic. While I don’t follow Vox whatsoever I
       do follow Chistopher Ryan’s blog and was really impressed by his
       comment here. I echo other commenter’s assertion that that kind
       interplay is sorely missing in this Twitter/Social Network world.
       Being a stodgy Victorian-type myself the whole topic of polygyny
       fascinates me, in a kind of dirty magazine sort of way. However, I
       believe the benefits of monogamy for men, women, children and
       society outweigh the negatives by a long shot.
          +
        Stephen Smith says
               o June 7, 2018
            Having listened to the man on several podcasts, he comes
            across consistently as a reasonble, good humored, intelligent,
            lovely guy. Some of the very best podcasts Joe has done over
            the years has been with Chris, weaving yarns about all manner
            of life experiences. His post above just reinforces my view
            that the man is a class act. I feel similarly about how he
            handled the criticism that came from the Weinsteins out of
            Evergreen on Joe’s podcast. I should add that despite what I
            say below, on a personal level, I have no issue with anyone
            exploring their sexual lives in anyway they see fit as long as
            it involves consenting adults. I imagine society would be
            quite dull and boring if we all hewed to the same sexual
            template so to speak. I just believe that in a larger, macro
            sense, societies built upon such foundations (the noble free
            love savage as someone posted earlier) would crumble fast, or
            at best be inherently unstable.
   14.
   Stephen Smith says
          + June 7, 2018
       I first heard of Chris Ryan listening to Dan Savage’s Podcast, and
       while I’m a big fan of the man, the second he mentioned the books
       premise I called bullblank. Maybe it’s simply being a History
       Teacher and a life long learner in the field, but it doesn’t take
       any time at all to realize the inherent instability in societies
       that might reflect Ryan’s theories (or rather dreams). Later I
       heard the ideas expounded upon in numerous Joe Rogan Podcasts with
       Ryan.
       Ryan comes off as a charming, good humored, lovely man. He also
       comes off as someone completely and thoroughly full of it on the
       topic. Perhaps it’s too denigrating to suggest as much, but I found
       Ryan’s book and his discussion on Rogan as far more suggestive of
       someone who came up with a hypothesis that explained his own
       behavior, urges,and desires without judgment or condemnation, and
       then built a book around researching justifications for said
       behavior.
       The points and arguments I’ve heard him make, and now apparently
       being made by netflix are yet another example of my fellow liberals
       ignoring science when it doesn’t suit their interests, something as
       many have commented on before that they rip the conservative right
       for doing on issues like global warming. It’s absolutely
       infuriating that my friends on the left seem bound and determined
       to do disinengenuous things of this sort, although at least in this
       case, it doesn’t seem particularly dangerous to the country as a
       whole, but rather just to individual social relationships, and
       personal growth.
          +
        Christopher Ryan says
               o June 8, 2018
            Thanks for your kind comments, though it’s hard for me to
            understand why anyone would claim we “ignored the science” in
            Sex at Dawn when the whole book is structured as a response to
            said science. From my perspective, it’s “absolutely
            infuriating” when people who don’t like our conclusions accuse
            us of being disingenuous, rather than pointing out specific
            holes in our argument — of which there are many, I’m sure.
            The idea that I wrote a book to get laid is one that always
            makes me laugh. It’s like building a helicopter to clean the
            gutters.
            We don’t argue that people should behave in any particular
            way. We simply argue that the mainstream view that people
            (especially women) are naturally monogamous flies in the face
            of overwhelming evidence to the contrary, and does great
            damage to those who feel that there’s something wrong with
            them because their own experience runs counter to what they’ve
            been told they “should” feel. As I’m sure you know, almost no
            other mammals have sex when the female is not fertile. The few
            exceptions (bonobos, chimps, dolphins) are all socially
            promiscuous. That alone should shift the burden of proof to
            those who claim we somehow evolved to be monogamous (or
            polygynous).
               o
             breathnumber says
                    # June 8, 2018
                 We all look forward to Mr. Ryan’s next popular science
                 book, in which he argues that incest is natural, and how
                 the mainstream view that says otherwise does great damage
                 to those who feel that there’s something wrong with them
                 because their experience runs counter to what they’ve
                 been told they ‘should’ feel.
   15.
   Jonathan says
          + June 7, 2018
       Excellent article. Even better than Quillett’s usual very high
       quality.
   16.
   ga gamba says
          + June 7, 2018
       in many ancient cultures for which we have written records [the
       Bible, for example], daughters were considered to be the property
       of their fathers until marriage, when they became the property of
       their husbands.
       This is partially true. In some ancient cultures the sons too were
       the property of their fathers’. For example, the Romans had the
       concept of patria potestas. Whilst we are quick to remember a
       father’s daughter was put into an arranged marriage, our recall
       often forgets another father’s son was also put into that same
       arranged marriage. I suspect this is due to how feminist scholars
       and mass media over-egg the former and omit the latter. I concede
       that the son, unlike a daughter, would eventually become a master
       upon the father’s death, but for several decades of his life he too
       was subject to patria potestas.
       For example, rape was treated primarily as a property crime, with
       the rapist being forced to marry the woman he had raped. An
       unmarried woman who was raped was otherwise not marriageable and
       thus would have been an economic burden on her father.
       Since you mentioned the Bible, I figured we out to check to see
       what the Jews, or at least what many of them, have to say. Chabad
       is Orthodox so it’s is less likely to put a modern spin on things,
       but being very religious it’s more likely to advocate rather than
       attack.
       The victim is not required to marry the rapist; the rapist is
       required to marry his victim (if she consents), after paying her a
       very heavy fine.
       The author makes this point, which in the context of ye olden days
       makes sense: the rapist is required to indemnify her for three
       forms of damage: the indignity she suffered, the pain she endured
       and the loss she incurred. In all, this amounts to a hefty fine.
       In addition, the rapist is required to marry his victim, and is not
       permitted to divorce her without her consent. The Talmud explains
       that this obligation rests on the rapist, not the victim. She is
       under no obligation to marry him.
       Yes, she’s under no obligation, but understanding the context of
       her time, she also didn’t have other options, which the author
       states: The rapist thus perpetrated a double crime against his
       victim: he violated her dignity and compromised her future, for
       with the stigma of rape upon her, it would now be exceedingly
       difficult for her to marry. The Torah is concerned not only with
       the pain she suffered in the past, but with her vulnerability in
       the future. Should she find herself without prospects for marriage,
       and should she want this man as her husband, the Torah requires him
       to marry her.
       Through our modern lens this is horrifying, yet the Torah, knowing
       the crime can’t be undone, allows for the victim to pursue a normal
       life akin to other women by marrying, having children, rearing
       families, etc. if she chooses. And it also offers her the
       protection of refusing divorce to prevent her husband an out. We
       have to remember arranged marriages were the norm for both males
       and females, so each had little choice in these matters. I suspect
       such a religious law would have dissuaded some men from raping
       because it would have cost his family a lot of money and he is
       forced into marriage he may not want. It’s plausible in my mind
       such a law could have been exploited by star-crossed lovers whose
       families opposed a union. Concoct a rape and the couple is able to
       wed.
       And since I mentioned Romans earlier, how did they handle rape?
       For the Romans, the act of rape was covered under a variety of
       legal terms, but each of those words possessed wider definition
       fields than the modern word “rape.” Thus while charges of
       seduction, attempted seduction, adultery, abduction, or ravishment
       all covered rape, there was no legal charge consisting solely of
       rape itself. Similarly, determination of whether rape occurred
       greatly differs from Roman times to modern times. While in modern
       times, attention focuses mostly on the actions of the rapist and
       sometimes the victim, for the Romans, the occurrence of rape, the
       possibility of a legal charge, and also the punishment thereof,
       depended on the victim’s status. That is, what actually occurred
       did not have legal consequences unless the victim fit in a
       particular social category. Indeed, socio-political factors played
       a very important role
       as legislation on sexual activity underwent changes throughout the
       course of Roman history, and accordingly, the development and
       refinement of rape-relevant laws strongly reflected this influence.
       (Bold text mine)
       www(dot)repository(dot)law(dot)umich.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?articl
       e=1084&context=mjgl
       Much of the paper aligns to our contemporary understanding of
       genuine patriarchal culture’s attitudes and practices regarding
       women’s lives and agency.
       Lastly, I think it ought to be mentioned there were long-ago
       families who had no sons. Some cultures would have the husband move
       into his wife’s home to take care of her parents in their elder
       years. In Albania there was the custom of a daughter transitioning
       into a male role, even wearing male clothes and affecting masculine
       traits, as she remained single to care for her parents. In cultures
       with strong filial piety, which even Europe once had though not to
       the extent of a Confucian culture, children were greatly concerned
       about the well being of their parents. It seems to me those who
       live in the post-industrial modern West with its nuclear families
       don’t have an appreciation of how strong this bond of obligation
       and respect is. Elders in the West are kind of seen as a burden. To
       the mass culture they’re invisible and ignored. Youth is what is
       celebrated. “I can always have more children, but I only have one
       mum and dad,” is something I’ve heard in East Asia but never in the
       West. I think the practice of parents so domineering their
       children’s lives in the olden days wouldn’t have been seen as
       oppressive as we see it today.
   17.
   Arthur says
          + June 7, 2018
       Is the author the guy who lost the 86 World Series?
   18.
   David says
          + June 8, 2018
       Didn’t one of the earliest studies conclude:
       Hogamous, Higamous,
       Man is Polygamous,
       Higamous, Hogamous,
       Woman is Monagamous
          +
        Nancy says
               o June 8, 2018
            It’s a poem by William James, and it also used to be one of
            the pillars of evolutionary psychology until the data proved
            they were overwhelmingly wrong, after which they quietly
            dropped it, while never admitting they were wrong.
   19.
   morgan says
          + June 8, 2018
       Such a ridiculous video.
       Even if you believe their claims about monogamy, all their
       counter-examples were from primitive, undeveloped cultures. They
       even claim monogamy arose around the same time as agriculture. This
       viewpoint is in a lot of way fundamentally reactionary, reactionary
       to the point of regressing us to primitive tribes. The idea that
       our way of organizing ourselves at the most fundamental level, that
       of reproductive relationship, is somehow divorced from our success
       as a civilization is pure madness.
       I can’t imagine what they actually want. All “egalitarian” sexual
       practices lead to, as you’ve said, the top twenty percent of men
       with access to all the women, while most of the men go without, or
       take ‘leftovers’ (so to speak). They mentioned that famous quote
       about the tribesman who said they “care about all the children of
       their tribe equally” without regard for paternity. But what that
       masks is the fact that in those situations, most of the children
       are going to be the children of the top few men in the tribe. The
       rest of the men are simply caretakers of the children belonging to
       the top men, and this situation is only sustained by the fantasy of
       tribe = self. How do people not understand this simple reality?
       Arranged marriages honestly would be better than what we have
       today. They shouldn’t interfere with a relationship of love, if
       they are lucky enough to find someone. But for everyone else, this
       serial dating and serial “monogamy” culture is just asking for
       trouble, and likely the cause of great or impending civilizational
       decay.
       Also, I agree. “leveling the playing field” in all market-based
       circumstances tends to greatly improve the situation for everyone.
       Quillette is publishing leveler economics. I think you should be a
       little more honest and admit that enforce monogamy is literally
       gender/sexual EQUITY.
          +
        Nancy says
               o June 8, 2018
            Written like a true member of Quillette’s target audience:
            “primitive cultures.”
               o
             dirk says
                    # June 8, 2018
                 Other terminology, time dependent: savage, natural (opp.
                 cultured), but in the modern time of egalitarianism, is
                 pre-modern still allowed? Anthropologist Levi-Strauss
                 once came with a book title -Pensee Sauvage-, translated
                 by The savage mind, also in the meantime not accepted
                 anymore, I fear! Ohohoh, what should we write not to be
                 offensive, and correct!?!
                 I started my career in a backward nation, later hatched
                 as a developing country, then became a partner country,
                 but under Trump, I understand, again degenerated into a
                 shithole nation.
          +
        roccocannoli says
               o June 8, 2018
            “Even if you believe their claims about monogamy, all their
            counter-examples were from primitive, undeveloped cultures.”:
            Exactly. Polygamy and matriarchy disallow the building of
            civilization. See “The Garbage Generation.”
          +
        Morti says
               o June 8, 2018
            Quite the contrary about the leveling. Long-term monogamy
            means the need of commitment and responsibility and makes a
            bad choice have dire consequences including the ruining of a
            whole life. This perfectly justifies women being picky because
            nobody wants a life ruined by some loser.
            In case of polyamorous or “open” relationships it’s less of an
            issue. If you have several partners having one more or less is
            no problem, so going in/out is less of an issue. Incels may
            actually get a bang from time to time.
          +
        ccscientist says
               o June 10, 2018
            “They mentioned that famous quote about the tribesman who said
            they “care about all the children of their tribe equally”
            without regard for paternity.” Note that in small tribes as in
            these examples, almost everyone is related. In some cases to
            get a wife the men would raid other villages because all the
            women in their village were cousins and off-limits. So in this
            case if you take care of any children they are probably nieces
            and nephews of some sort. As well, life is simple, with the
            kids just running around naked in the dirt. How would this
            work in the US? How would you take care of “all the children”?
            I guess that is what welfare is but it is impersonal and often
            leaves kids without a father, which hurts them
            developmentally. To hold this up as a model for life…words
            fail me.
   20.
   Nancy says
          + June 8, 2018
       As always with evolutionary psychologists, the role of economics is
       almost completely ignored here. The only way you’re going to get
       the kind of monogamy Quillette editors, authors and its target
       audience want – women choosing less desirable men to marry in order
       to pacify the otherwise “incel” – is to reduce women’s economic
       opportunities.
       Sorry, right-wingers. Your dream society is identical to that of
       the Taliban’s.
       https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Taliban_treatment_of_women#Employment
          +
        Fred says
               o June 8, 2018
            Nancy, the queston arises however whether women could achieve
            economic opportunities in a society destabilized by gangs of
            marauding incels tearing up the streets, starting wars, and
            undermining the society generally.
          +
        Eoghan Gannon says
               o June 8, 2018
            The article comprehensively dismantles everything about the
            Vox video. Your talk of Taliban and incels is nearly as batty
            as that video
          +
        Fred says
               o June 8, 2018
            The article comprehensively dismantles everything about the
            Vox video. Your talk of Taliban and incels is nearly as batty
            as that video
          +
        Rob says
               o June 8, 2018
            If we look at it through the lens of economics, when women
            narrow their options to fewer men, what does that do to their
            bargaining power? We have examples of universities with a high
            ratio of women to men, and studies show things don’t go well
            for the women. The high-status men have a lot of options,
            which means they have little incentive to do any more than the
            minimum necessary to temporarily attract a partner. Meanwhile,
            the women have to make themselves very agreeable to the wants
            of the high-status men in order to out-compete the other
            women.
            Then there’s child-rearing. The great majority of women want
            to have children at some point. What does raising children
            alone do to women’s economic outcomes?
          +
        derek says
               o June 8, 2018
            Funny isn’t it that the Taliban accepts polygamy. Rich men can
            buy wives in number, per men can’t afford the dowries or may
            not be able to afford to support a wife and children. These
            are profoundly unstable societies, and much of his women live
            their lives is predicated on their vulnerability in the face
            of that instability.
            The reason that evolutionary biologists ignore economic is
            because economic timeframes are very short. The economic power
            of women that we see in the West is barely a generation old,
            and is riding on top of an existing economic system.
            These changes are not finished. As women see the lifetime
            costs and benefits of their decisions likely many adjustments
            will be made. But they all depend upon a growing economy where
            choice and opportunity allow the experimentation.
            It always comes down to where do the resources come from to
            feed and care for the children.
          +
        tehy5 says
               o June 9, 2018
            “Sorry, right-wingers. Your dream society is identical to that
            of the Taliban’s.”
            to start with, this is a totally obnoxious statement and
            almost certainly untrue; at best, it’s true that the solution
            some people want to the problems of today are actually
            untenable, but you’d go a lot farther towards making that
            argument if you cut the bullshit
            more to the point, honest question: let’s say that there are
            lots of less desirable men who nevertheless seek female
            companionship or even marriage and can’t find it. What’s your
            proposed solution to this problem, exactly? Just let them be
            lonely forever? And we’re not talking just about guys who go
            on mass shootings here or even hate women; those exist, but
            they’re not the entirety of “guys who can’t get laid”, as much
            as it might make you feel better to think that all losers are
            assholes, many of them aren’t.
          +
        Barbara Smith says
               o June 9, 2018
            Whether they do the “choosing” with the backing of numerous
            “economic opportunities” or not, the point is that women
            ALWAYS do the choosing. Monogamy works better for both men and
            women (and thus society as a whole) than polygamy.
   21.
   hamr says
          + June 8, 2018
       Interesting. TY for the essay.
   22.
   hamr says
          + June 8, 2018
       Nancy,
       I propose, that you miss the point of, “Quillette”.
   23.
   hamr says
          + June 8, 2018
       Morgan….
       Sigh…
   24.
   Morti says
          + June 8, 2018
       Nothing strange about it. Liberals are untraindividualists and they
       detest any but purely opportunistic short-term relationships
       between humans. Marriage is oppressive. You can’t self-express your
       self as freely anymore and you must commit.
       A polyamorous relationship in individualistic western society can
       be nothing but that. One more or one less partner can make little
       difference if you have 4 more to hang out with. Easy in and easy
       out. Pure hedonistic pleasure without duties and commitments since
       whenever it gets hard you can just jump the other boat.
       Some lucky bastards can even find themselves in more than one
       polyamorous group at the same time! So much fun!
       And paradoxically some incels should not be that afraid of that. No
       more “I have a girlfriend” problem and easy way in. Of course only
       half decent ones, but still it’ll rather make things easier since
       there is no need to set a bar high for a potential partner because
       of no lasting consequences of a bad choice.
          +
        ccscientist says
               o June 10, 2018
            Polyamory I think would be devastating for children. In such a
            system, when there is a child, who is on the hook for taking
            care of them to raise them to adulthood? Sounds like no one
            is. Only narcissists think polyamory is ok.
   25.
   Nicole says
          + June 8, 2018
       I find it dumbfounding that so many men view their own gender so
       poorly. Believing your gender incapable of self control, and
       yourself unable to influence the behavior of your fellow man must
       be incredibly painful. While I acknowledge the flaws of my own
       gender, I wholly believe that human beings are capable of being
       more than our base instincts, man and woman alike.
          +
        Rob says
               o June 8, 2018
            We know that societies that have high rates of economic
            inequality tend to have high rates of crime and violence. The
            poor, history has shown, find a way to get their pound of
            flesh from the rich, through the destruction of public
            property and street crime. Does recognizing this truth about
            human societies, and trying to mitigate it with public welfare
            and income redistribution, mean that we regard the poor as
            incapable of self-control?
            I’m not advocating any kind of coercion when it comes to
            monogamy. But we make choices, and individuals and as a
            society. We should be aware of the trade-offs and the likely
            outcomes of those choices. Societies with large numbers of
            unattached young men tend towards violence and lawlessness.
            Some point to the selective-abortion induced gender disparity
            in India, for example, for the rising incidence of rape and
            violent assault on women.
          +
        derek says
               o June 8, 2018
            Funny comment. My mother told me that men were more fragile
            than women. Pre abortion more boys were born but more girls
            survived into adulthood. Men died at a younger age than women.
            And she experienced how badly things can go for men, her
            father killed himself. Compared to the women she knew who
            faced very similar challenges but the results were different.
            She cared for my father in his dementia, and two sons through
            serious illness losing one of them as a child.
            She knew what men know. Men are capable and willing to carry
            extraordinary burdens at the cost of their lives, seeing her
            brother in law do that. She also knew that weak men are
            dangerous and have the strength to hurt.
            How high will you need to build your walls and how deep will
            your moat need to be when 20-30% of young men have no place?
            Thinking well or imagining better won’t change anything.
   26.
   dirk says
          + June 8, 2018
       I was brought up in a small village where divorce was unknown,
       didn’t happen, though it was known from certain men and women that
       they had affairs. Then, our government came forward with financial
       support for adult people without an income, thus also for divorced
       women with children, and all of a sudden, many women went for such
       a divorce, now. Yuval Harari explained that goverments in developed
       nations now take care for almost everything, where once the family
       and the village had to take care for, freeing people now to
       consume, feel free and do what they personally like most, also
       parents in their old age are no longer being taken care for,
       government does, governments now also take care for abused
       children. Recently, in our town, there was a demonstration of gay
       rights and other sexual splitgroupings, on boats in the canals,
       with one boat with a group of jolly dancing polyamorous ones, I
       didn’t know what it was, and looked it up on Google. On me, the
       demonstration came over as one of over-zealous expression of
       modernity, they could as well have demonstrated for veganism,
       flexitarianism , speciesism or other such new things.
   27.
   Laurie says
          + June 8, 2018
       I learned to know and respect David Barash’s ideas about
       evolutionary psychology when he and I were both blogging for the
       now defunct Chronicle of Higher Education’s blog site,
       “Brainstorm,” and I was reading him regularly. That he would be
       given short shrift by those who think patriarchal societies are
       cultural constructs should come as no surprise. They should be
       called to account for the many flaws in their argument.
       What surprises me is reading the many comments on this thread that
       entirely ignore, or even seem to have contempt for, ideas about
       equality and the rights for women that go along with a commitment
       to justice for all. Quelle surprise! Almost all the comment on this
       article are made by men (poor noble Nancy, whoever she is, taking
       them all on by herself).
       Is it that hard for people to agree that patriarchy is rooted in
       the biological and psychological differences between the sexes and
       simultaneously think women should be free of control by men?
       Thinking about the human condition strictly in terms of “the nature
       of things” pleases a whole lot of romantics, women with the minds
       of Stepford wives, polygamists, and the many insecure men
       everywhere (including, of course, the gross and loathsome Incels
       who exist at the most pathetic end of the sexual male loser
       spectrum). Interestingly, however, the most passionate adherents to
       “the nature of things” argument are Roman Catholics, for whom “God
       said it, the Pope heard it, I believe it, that settles it.”
       The relation of the sexes started out with brute male force
       controlling weaker females, with females having only minimal
       control by choosing to mate with the strongest males. But then this
       strange thing called history happened: Societies emerged out of its
       mucky primitive state and evolved to the point where this thing
       called “love” emerged (love appears long before marrying for
       love–just look at the ancient Greek and Roman world’s many funerary
       dedications written by husbands to their wives). Later, much later,
       voila! There was this thing called the Enlightenment. Perhaps we
       would become more civilized if we spent more time thinking about
       this fact, and less time lost in thought about primitive human
       beings.
   28.
   ludlow says
          + June 8, 2018
       I recall reading somewhere that some 19 Century doctors
       authoritatively claimed higher education was bad for women because
       it would harm their reproductive systems. Today such claims are
       transparent and laughable.
       It’s heartening we aren’t having to wait a hundred years to see the
       bias shaping the Vox piece.
       I’m reminded of hearing otherwise educated people declare, “Biology
       is bunk” and “Romantic love was invented by the Victorians.” They
       didn’t mention who invented anger, grief, joy, or maternal love,
       and they seemed genuinely confused when I replied that it might be
       more accurate to say that, upon a bedrock of biology, significant
       layers of culture have been deposited and they’re sometimes
       difficult to distinguish.
   29.
   duckweed says
          + June 8, 2018
       Laurie,
       Speaking for myself, no, it’s not hard to see biological roots of
       things and simultaneously see a biological capacity for change and
       improvement and equally.
       That’s one flaw I found in Jordan Peterson’s lobster anecdote about
       hierarchies. (At least in the one video I watched.) I agree with
       him that they’re biological, but I wanted him to be more of a
       visionary, to point out that our biology contains all sorts of
       contradictions.
       I wished he’d given examples such as our raw, powerful, even
       violent impulses and the fact we evolved biological and cultural
       systems to inhibit them. Our biology can lead to someone committing
       murder and another person saying “Turn the other cheek.”
       Hierarchies are natural, but so is kindness. Just a little less
       common.
          +
        OleK says
               o June 8, 2018
            duckweed,
            Just listen to more of JBP’s podcasts and you’ll hear more
            examples about our cultural systems to inhibit raw, powerful,
            violent impulses. I can’t recall specific podcasts though –
            likely in his biblical lecture series.
            Also, I think some things people “hope” he does I think he
            just hasn’t gotten to yet but will.
          +
        derek says
               o June 9, 2018
            I think you misunderstand hierarchies. They are everywhere and
            necessary to a functioning society. Specialization of trade is
            a hierarchical arrangement and one party know more and is
            better at something, but the other party is better at
            something else. The courts are based on a hierarchy offset by
            a second hierarchical interest. Competition in a free market
            provides a limit to handle power, as does a vibrant labor
            market provides a check to the power of employers.
            Systems that don’t recognize the reality and utility of
            hierarchies stumble into toxic and violent tyrannies because
            they have no built in checks to tyranny.
   30. Pingback: Weekend Readings for June 7, 2018 – Verywhen
   31.
   Bubblecar says
          + June 9, 2018
       An interesting article, but one that actually reinforces what many
       of the feminists have been arguing – that male sexuality is often
       dangerous and destructive, and needs to be subject to very tight
       social control.
       It’s interesting to contrast this article with the one about “rape
       culture”. It could be argued that sexual morality and its legal
       enforcement is fundamentally concerned with minimising or
       containing an underlying rape culture, and that it doesn’t actually
       do a very good job of it.
       Further progress may only be possible in a transhumanist future,
       where human sexuality – particularly male sexuality – is modified
       or even deleted at a species level, via biotechnological
       intervention of some kind.
          +
        dirk says
               o June 9, 2018
            Like castration, or, maybe, lobotomy. With modern lab methods,
            you need only 1 male for 1000 females, so,there is ample
            selection choice in wanted male DNA (not too dominant of
            course, that would be counterproductive).
               o
             Bubblecar says
                    # June 9, 2018
                 No, I’m talking about future techniques that modify the
                 fundamental human genetic recipe.
                 If there comes a day when humanity can leave sexuality
                 behind, we will then need to ask: does the value (if any)
                 of human sexuality outweigh the many problems it causes?
                 One obvious point would be that many people find sexual
                 behaviour pleasurable, but that’s a simple matter of
                 cause and effect: we find it pleasurable only because
                 we’re genetically programmed to find it pleasurable.
                 I find it easy to imagine a non-sexual human species that
                 enjoys far more pleasure, affection and companionship in
                 less primitive and problematic ways.
                    #
                  dirk says
                         @ June 9, 2018
                      If I may believe Johan, in Sweden this exists
                      already, thanks to a strict a-sexual education from
                      the toddler age onwards in children kindergarten
                      (because mum is working and emancipated, so, no time
                      for the baby after the 3 month afterbirth
                      allowance), and all this in the present, non
                      transhumanist society. This is Europe.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - June 9, 2018
                           Sorry, I hear it’s more than a full yr for mum,
                           plus an extra 3 months for dad, what a luxury.
                    #
                  Dan says
                         @ June 9, 2018
                      The transhumanist angle is very interesting. As
                      society trends towards a state where our minds
                      define our identities more than our bodies, this is
                      plausible. However, one of the considerations that
                      is often ignored is that part of existence involves
                      tasks whereby we subjugate our own identity for the
                      good of the other or the community. Child-rearing is
                      one of the greatest constraints on personal
                      autonomy, and not something I could see a non-sexual
                      transhumanist society willfully undertaking. It gets
                      complex, of course. But sexuality and reproduction
                      are biologically interlinked, and we simply don’t
                      know whether engineering the removal of one will
                      consequentially remove the other.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - June 9, 2018
                           That sounds Schopenhauer, the pessimist and
                           gynofoob, but savant of human behaviour and
                           drives. He saw sexuality and romantic love as a
                           trick needed for human reproduction, without
                           which men and women would never become so
                           stupid to marry and be locked in matrimony for
                           life.
                         @
                       Gypsy Boots (@Wordwonkery) says
                              - June 11, 2018
                           “As society trends towards a state where our
                           minds define our identities more than our
                           bodies…”
                           Gnostic belief systems that reject physicality
                           in favor of “spirituality” and that denigrate
                           the body and sexuality have come to the fore in
                           several times and places, including late-Roman
                           Alexandria, 10th century Bulgaria and
                           11th-century Provence, and have been present in
                           some form in the West since the inception of
                           Christianity.
                    #
                  Algator says
                         @ June 17, 2018
                      Are you aware that you’re expressing, in a 21st
                      century idiom, Saint Augustine’s lament about sexual
                      reproduction, from The City of God? Of course
                      Augustine would be horrified by your proposal to
                      perfect nature through technological means rather
                      than by means of grace.
   32.
   Okaro says
          + June 9, 2018
       “The fact that both chimps and bonobos have such large testicles
       means we can tentatively infer that our Last Common Ancestor before
       our lineage split from theirs likely had large testicles as well. ”
       Since chimps and bonobos separated only some million years ago, we
       really cannot tell anything about the common ancestor of them and
       humans from their similarity. The conclusion may be true but the
       evidence does not support it.
          +
        dirk says
               o June 12, 2018
            Funny that you mention it Gypsy, I just recently came to know
            about this gnostic thing. It is not very christian of course,
            it all started in the Middle East with the prophets Mani and
            Zarathustra, but, yes, has uptil now its influence on western
            christians and seculars alike. Maybe that even the Metoo
            related prohibition of the female in bikini is a late
            emanation of this Eastern movement.
   33. Pingback: Rational Feed – deluks917
   34.
   ccscientist says
          + June 10, 2018
       A couple of points:
       1) Married women are the least likely to be raped or murdered in
       the US. Women with live-in boyfriends the highest. A live-in
       boyfriend is one who is not really committed to a woman who is not
       really committed: a recipe for trouble.
       2) Why is monogamy tried when it is difficult? Because when you
       love someone you don’t want to be hurt. I doubt if the producers of
       the video are all ok with their wife having an affair. Also, it has
       a lot to do with the children. Children in a “fluid” arrangement
       can be left with no one to care for them, which means death in most
       of the world (where there is little social safety net). A husband
       does not want to take care of someone else’s kids (I know I don’t).
       A married couple can reliably pass down an inheritance and their
       kids know who their relatives are.
   35.
   David Murray says
          + June 11, 2018
       The fact that sex columnist Dan Savage is one of their “experts”
       tells you all you need to know.
       But why are we surprised? The lies go back decades, all the way to
       the Kinseys and their fake “research.”
       https://www.crisismagazine.com/2012/kinseys-secret-the-phony-scienc
       e-of-the-sexual-revolution

   Comments are closed.

   Previous Post‘If I Want to Hold Seminars on the Topic of Empire, I Will
   Do So Privately’: An Interview with Nigel Biggar
   Next PostRace, Gender and Trump: Everything You Think You Know is Wrong

Narrated

   Narrated, Top Stories

NARRATED: How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life

   Greg Ellis reads How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life, Stephen
   Elliott’s essay about being accused of rape on the Shitty Media Med
   list in 2017. It was published...

   October 3, 2019

Podcast

   Podcast, Top Stories

PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of Crowds

   Conservative intellectual Douglas Murray talks to Toby Young about the
   moral shortcomings of identity politics and the Marxist underpinnings
   of the Social Justice movement, both subjects of his new...

   October 3, 2019

Top Stories

     * The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
       The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
     * 'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
       'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
     * Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
       Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
     * From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
       From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
     * PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
       PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
     * 'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
       'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
     * Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
       Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
     * The Case for Black Optimism
       The Case for Black Optimism
     * Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America
       Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America

   [merchstoread.png]

Share

     * (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)

   Help free thought live

   Close and accept
   Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this
   website, you agree to their use.
   To find out more, including how to control cookies, see here: Cookie
   Policy

   Free Thought Lives

Follow Us

     * Menu Item
     * Menu Item

     * Copyright © 2019 Quillette Pty Ltd | All Rights Reserved

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.
   #Quillette » Feed Quillette » Comments Feed Quillette » On the Nature
   of Patriarchy Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * Home
     * About
     * Subscribe
     * Donate
     * Quillette Circle

Quillette

Free Thought Lives

   Menu

     * Features
     * Science / Tech
     * Politics
     * Review
     * Podcast
     * Narrated

   Close Menu

   Anthropology, Top Stories
   Published on November 25, 2018

On the Nature of Patriarchy

   written by William Buckner

   By their very nature, it is said, women are the source of nearly all
   discord and litigation within the community. Through their ceaseless
   enticements to adultery, their notorious insensitivity to the sensible
   commands of father, husband, and brother, and their mindless passion
   for gossip and intrigue—in these and countless other ways women are the
   bane of a peaceful society.
   ~Anthropologist Donald Tuzin, describing the ideology of the Ilahita
   Arapesh ‘men’s cult’ in Rituals of Manhood, 1982.

   Humans are an anisogamous species. For us, as with all animals,
   reproduction involves the fusion of gametes—small, highly mobile sperm
   that joins with the larger, relatively immobile egg. This initial
   asymmetry between organisms who produce sperm (males) and those who
   produce eggs (females) contributes to the different fitness strategies
   individuals of each sex tend to utilize.

   Sexual conflict is an inevitable consequence of being a sexually
   reproducing species: the evolutionary interests of males and females do
   not always neatly align. Being placental mammals, human females
   gestate, give birth to relatively helpless live young, and nourish
   their infants through lactation after birth. The potential consequences
   of sexual activity differ for males and females—since they are not
   constrained by gestation time, men can often reap greater fitness
   benefits from pursuing multiple partners, but they also face greater
   fitness costs if they are cheated on and invest resources in a child
   that is not theirs. In these core sex differences of reproductive
   biology—the larger parental investment of females due to gestation and
   lactation, the greater potential reproductive output of males, and the
   fact of paternal uncertainty—we find the foundation, though not the
   true extent, of patriarchal social systems.

   In The Concise Encyclopedia of Sociology, women’s and gender studies
   professor Michelle Meagher writes that, “Patriarchy is a theory that
   attempts to explain this widespread gender stratification as an effect
   of social organization than the result of some natural or biological
   fact.” While discussions of patriarchy today do tend to emphasize
   social organization—and socialization practices in particular—as the
   primary explanation for its existence, this was not always the case.
   Some of the earliest, and indeed most informative, work on the nature
   of patriarchy was done in the 1980s and 1990s by feminist social
   scientists well versed in evolutionary theory, who integrated
   primatology and ethnographic data to aid in their understanding of the
   degree of male dominance across human societies.

   Anthropologist Sarah Hrdy, a feminist and self-described
   sociobiologist, wrote one of the earliest evolutionarily informed
   analyses of the idea of patriarchy in her 1981 book The Woman That
   Never Evolved. Much as I do here, Hrdy traced the initial foundation of
   male dominance to the fact of anisogamy, but also noted the important
   role of socioecology in expanding or diminishing its extent. Hrdy
   criticized existing explanations for male dominance that focus
   exclusively socialization, arguing that:

     They cannot explain sexual asymmetry in even one other species. Yet
     male dominance characterizes the majority of several hundred other
     species that, like our own, belong to the order Primates. Save for a
     handful of highly informative exceptions, sexual asymmetries are
     nearly universal among primates. Logic alone should warn us against
     explaining such a widespread phenomenon with reference only to a
     specialized subset of human examples.

   The “highly informative exceptions” Hrdy mentions are in reference to
   three social contexts among some primate species that are most
   favorable to high female status: where there is a monogamous mating
   system, where females have a short breeding season, which relaxes male
   competition for most of the year, and/or where females live in
   matrilineal (rank inherited through the female line) “sisterhood”
   groups of relatives. Hrdy emphasizes the role of monogamy in
   particular, writing that, “Only under one particular type of breeding
   system, monogamy, do we routinely find anything approaching equality
   between the sexes in either size or rights of access to preferred
   resources.”

   Because some elements of patriarchal social systems are tied to evolved
   sex differences, we would expect certain aspects of ‘patriarchal
   behavior’ to be found in every society, even those that are relatively
   egalitarian. Perhaps the clearest example of this is the extreme
   violence some males sometimes employ in the pursuit of women, or in
   attempts to control their sexuality. As anthropologist Richard Wrangham
   and psychologist Joyce Benenson note in their book chapter titled
   “Cooperative and Competitive Relationships within Sexes,” across
   cultures, “The primary causes of within-community aggression between
   men are competition for status and access to women.”

   Hadza hunter gatherers

   Among the Hadza hunter-gatherers of Tanzania, women have a relatively
   high degree of autonomy, and are free to choose their own marriage
   partners. Anthropologist Frank Marlowe writes that, “Female choice
   appears to be the main factor influencing Hadza marriage.” This is
   quite notable, because a girl’s first marriage is usually arranged
   across most hunter-gatherer societies—as well as most small-scale
   societies more generally—and males tend to have a greater say in
   marriage arrangements than females do. The Hadza also have one of the
   lowest recorded homicide rates of any contemporary hunter-gatherer
   society, as I noted in a previous article for Quillette. Yet even among
   the Hadza, male competition over women remains a potent source of
   dispute. Marlowe notes that:

     The main source of conflict that can escalate into violence is
     competition for mates. Almost all murders of Hadza by other Hadza
     are related to male jealousy. This may be when a man discovers that
     his wife has had an affair, in which case he may kill the other man
     and beat his wife, or kill both of them. More often, however, it is
     when two men are competing for the same single woman.

   We see the same pattern among other relatively gender-egalitarian
   societies. Consider the matrilineal Mosuo (also known as the Na) of
   China, “the society where a man is never the boss,” according to the
   Guardian. In Cai Hua’s ethnographic work on the Mosuo, entitled A
   Society without Fathers or Husbands (2001), we see some of the same
   conflicts over sexuality, and particularly male attempts to control it,
   as we see everywhere else. Hua writes that:

     In some households, especially those with a member in a high level
     job, the husband will forbid his wife to receive visitors. Some of
     them say: “Before she comes (as a wife) to my house, she can do
     whatever she likes. There is no question of telling her not to. But
     once she has moved in with me, she can no longer do so.” The
     husbands however do not stop visiting other women.

   It is also not uncommon for young Mosuo males to try and prevent
   outsider males from visiting female members of their communities; “In
   certain villages, through insults and violence, young men chase off a
   visitor who has come from far away and whose only tie to the village is
   the woman he wants. This phenomenon occurred with some frequency before
   1960.”

   Hua also provides a number of case studies describing costly conflict
   over sexual activity. Hua notes one case of severe male violence
   against a partner over an affair of hers: “During their relationship,
   Dgimatsie saw [other partners]. Once, when she was returning from
   Zuo-suo in the mountains, Ishi [her male partner] grabbed her and cut
   her nose with a knife. Dgimatsie is still alive, and the scar on her
   nose bears witness to this fit of jealousy.”

   For Hrdy, it is largely the problem of paternal uncertainty, and
   cultural endeavors to mitigate it, that underlie patriarchal social
   practices: “To keep women (and their sexuality) in check, husbands and
   their relations (and perhaps especially property-owning families)
   devised cultural practices which emphasized the subordination of women
   and which permitted males authority over them.” One important insight
   here is the recognition that women may themselves sometimes support
   social norms that control female sexuality, to the extent that it
   benefits their lineage.

   Across cultures, there is frequently a double standard regarding the
   social disapproval of men who have affairs compared to women who do so.
   Out of 96 societies in the standard cross-cultural sample which contain
   information about punishment for adultery, in 72 of these societies
   there is a sexual double standard where women are punished more harshly
   than men are, while in only 24 societies are men and women punished
   equally. Why many men would support such a double standard is obvious,
   as it may increase their own paternal certainty through the threat of
   harsh punishment for female affairs, while still allowing them to
   increase their reproductive success through their extra-marital
   pairings.

   Notably, many women can also reap fitness benefits through inclusive
   fitness by increasing the paternal certainty of her brothers and sons.
   If she is part of a particularly wealthy, powerful family, in a
   patrilineal descent system, she has even more of an evolutionary
   incentive to support norms that restrict female sexuality and increase
   paternal certainty, to prevent her family’s resources from being passed
   down to the illegitimate children of her brothers and sons. Hrdy writes
   that, where large dowries are offered, “The bride’s family, then, as
   well as the groom’s, has an interest in ensuring her virginity and
   future fidelity. Access through marriage or concubinage to a wealthy
   family is competitive, and the bride’s family has a direct stake in her
   reputation and eligibility.” Intrasexual competition can also play a
   role; women sometimes have an incentive to obstruct the sexual behavior
   of other women, which may reduce the likelihood of her own partner
   cheating or investing resources in another woman.

   In her 1995 paper ‘The Evolutionary Origins of Patriarchy’, published
   in the journal Human Nature, feminist anthropologist Barba Smuts
   identifies six factors that she hypothesizes contribute to the
   existence of patriarchal social systems in humans:
    1. The relatively limited power of female coalitions across human
       societies, due in part to patrilocal residency (living close to the
       husband’s family after marriage) being more common than matrilocal
       residency.
    2. The strength of male-male alliances across cultures, due in part to
       the demands of warfare.
    3. Male control of resources.
    4. Large variance in male wealth and power, leaving women more
       vulnerable to the authority of powerful men and reducing women’s
       control over their sexuality.
    5. Female behaviors that promote male resource control and control
       over female sexuality.
    6. The human capacity for language (unlike other primates) which
       allows males to propagate ideologies that promote male dominance.

   Smuts argues that these characteristics lead to humans having a unique
   and more extensive elaboration of male dominated social systems than
   many other primates. In many primate species, females generally live
   closer to their kin, while the males disperse into other communities.
   Further, female primates can usually support themselves and their
   children without requiring much contribution from males in the way of
   resources. Smuts notes that these divergences from the primate pattern
   can contribute to unique sources of sexual conflict. Smuts also intends
   her paper to aid as a roadmap to enact social change, as she writes
   that these six characteristics point “directly to the essential
   counterstrategies that women must develop in order to reduce gender
   inequality,” such as developing and empowering female coalitions and
   reducing inequality among males.

   Considering the question of female coalitions, Hrdy gives significant
   attention to female competition in primates, and how the conflicting
   fitness interests of individual females can impede the development of
   strong female coalitions, giving examples such as, “competition between
   females for resources, or female manipulation of males in order to
   protect offspring or elicit male investment.”

   Smuts’s model also draws largely on the primatology data, but we can
   see how it compares to the ethnographic and historical record.
   Anthropologist Laura Betzig described the extreme degree of control
   that powerful males exerted over women and their reproduction in early
   empires, writing that, “in every one of the six pristine
   civilizations—Mesopotamia, Egypt, India, China, Mexico, and
   Peru—emperors collected hundreds of women and had hundreds of
   children.” Archaeologist Bruce Trigger concurred, noting that:

     All early civilizations displayed varying degrees of masculine bias…
     The position of women appears to have been inferior to that of men
     in all the early civilizations, given the growing importance of male
     leadership roles, greater male access to wealth as a result of
     political manipulation and warfare, and the increasing domination of
     family life by society and the state. (Trigger 194)

   Here we see many of the themes emphasized by Hrdy and Smuts, such as
   male alliances in war, inequality of wealth and power, as well as male
   control over women and their reproductive outcomes. However, these
   early civilizations have long been considered by many to be
   patriarchal, so we might instead look at more small-scale, less
   well-known societies, to see how male dominated social systems might
   manifest.

   Consider the Mundurucu horticulturalists of the Amazon, for example,
   who reside matrilocally. Anthropologists Yolanda and Ryan Murphy note
   that among the Mundurucu:

     Men do tend to be isolated from their close kin, and women more
     commonly have first degree relatives living in either the same house
     or nearby. And in a society that phrases solidarity in the idiom of
     kinship, this means that the women are surrounded by larger groups
     of supporters than are the men.

   Women also produce much of the food. Anthropologist Thomas Gregor
   writes that, “Women…have effective control over the economy of food
   distribution, including the distribution of meat provided by the men.
   Men do not intrude upon domestic activities because they are the
   province of women.” The Mundurucu are also universally monogamous, with
   the exception of polygynous chiefs in the past, and monogamy is said to
   be “enforced by the women.” Further, the Mundurucu have relatively
   egalitarian relationships among men, with limited wealth and power
   differences.

   Here, many of the conditions are met which should reduce the extent of
   patriarchy. Yet the Mundurucu are a strongly male-dominated society.
   Murphy and Murphy write that:

     Every woman must have an adult male who will protect her and vouch
     for her, on condition that she conform to the standards set for
     women… The custody of a woman can be held by her father or brother,
     but that of most mature females is held by their husbands, a
     reaffirmation of the right of the men, and their patrilineal clans,
     to the sexuality of the women. (Murphy and Murphy, 134)

   Among the Mundurucu, “loose women,” or women who challenged the men’s
   authority, would sometimes be punished with gang-rape by the males:
   “the men consciously state that they use the penis to dominate their
   women.” This punishment would transcend kin relationships, with even
   male first cousins of the woman sometimes participating in her rape.
   Two core conditions that seem to contribute to the strong pattern of
   male dominance among the Mundurucu are patrilineal beliefs about
   descent, where the lineage has a strong incentive to control female
   sexuality, and the Mundurucu history of chronic warfare. The Mundurucu
   “men’s cult” promoted strong male solidarity, while their universal
   monogamy reduced in-group male-male competition in favor of male
   cohesion to participate in wars against outsiders. Matrilocal
   residency, rather than reducing male alliances compared to the
   promotion of female ones, instead allowed males to develop strong
   coalitions across ethnic lines, which aided in expansionist warfare.
   Gregor writes that, “the separation between the sexes and the
   domination by the males [among the Mundurucu] is less an interpersonal
   matter than an intergroup question.”

   We can contrast the Mundurucu with the Tiwi, an aboriginal
   hunter-gatherer society of northwest Australia. Like the Mundurucu,
   Tiwi women procured the majority of the food; however, unlike the
   Mundurucu, the Tiwi had a matrilineal descent system. Furthermore, Tiwi
   marriage arrangements were strongly unequal, as I described in a recent
   article for Areo:

     The Tiwi—like many other aboriginal Australian societies—had a
     system that has sometimes been referred to as gerontocratic
     polygyny, in which most women were polygynously married to old men,
     while most young men remained single. The Tiwi also practiced infant
     bestowal and widow remarriage: young girls would be promised in
     marriage by their fathers before they were even born, while widows
     were required to remarry soon after the deaths of their husbands.

   A 19th century engraving of an Indigenous Australian encampment.

   This led to a situation where successful old men could have upwards of
   20 wives, men under 30 had no wives, and men under 40 were mostly
   married to old women. To obtain wives, men would promise their female
   relatives to other men—sometimes before their sisters, nieces,
   grandnieces etc., were even born—in exchange for the other men’s female
   relatives, to take them in marriage. Here, rather than matrilineal
   descent and extensive female control of resources increasing female
   power and acting as a check on patriarchy, we have a scenario where it
   provided males with a pool of female relatives they could use as
   bargaining chips: to gain allies through marriage exchange, to get many
   wives for himself, and to get a work force of women that would produce
   a surplus of food, allowing him to hold feasts and increase his status.

   The general pattern across cultures is that polygyny tends to be
   associated with greater female contribution to subsistence, less
   resource inequality among males, and strongly male-biased marriage
   arrangements, in which female marriages, but not male marriages, are
   arranged. We can see that the relationships between control of
   resources, inequality, and patriarchal social practices are quite
   complicated. Even the mostly monogamous, relatively egalitarian Hadza
   have a religious complex known as the epeme, where important parts of
   the largest game animals are reserved only for adult men. Marlowe
   writes:

     When a male is in his early 20s and kills a big-game animal, he
     becomes an epeme or fully adult man. Certain parts of all larger
     game animals can be eaten by the epeme men only. Not only can
     females and sub-adult males not eat the meat, they cannot even see
     the men eat this meat or, it is said, they could die or get ill or
     suffer any number of misfortunes.

   Smuts’s model points to some key factors that contribute to patriarchal
   social systems, but we can see that strongly patriarchal systems can
   still occur even where most of the conditions she identifies are not
   met. Similarly, Hrdy says that, “As it happens, a particular subset of
   human societies (patrilineal and stratified) takes the prize for
   “sexism.”” But as we see here, even among relatively egalitarian,
   non-patrilineal societies, we can find strongly male-dominated
   institutions. Numerous relatively egalitarian hunter-gatherer societies
   were known to have engaged in wife-capture practices against
   neighboring groups throughout the nineteenth and twentieth centuries.

   With these points in mind, we might consider an alternative explanation
   for male-dominance across human societies. Evolutionary psychologist
   David Buss, for example, attributes patriarchal social systems largely
   (but not entirely) to female choice:

     My view is that women’s preferences for a successful, ambitious, and
     resource-capable mate coevolved with men’s competitive mating
     strategies, which include risk taking, status striving, derogation
     of competitors, coalition formation, and an array of individual
     efforts aimed at surpassing other men on the dimensions that women
     desire. The intertwining of these coevolved mechanisms in men and
     women created the conditions for men to dominate in the domain of
     resources.

   One issue with this explanation remains the ubiquity of male-biased
   marriage arrangements across cultures. Young girls who are married off
   usually have very little say in the matter; overwhelmingly marriage
   arrangements tend to benefit males from powerful or high-status kin
   groups. Still, the fitness interests of a young girl and her kin do
   align in some respects, and young girls may exercise some choice in
   vigorously protesting a marriage, or divorcing when she can, but this
   is a quite limited degree of choice. Furthermore, looking specifically
   at the Tiwi case, a ‘female-choice’ explanation for that kind of social
   system seems to me utterly implausible. Buss, like Hrdy and Smuts, also
   places strong emphasis on male control over resources as a key fact of
   patriarchy, but as the patterns above show, strongly male dominated
   social control can be exerted without males necessarily dominating
   resources. We can also point to various patriarchal social institutions
   which control female sexuality, such as female genital cutting, which
   may benefit some women through inclusive fitness or intrasexual
   competition, but can’t be said to be the result of female choice in
   mating, and instead often reflect the interests of a man and his
   lineage in assuring paternal certainty.

   To be fair to Buss, across many small-scale societies, successful
   warriors are often rewarded with greater mating opportunities, which
   fits with female choice playing a role in some male-dominated social
   practices, but it can be difficult to tell how much of this pattern
   occurs through choice compared to how much of it is fundamentally
   coercive. Male-male competition, competition between lineages, and
   cultural evolutionary processes all likely also play some role in many
   male dominated social traditions, particularly in domains such as
   warfare.

   While female choice may sometimes support more domineering male
   behaviors, in many socioecological circumstances, women are likely
   going to want someone who will help provide for and protect herself and
   her children long-term. In such circumstances, if they were choosing
   males who were chronically engaged in warfare and pursuing ever more
   mates, it would seem to be a poor fitness strategy (Buss is not
   insensitive to these concerns). Humans are a pair-bonded species after
   all, with heavy male investment into their children—such as through
   provisioning, protection, or direct caregiving—often needed to support
   our highly altricial (dependent) infants. My own impression, which I’ve
   noted elsewhere, is that people around the world really do tend to
   prefer pretty stable, monogamous pair-bonds across most societies.
   Divorces, affairs, intimate partner violence happen in every society,
   of course, with variable frequency, but in every society, people form
   long term, cooperative bonds with members of the opposite sex. They
   usually live with each other, help feed each other, and raise children
   together.

   Similarly, male-female cooperation can lead to cultural solutions to
   issues that otherwise might have led to more patriarchal social
   practices. For example, across many small-scale societies, there are
   often strong taboos imposed on menstruating women, who are not
   infrequently segregated in huts, and/or banned from touching certain
   objects or engaging in certain activities. This was the case across
   many Andaman Island hunter-gatherer societies, where women were usually
   segregated from the rest of the group during menstruation. The Onge,
   however, were a notable exception to this pattern. Onge men would cut
   soft green leaves from special trees: the leaves would then be made
   into a garment, known as a bataghē, that the husband would give to his
   wife, who would wear it while menstruating. The Onge thus had no taboos
   or restrictions on women during menstruation.

   At the end of her work, Hrdy writes that modern advances toward sex
   equality reside on a “unique foundation of historical conditions,
   values, economic opportunities, heroism on the part of women who fought
   for suffrage, and perhaps especially technological developments which
   led to birth control and labor-saving devices and hence minimized
   physical differences between the sexes.” As Hrdy sees patriarchal
   social practices as being rooted in our ancient evolutionary heritage,
   she argues that progress towards sex equality should not be taken for
   granted. I will conclude with the final sentence of her book;
   “Injustices remain; there are abundant new problems; yet, never
   before—not in seventy million years—have females been so nearly free to
   pursue their own destinies.”


   William Buckner is a student of Evolutionary Anthropology at UC Davis.
   He is interested in cultural evolution and understanding human conflict
   patterns across cultures. You can follow him on
   Twitter @Evolving_Moloch

Share this:

     * Pocket
     * WhatsApp
     *
     * Email
     * Print
     *

Related

   Filed under: Anthropology, Top Stories
   Tagged with: feminism, men, sex

69 Comments

    1.
   南沢山 says
          + November 25, 2018
       It is peculiar how often it is said that men have greater access to
       resources, as if these “resources” were obtained without effort and
       given to them by virtue of existing. It demonstrates a profound
       ignorance of how resources are procured. Behold the paradox.
       Human beings have been around for tens of thousands of years. What
       prevented a woman from walking into a forest and fetching whatever
       the hell she wanted?
          +
        ga gamba says
               o November 25, 2018
            Spiders. Definitely spiders.
            Other creepy ‘n crawly things, I suppose. And startling
            sounds.
               o
             Saw file says
                    # November 25, 2018
                 @ga gamba…and possibly, the lack of toilet tissue, as
                 well?
                 BTW…thx for the post on the ‘conspiracy’ article. Took me
                 5 min. to read it all, I was laughing so hard. :)))
               o
             Hutch says
                    # November 30, 2018
                 Woman: I feel like a coconut up that really high tree,
                 with a wasps nest on those dangerous rocks.
                 Man: I feel like breeding and you look like you could use
                 a coconut.
          +
        Marshall Mason says
               o November 25, 2018
            I think what feminists mean by access to resources is the
            initial upstart resources they needed before they could become
            more self-sufficient, particularly education. There is still
            discrimination in some societies. What bugs me is that this
            discrimination has not only mostly vanished in developing
            countries, but the reverse trend is quickly taking hold, and
            yet they still claim rampant discrimination because some men
            tell stupid jokes.
            Your second question has a much worse answer from the
            feminists. They seem to think all that was preventing women
            from self-sufficiency all these millennia was patriarchal
            oppression, not, maybe, I don’t know, the baby on her breast
            and the several children crying at her feet, while she demands
            of her man (or men) that they work even harder and risk their
            lives even more to provide a more comfortable lifestyle for
            her. There was oppression for those few women who didn’t want
            to marry and have babies. They weren’t given much of a choice
            in the matter, but this had a lot to do with the lack of birth
            control.
          +
        Kevin Herman says
               o November 25, 2018
            She is much weaker then your average man that’s why and no
            smarter on average. She also mostly doesn’t want to have to
            with a few exceptions. That’s why the patriarchy exists.
          +
        Elaine says
               o November 26, 2018
            It implies absolutely no such thing.
          +
        Alan D White says
               o November 27, 2018
            A woman in the forest stands a better chance than a man of
            becoming food for larger animals.
    2.
   Leap says
          + November 25, 2018
       Monogamy, strictly adhered to, binds both men and women and is
       useful not only in creating stability but also in a society of
       private property (because it stops the man dissipating wealth into
       other families that he creates and it stops the woman bringing in
       the offspring of another male to pocket the loot).
       Those who oppose and demonise private property, and who laud and
       worship revolution (instability), often thus tend to oppose and
       demonise monogamy as well.
    3.
   Emmanuel says
          + November 25, 2018
       This is overall a very interesting article. However I believe the
       author should question more the concept of patriarchy itself. The
       idea that relations between men and women over time and cultures
       can be summed up as “domination of men over women” has become an
       unchallenged dogma of the modern academic left and of the
       journalists and activists who follow them. But the facts are much
       more complex.
       I mean, women have a huge influence over the men of their family
       circle, their husbands and their sons, and therefore can contribute
       to shape their choices to a massive extent. It means than even in
       societies where women are excluded from many aspect of public life,
       they can still exert a strong control over it albeit indirectly. As
       a recent article on areomag reminded us, the oldest surviving
       manual about women education, it tells “of the importance of
       women’s wise interventions when sons, fathers, husbands, or rulers
       strayed from the path of virtue” (from “hunting predators : me too
       and the strange mentality of mob justice” on areomag). If you study
       European history, you can find plenty examples of kings and rulers
       who were said to be heavily influenced by the women in their lives,
       often to such an extent that it harmed their credibility among
       other men. And I really doubt that it was specific to the upper
       classes. From anthropologists who have done fieldwork in South
       America, I have heard several times that local native authority
       figures did everything their wives told them to do. The strong
       influence of women over men of their family circle is a major and
       transcultural phenomenon that is seldom discussed (perhaps because
       it is hard to study) but should not be forgotten if you want to
       understand interactions between men and women.
       Another important aspect, in Western societies, would be the
       division of the world between the women’s sphere of control and the
       men’s sphere of control : outside of the house men were in charge
       but everything within the domestic sphere was under women’s
       control. Both spheres of control had their advantages and
       obligations, and in a world shaped by such a division women were
       definitely “powerless” or passive victims of male oppression.
          +
        E. Olson says
               o November 25, 2018
            Good comment Emmanuel. Men are who they are because of women’s
            choices. Even in societies dominated by arranged marriages,
            the mothers are invariably influential in choosing a husband
            suitable for their daughter based on the best available
            physical fitness/appearance (indicators of good genes),
            bravery/power (protection), and wealth/status (resources). The
            absolute dominance of patriarchal systems across time,
            geography, culture, and even species is also an indicator of
            what actually works in practice for perpetuating and enhancing
            the family, tribe, nation, species, which no doubt also
            influences the preferences of both males and females in the
            characteristics and dominant/subservient role they prefer
            their mate to take.
          +
        Saw file says
               o November 25, 2018
            @Emmanuel…good comment.
            I was the eldest, raised by a ‘stay st home mom’ (4kids).
            Massive influence and stabilizing ROCK. Dad was home after
            work (constructor) and weekends.
            When I was older, dad introduced me to the’world of men”
            (construction) and I became a man.
            Myself and my siblings all laugh at the “patriarchy” trope.
            Aside… In my industry, it has become a huge challenge, dealing
            with the children of ‘single mom’ raised kids. The majority of
            them don’t have a clue about living in the ‘world of men’.
            A bit more “patriarchy”, would definitely make the world a
            better sphere.
               o
             david of Kirkland says
                    # November 25, 2018
                 Indeed, the typical boy is raised primarily by a mother
                 and female teachers, often today being punished for
                 acting the boy.
          +
        Pierre Pendre says
               o November 25, 2018
            It’s well documented that Churchill was strongly influenced by
            Clementine because they were in the habit of communicating by
            note even when living together. I remember one from her to him
            in which she enjoined him: “Please do not repeat to anyone
            else what you said to me at breakfast until we have spoken.” I
            think most of these notes are from the war years but they seem
            mainly to have been a restraining influence and imagine
            occurred throughout their marriage. God knows what orders he
            would have given if she hadn’t been there to stop him. General
            Alanbrooke seems to have spent much of the war chafing at the
            orders Churchill did give and controlling a strong desire to
            strangle him.
          +
        Marshall Mason says
               o November 25, 2018
            I think you’re confusing third-wave feminists’ capital-P
            Patriarchy with the original, anthropological definition. “The
            Patriarchy” according to feminists is a society in which men
            have all the power and lord it over the women because male
            privilege and toxic masculinity creates a rape culture where
            men feel entitled to women’s bodies. They’ve tried to
            transform patriarchy into a political ideology.
            The original definition of patriarchy, which Buckner uses
            here, is not an ideology but merely descriptive of a society
            in which men are the head of the household and property and
            familial descent is traced through the male line. Unlike the
            feminist redefinition, women can still have plenty of power in
            such a system, but this power tends to be more focused within
            the household rather than outside it.
          +
        david of Kirkland says
               o November 25, 2018
            My most angry responses to others were often planted by my
            wife. I’ve noted most over-reactions on my part have tended to
            be after hearing complaints and worries. Like the proverbial
            mama bear, it seems that the sense of protecting children and
            wives can elicit stronger reactions to others than would occur
            if they were not present.
               o
             Emmanuel says
                    # November 25, 2018
                 @Marshall Mason, you are right to say that the original
                 anthropological definition of patriarchy and the modern
                 feminist definition are not the same thing, at least in
                 the English speaking world. However you should not forget
                 that the postmodernist, neomarxist (and everything more
                 you want) of the discipline of social anthropology : one
                 of its consequence is the conflation between those two
                 concepts.
                 On top of that, the French intellectual world (my own
                 background) has been heavily influenced by sociologist
                 Pierre Bourdieu and anthropologist Françoise Héritier
                 (little known outside of France but very influential
                 there, thanks to the support she received from her mentor
                 Claude Lévi-Strauss rather than the quality of her works
                 which rely heavily on unsupported assertion). Both those
                 authors described “la domination masculine” as a
                 universal phenomenon and I must say their analysis of
                 that phenomenon were fairly silly. Héritier went so far
                 as to invoke a global prehistoric patriarcal conspiracy
                 theory in order to explain why men are taller than women.
                    #
                  Andrew Mcguiness says
                         @ November 26, 2018
                      @Emmanuel, well said – the slippage between
                      different meanings of the same word is responsible
                      for a lot of careless thinking and confusion in
                      sociology and gender studies.
                         @
                       Bill says
                              - November 27, 2018
                           I just had this same discussion with my wife
                           who insisted Nationalist no longer meant what
                           Oxford or Merriam-Webster says, but in the
                           American vernacular it means Nazi…White
                           Nationalist. When I challenged her to explain
                           how to describe onesself if one sets your
                           country above all others in the international
                           setting be it foreign policy or trade, we went
                           down a bunny trail to no answer. That’s the
                           problem. Steve Bannon says he’s an economic
                           nationalist. Trump self-describes as a
                           Nationalist because he wants to MAGA. But the
                           Left twists that to Nazi/KKK the same way the
                           third-wave fems have distorted patriarchy.
    4.
   AJ says
          + November 25, 2018
       It is surely the case that in understanding the different gender
       rols in society an approach that considers the innate differences
       in the distribution of characteristics between men and women and
       evolutionary and practical pressures makes sense. What doesn’t make
       sense is seeing the outcome in anyway as male dominance. The most
       striking difference between men’s and women’s roles is society is
       exposure to risk, men are expected to expose themselves to risk for
       societies benifit while women are protected from risk again for
       societies benefit. The explanation in practical/evolutionary terms
       is obvoius. What is not recognised is that this accounts for at
       least the majority of the differences between male and female roles
       and that the people who suffer most from this are men for whom the
       risks do not pay off. Yes the most powerful in society will most
       often be men but so will be the least powerful. In evolutionary
       terms the average outcomes between men and women will necessarily
       be the same and the organisation of society will be stochastically
       optimised. Portraying the result as one in which society is
       organised for men’s beneift is a gross distortion and i think
       ultimately quite damaging and destructive.
          +
        Craig Willms says
               o November 26, 2018
            @AJ
            Brilliant. This is exactly right. It’s a complimentary system,
            or it’s supposed to be. While woman may feel they are
            constantly on the short end of it, even while living a decade
            or more than the men in their lives, they are on average
            greatly benefiting from the ‘system’.
            Years ago when raising kids was there ever a choice for me to
            just decide I didn’t want to work outside the home like my
            wife did? No, and hell no… She did, of course, quit her job
            arbitrarily – things worked out well, but it was never a
            choice for me, I was trapped by the need to provide the
            resources. Some patriarchal advantage for me.
          +
        Nate D. says
               o November 26, 2018
            @ AJ
            “The most striking difference between men’s and women’s roles
            is society is exposure to risk,men are expected to expose
            themselves to risk for societies benefit while women are
            protected from risk again for societies benefit.”
            Succinct and well put. I think that if you take all this data
            and distill it, you’ll be left with something like this
            statement.
               o
             Bill says
                    # November 27, 2018
                 US WNT and US MNT is a great example here in their
                 dispute about salary. The US WNT complained about the pay
                 disparity but ignored that they chose a higher salary and
                 less performance bonus than the US MNT (at least in part
                 because lower salary & higher performance bonus is the
                 norm in their clubs). Women accepted the security of the
                 “lower total” but higher guaranteed portion, until they
                 performed well and then they complained that they didn’t
                 get that great bonus. They were not; however, willing to
                 take the big cut in the guaranteed portion.
    5.
   John Johnson says
          + November 25, 2018
       From the beginning of the article:
       “By their very nature, it is said, women are the source of nearly
       all discord and litigation within the community. Through their
       ceaseless enticements to adultery, their notorious insensitivity to
       the sensible commands of father, husband, and brother, and their
       mindless passion for gossip and intrigue—in these and countless
       other ways women are the bane of a peaceful society.”
       This leaves no good word on women. There is more to them, you can
       even say than in an extreme sense, men are a destructive element
       (war, hunting, physical competition and rivalry), while women are a
       constructive element (caregiving, nurturing, emotional support).
       I would argue that it is exactly the ‘bad sides’ of women which are
       the initial motor for human progress. Men competing with other men
       over women is universal in every society, but men who compete with
       other men over the same women won’t work together for more than
       bare necessities. To solve this male-male conflict over women,
       there are basically two options:
       First option: Create a system that distributes a woman (or more) to
       every man so that competition is reduced to an absolute minimum –
       patriarchy.
       Second option: Become a man so great that the women compete over
       you.
       The first option reduces male-male conflicts to a minimum. When
       males compete only with other males, individuals are concerned with
       individuals. But when males don’t compete with each other, they
       might become concerned with society. So men who don’t compete with
       each other might work together on bigger projects like building,
       economy, war. The result might be prosperity and progress through
       solving issues than only teamworking men can solve. I would even go
       as far as to say that every early civilization is the result of
       patriarchy, of tuning men-men competition to a competition of
       society-society. However, when the society is too strict and too
       hierachical, men might lose their incentive to improve because they
       can’t progress socially. The result might be a vulnerable and
       stagnating society.
       The second option bases on the simple observation that while there
       is male competition over women, there is even greater competition
       among women over the best men. The best man is not left by women
       and not disrespected (by adultery e.g.) for fear of losing him. The
       initial quote then becomes irrelevant for these types of men.
       The option is different for tribes and for bigger societies. In
       tribes, the best hunterer or gatherer is the greatest male, so men
       strive to be this. However, this doesn’t create progress because it
       repeats with each generation. But in a bigger society, there are
       more trades to be great in, like construction, trading, technology
       (and even art, diplomacy). So men strive to be great in these as
       well – and the lasting results are prosperity and progress.
       In history, there are examples of many great men, the men who move
       the world, who had lasting greatness because of the women who
       supported them in hard times – and even more examples of men who
       became great men because of the woman they didn’t get! Harshly
       said, if women supported and loved the loser, society would be
       doomed.
       What can we learn from this for today? Either we have a patriarchy
       that ‘distributes women’ or great men. In today’s world, in which
       women are less oppressed than ever, this means we need great men
       instead. And this is a huge problem today: We live in a very toxic
       environment for great men to emerge. One factor is our very high
       standard of living: Great men are made through struggle, not by
       being pampered for their whole lives. Another factor is political
       correctness and feminism – we are teaching that being male is
       disrespectul and despicable. Men should treat women with all
       respect and do them every favor (=men should compete for the woman)
       when it should be the other way around (men should focus on
       themselves and have the women compete for them). The result of both
       of these factors are weak males (for the lack of a better term).
       (Google the ‘mice utopia experiment’, a scenario scarily similar to
       what is happening today.)
       So, in conclusion, condemning women for what is stated in the
       initial quote or men for patriarchy is easy, but the effects of
       both of it is what made human progress possible and is outstanding
       for our species.
          +
        Susan McGee says
               o November 25, 2018
            Humanes always get into trouble when they try to control
            Mother Nature. It gets worse when they try to explain it.
          +
        Debbie says
               o November 26, 2018
            That statement is from an anthropologist describing the
            beliefs of some little hunter gatherer tribe. It wasn’t
            supposed to be an endorsement of that sentiment.
    6.
   derek says
          + November 25, 2018
       Thanks for this article. I’m wondering if something fundamental is
       missing.
       An mentioned, many of the arrangements stem from the fact that
       women bear the children, lactate and care for the very dependent
       children.
       But that doesn’t seem to account for many of the other things. In
       grizzly bears the young male without territory is the cause of
       change, instability, long distance mixing of genetic strains. The
       female looks after the cubs and in the second year they become
       independent. The female will mate with the dominant boar,
       repeatedly through their life. The young males are chased off to
       find territory and complete with the older boars for mating
       opportunities. A biologist friend tracked a male grizzly from the
       southern interior of BC to Montana in the US and back.
       Young men are full of energy and strength, both a resource for
       their community and a danger, destabilizing and violent. Young
       women would quickly become preoccupied with child rearing, but
       unattached young men are the seeds of roving bands. Likely much of
       the decrease in violent crime in the West is due to a decrease in
       the numbers of young men in particular with the changing
       demographics.
       All the intricate arrangements for controlling men, women,
       resources collapses when a roving band of unattached males show up.
       Is it possible that almost all of these arrangements at the core
       are structured to control, incentivize, harness, or simply arrange
       for the survival of the young men and the communities they are
       capable of destroying?
    7.
   Saw file says
          + November 25, 2018
       @derek…awesome and obvious ‘mic drop’!
    8.
   martti_s says
          + November 25, 2018
       We have biological facts such as those with uteri give birth. It is
       a remarkable strain. Physiologically, the circulation has to
       increase by 30 per cent and the same goes for energy requirement.
       Psychologically, this means that the pregnant unit is not as apt to
       protect herself against predators or in-species competition as her
       peers. She has to have somebody to lean on. Somebody who thinks
       that the offspring about to appear is his. Yes, love is blind. It
       happens. But how often is love strong enough to overcome cuckold?
       Wouldn’t it be stupid to think that during the hundreds of
       thousands of years of evolution, these facts would NOT have had an
       influence on the way the societies have developed?
       Then, there is the childbirth, a very risky thing for the human
       female.
       Our heads are too big, the pelvis is too small. In natural
       circumstances, the maternal mortality is about 10%. Then we have
       postpartal complications, fistulae and such. It is surprising how
       little the modern feminists give attention to the problem of
       rectovaginal fistulae and their social consequences. They could
       really DO something on this issue, especially in the African
       countries where child pregnancies are the rule.
       Now, the baby is there, who is going to feed her. Only half of the
       human species have mammary glands that are productive enough to
       feed a growing baby. That means, the job is up to the females.
       In the natural setting, only about 30 per cent of the babies born
       ever reach maturity.
       Then you have starvation, diseases, war and predators.
       Men go to war, who takes care for the offspring? the mothers. The
       mothers. with a strategy for survival. And ones with grandmothers,
       of course. Let’s not forget the grandmothers.
       These are the cold facts of the life of the Sapiens Sapiens until
       very recently.
       And now you want to tell me that these circumstances have had no
       effect on how the psyche of the male and the female have evolved?
       Come on. Open your eyes. We are mammals. Exceptional mammals but
       mammals still.
       Our neocortices are a recent development. Our cultures more recent
       still.
       A fight against history will always be an uphill battle, doomed to
       fail
          +
        Fran says
               o November 26, 2018
            Right on. It almost seems as if you have been pregnant and
            given birth to a baby with a big head. I managed a high end
            career, but only with the support of my husband.
               o
             martti_s says
                    # November 26, 2018
                 @Fran: Pain is my business. I do obstetric anesthesia.
    9.
   Richard says
          + November 25, 2018
       Another jaw dropping article on Q, really quite brilliant and
       thorough. Loved it! Thank you!
   10.
   Mart Murdvee says
          + November 25, 2018
       Men’s Domination! Patriarchate! The investigator, who claims it,
       should try to establish a total patriarchate in his mother’s
       kitchen. After healing of the wounds (some kitchen utensils are
       heavy and sharp), the discussion can continue.
   11.
   ADM64 says
          + November 25, 2018
       The evolutionary argument tends to focus on mating strategies and
       child-rearing. No doubt these are very important. . I’d suggest
       that even if men and women were socialized identically, the
       differences in physical strength and reproductive biology would
       dictate a host of gender roles by themselves. The sexes notice
       these differences and make judgments – and adjust behaviors –
       accordingly. Then, there’s the issue of hormones and brain
       structures…
   12.
   Wilson says
          + November 25, 2018
       Feminists like Hrdy and Smuts employ evolutionary perspectives not
       to gain a more holistic understanding of the evolution of gender
       roles but to strengthen feminist oppression theories.
       The idea that women have been historically oppressed is never
       called into question; instead anecdotes from primatological data
       and ethnographic data are cherry picked to spin a tale of
       historical female oppression.
       The tone is accusative throughout, using such phrases as “male
       dominance” and “subordination of women,” but the truth is that
       gender roles evolved to complement each other, though of course we
       can find instances of injustice to both sexes if we look for it.
       “Contrary to the view that men or women are united with all members
       of their own sex for the purpose of oppressing the other sex, each
       individual shares key interests with particular members of each sex
       and is in conflict with other members of each sex. Simple-minded
       views of a same-sex conspiracy have no foundation in reality.
       “Although today men’s sexual strategies contribute to their control
       over resources, the origins of their strategies cannot be separated
       from the evolution of women’s desires. This analysis does not imply
       that we should blame women for the fact that men control resources
       or blame men for their relentless pursuit of hem. Rather, if
       harmony and equality are to be achieved, women and men both must be
       recognized as linked together in a spiraling causal chain of this
       coevolutionary process. This process started long ago with the
       evolution of desire and continues to operate today through our
       strategies of mating.”
       ~ David Buss
       https://goo.gl/L349uB
          +
        Craig Willms says
               o November 26, 2018
            @ Wilson
            The notion that the very word patriarchy is a negative
            connotation is troublesome. When we look around at the
            technological, big city world we live in we can only conclude
            that the ‘patriarchy” built that – feminism surely didn’t!!!
            My wife recently discovered the term mansplaining and has been
            tossing it around jokingly. It is basically a cutesy feminist
            word with a negative connotation for when a man says any
            declarative statement -at – a woman. It’s pure BS.
   13.
   AC says
          + November 25, 2018
       This article fails to address the relatively long period from birth
       to independence in humans. It doesn’t mention the continued need of
       children for their fathers and the great benefit to men of
       continued support for their children in terms of reproductive
       success. In order to be reproductively successful, men need to
       behave in ways that promote the relative success of their children.
       Across cultures this involves continued material and emotional
       support for their children often into adulthood. Dilution of this
       support does harm reproductive success for men.
   14.
   sestamibi says
          + November 25, 2018
       Check this out as well–almost ten years old but still relevant:
       https://foreignpolicy.com/2009/10/20/the-return-of-patriarchy/
   15.
   Farris says
          + November 25, 2018
       Are men really in charge or just hold the illusion of being in
       charge?
       Men have shorter life expectancies, die in wars, are expected to
       provide. Women may be sex objects but men are success objects.
       Notice most of the top heterosexual feminists are married to high
       preforming males.
       “Better to live on a corner of the roof than share a house with a
       quarrelsome wife.” Proverbs 21:9
       Females are excellent at manipulating and guilting males. That’s
       not to denigrate women but rather to point out strategies, that
       have evolved. Females have been known to encourage conflict among
       males. Men search for strategies that allow them to procreate.
       Women search for strategies that allow them to thrive. In the long
       run which search is more prudent?
          +
        Peter from Oz says
               o November 26, 2018
            There is a magnificent story by Saki, that turns this all on
            its head. It’s called Excepting Mrs Penberthy.
            It shows that men are far more able to manipulate women than
            many would realise.
            http://haytom.us/excepting-mrs-pentherby/
               o
             Farris says
                    # November 26, 2018
                 @Peter
                 Good read. I especially liked this quote.
                 “the women will quarrel. Mind you,” continued this
                 prophet of disaster, “I don’t say that some of the men
                 won’t quarrel too, probably they will; but the women are
                 bound to. You can’t prevent it; it’s in the nature of the
                 sex. The hand that rocks the cradle rocks the world, in a
                 volcanic sense. A woman will endure discomforts, and make
                 sacrifices, and go without things to an heroic extent,
                 but the one luxury she will not go without is her
                 quarrels.
                    #
                  Peter from Oz says
                         @ November 27, 2018
                      I can highly recommend Saki. He was a great Tory
                      writer who could see the quiet desperation of life
                      as well as the wit and glamour of his time.
   16.
   Wilson says
          + November 26, 2018
       You can see one example of cherry picking in the epigraph for this
       article.
       It leads you to believe that women in this tribe are uniquely
       oppressed.
       But in this same society:
       “Boys as young as three years old are pinned down by adult males
       dressed as frightening boars and their genitals are forcefully
       rubbed with stinging nettles. . . . Later in childhood
       their penises are abused again with bamboo razors and pig incisors,
       this time in a wooden
       structure built over a stream. Following the assault, the boys
       insert their penises through the floor
       boards to let the blood drip into the water below. Marriage brings
       little relief to the abuses of
       childhood. After their first evening together, the naked couple
       walk to the stream in the presence
       of spectators, where the wife builds a dam and the husband
       lacerates his own penis (see Tuzin
       1982).”
       https://pdfs.semanticscholar.org/141d/c81b655499dee2f38a511b51facb5
       6fc6f7b.pdf
       We see quotations from Smuts and Hrdy about men controlling women’s
       sexuality, but in monogamous societies men’s sexuality is also
       controlled.
       Also, in several other Papua New Guinea tribes discussed in the
       same book, the boys are forced to give older men fellatio and
       imbibe semen orally and anally.
       “In all these areas, the ingestion of semen through fellatio or
       anal intercourse is depicted as essential to the growth of boys.”
       (p. 10)
       https://www.amazon.com/Rituals-Manhood-Initiation-Papua-Guinea/dp/0
       520044541
       So which sex is more oppressed?
       Mightn’t it be accurate to say they are equally challenged but in
       different ways?
       But we won’t find an intellectual debate about it in gender studies
       or the “goddess’s discipline” because they are concerned with
       advocacy, not truth.
          +
        William Buckner says
               o November 26, 2018
            Hey Wilson,
            Thank you for your comment. I understand the point you are
            making in arguing that I did not give sufficient attention to
            the ways cultural practices also constrain and control male
            behavior. That is fair. However, I would like to draw your
            attention to a previous article I have written on exactly this
            topic:
            https://traditionsofconflict.com/blog/2018/1/31/on-secret-cult
            s-and-male-dominance
            As you can see, I give a great deal of attention to the very
            social practices you are referring to. In this article I was
            focused primarily on the way fitness concerns can drive both
            males and females to attempt to control female reproduction.
            In the article I linked above I focus primarily on the way
            young boys in particular are treated in the societies with
            ‘men’s cults’, being subject to torturous rituals and
            socialized to become warriors. I am not making any claims
            about one sex being “more oppressed” than the other, I am
            primarily interested in why these traditions and practices
            develop, and seeking to explain that
            -Will
               o
             Andrew Mcguiness says
                    # November 26, 2018
                 Will, the last paragraph of your article belies your
                 claim that you are not making a claim about one sex being
                 more oppressed that the other. You quote Hrdy: “never
                 before—not in seventy million years—have females been so
                 nearly free to pursue their own destinies”. However, the
                 men in Tiwi society can hardly be said to have been free
                 to pursue their own destinies. If “successful old men
                 could have upwards of 20 wives, men under 30 had no
                 wives, and men under 40 were mostly married to old
                 women”, the options for men are closely circumscribed and
                 male reproduction is effectively controlled.
                 I think your thinking would be clearer if you
                 acknowledged that you begin with a feminist perspective
                 of patriarchy as male oppression. In fact, you mention
                 that perspective early in the article, before going on to
                 investigate the evolutionary origins of ‘male dominance’,
                 a woolly concept which you never elucidate. In general,
                 there is a tendency in your article to conflate the
                 requirements of cultural tradition with male agency, a
                 slippage between the evolutionary interest of the
                 successful male and the actual interests of an individual
                 male. this is evident for instance in the assertion that
                 female genital cutting reflects the “interests of a man
                 and his lineage in assuring paternal certainty”. The
                 interests of male lineage are measured here against
                 ‘female choice in mating’ (the choice of the individual)
                 rather than to the acknowledged benefit to the woman’s
                 evolutionary interest through ‘inclusive fitness or
                 intrasexual competition’.
                 I’m not sure what your thesis actually is, if it’s not
                 that one sex is more oppressed than the other. Do you
                 mean to argue simply that cultural practices with regard
                 to sex, marriage, and reproduction give rise to the
                 control of female reproduction but not male reproduction?
                 I can’t see how that can be so – anything that controls
                 female reproduction necessarily controls male
                 reproduction. For example, a society which keeps women at
                 home and stops them having sex with men who are not their
                 husbands, to the extent that it is successful also
                 prevents men from having sex with women who are not their
                 wives. A polygynous society controls the reproduction of
                 unsuccessful men and not the reproduction of women. What
                 is it that you are arguing?
                    #
                  Paul Wary (@PrinciPauly) says
                         @ November 29, 2018
                      I had very similar thoughts, and a similar confusion
                      about the thesis, other than to give some more or
                      less plausible arguments as to why the scientific
                      notion of patriarchy is, or was always, equivalent
                      to the feminist version.
                      The article analyses how patriarchal systems are
                      unjust to women, omitting any analysis of how unjust
                      it is to men, or indeed whether some equally
                      plausible evolved social system could have been more
                      just overall. And besides, what is the argument for
                      using justice as a scientific yardstick? The
                      perspective and purpose is left unstated, but it
                      seems to be a restatement of the predictable
                      ruminations of some feminist anthropologists
                      Presumably a fairer system would have each female’s
                      partner choices unfettered, so each woman would be
                      free to mate with a powerful warrior, and and then
                      have a somewhat less fit, but more stable male help
                      to raise her offspring, with his reward being the
                      opportunity to father children with her at some
                      point. Each female would have an opportunity to
                      raise children. The least fit males would, I
                      suppose, would be disposed of somehow at puberty.
   17.
   Stephanie says
          + November 26, 2018
       Great article, informative. An important point that often gets
       ignored is the role women play themselves in creating patriarchal
       societies. Women not only demand competence, they tend to prefer a
       powerful husband they can influence over being powerful themselves.
       Same with wealth. Why go through the trouble to compete with more
       aggressive men, when you can find an aggressive man weak to your
       feminine charms? It’s much of the benefits with few of the
       drawbacks, particularly for pre-modern people without birth control
       or dishwashers.
       While the tendency for women to be home oriented makes sense with
       women’s biology and preferences, it’s not clear to me how polygamy
       could be allowed to take root if women had any influence at all.
       Your husband spreading resources and intimacy elsewhere defies
       women’s biological and emotional needs. The only thing I can think
       of is that in such societies, women actually are slaves, in that
       they are commodities purchased for a given function, their thoughts
       on the matter inconsequential.
       This means the focus of modern feminists on mandating an equality
       of outcome for both sexes essentially erases the natural
       preferences of women for competent mates. Meanwhile, their support
       of polyamory and Islam amounts to advocating that women deny their
       biological and emotional needs in service of pleasuring men.
          +
        Alistair says
               o November 26, 2018
            (compared to Monogamy) Polygamy moderately benefits Beta
            Females, and imposes equivalent costs on Alpha Females.
            (compared to Monogamy) Polygamy greatly benefits Alpha males,
            and imposes huge costs on Beta Males.
            Polygamy vs Monogamy is not a Female / Male split. It is an
            Alpha-Beta split. If anything, Polygamy is slightly more
            “efficient” as an algorithm (but is much more vicious for the
            losers, and consequently adverse social effects).
          +
        Craig Willms says
               o November 26, 2018
            @Stephanie
            RIght, thus the man-boy situation we now see where young men
            aren’t even bothering to try to become competent in order to
            woo women. High status career women are going to find fewer
            and fewer prospects among men at their income and status
            level. A young man with a reasonable income is satisfied
            living in his mama’s basement. Unless he wants children of his
            own why does he need to preen himself with competence and
            status. Video games don’t care about such things…
   18.
   Stoic Realist says
          + November 26, 2018
       It is fascinating to me how often these examinations forget to
       include the necessity for the application of force in early
       cultures. They frame the discussion in terms of resource access and
       war alliances, but they skip over other significant elements such
       as the propensity in early civilizations for the leader of a nation
       to not just lead it in warfare, but to lead it from the front.
       Cyrus, Darius, Alexander, Khufu are good examples of this. Safety
       in the times involved having strong leaders and men to die on the
       battle fields. And it could be difficult to convince men to go out
       to do that when they were worried that their wives would be at home
       adding mouths by other people.
       As far as ‘hundreds of wives’ and ‘hundreds of children’ many of
       those same kings were attempting to select an heir of suitable
       capability to manage, protect, and hopefully even expand their
       kingdom. Since they wanted dynasties they weren’t accepting resumes
       to find candidates they were building the largest pools of
       candidates that they could.
       Of course this also ignores that fact that many of the wives of
       kings were arranged marriages to tie bonds between the kingdoms to
       prevent the wars that killed people, destroyed land, and caused
       carnage. Also it leaves off details of how, like the Pharoahs of
       Egypt, many Kings were expected to display excelling sexual potency
       as proof of their powers and superiority.
       Once upon a time there was a requirement for a broad liberal arts
       foundation for every discipline. People had to learn their
       literature, their history, their philosophy, and even their
       theology, art, and culture as a broad base that they then built a
       specialty upon. This requirement enabled knowledge to include
       elements of other disciplines and common sense rather than winding
       up a victim of the hammer maxim. When all you have is a hammer
       everything looks like a nail. Well when all you’ve studied is one
       particular narrow field all of your explanations come exclusively
       from that field even when more rational ones exist at the basic
       levels of other disciplines.
   19.
   Markus says
          + November 26, 2018
       One thing I am missing here, although it has been pointed out in a
       comment above, is the part that the women play in arranged
       marriage. Arranged marriage in most forms, benefits the family
       group and the wifes (and aunts) are as much invested in the outcome
       as are the men.
       I think, anecdotally (or through reading Shakespeare), everybody is
       aware that in a marriage, women are as much the driving factor for
       status and money/resources as are men, if not sometimes more (but
       on average probably close).
       Another thing is, that some time ago I’ve read an article from an
       (female) anthropologist who was invited to a marriage in a tribal
       community where (female) genital cutting was the norm. Much to her
       surprise, she found that the ritual was mostly an something about
       status between and among the females, transitioning from girl to
       woman, thus gaining respect and good standing from the circle of
       elder woman.
       The anthropologist even offered the bride pain pills, which she
       (the bride) later gave back, because she did not want to use it and
       told (the anthropologist) that she didn’t understand the multi
       faceted factors of the whole endeavor.
          +
        Markus says
               o November 26, 2018
            Here’s the link to the article:
            https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2015/04/fema
            le-genital-mutilation-cutting-anthropologist/389640/
   20.
   KD says
          + November 26, 2018
       Martin Van Creveld argues that “patriarchy” is fundamentally
       related to protecting women from rape. Men, especially strange men
       from outside the group, will rape women. Men, because they are
       generally bigger and stronger, are more effective at protecting
       women from men. Therefore, any woman who can obtains a male
       protector (starting with father or uncle, then husband). Those
       outside the system of male protection end up being subjected to
       rape or become prostitutes or both.
       Restrictions are placed on female sexuality and female movement in
       order to avoid situations which could result in homicidal feuds
       between families or tribal bands.
       If this is correct, than modern egalitarianism is a function of
       effective modern police forces, which have taken over the role of
       protector from fathers and husbands. Because male relatives are not
       required to engage in the hazardous job of violent retaliation for
       sexual violence, they lose interest in maintaining older social
       norms (intended to prevent potential sexual violence and the cycle
       of blood feuds). If this is true, modern policing is a necessary
       precondition to modern feminist notions.
   21.
   blip says
          + November 26, 2018
       to all you JP fanboys, patriarchy exists, and all your moaning an
       whining about feminism undermining your masculinity is a waste of
       mental energy, try maybe deprogramming your head of all that
       “masculine” bullshit the culture industry keeps throwing at it and
       actually try to understand what a shit deal women all over the
       world are still getting…
          +
        Stoic Realist says
               o November 26, 2018
            Since your contention is that Patriarchy Exists it would be
            helpful if you would supply actual evidence for your
            assertion. Start by providing a detailed and exclusive
            definition of what ‘Patriarchy’ is and then provide a list of
            objectively verifiable facts that will support the assertion.
            Take care when providing those facts that they can only be
            explained or at least reaches the 85th percentile of
            likelihood to being only a trait of ‘Patriarchy’. After that
            you can try to provide a list of what is ‘masculine bullshit’
            and what isn’t.
            The problem is that the word ‘patriarchy’ does appear to
            exist, but it is impossible to get people to agree on the
            meaning. Since no hard frame has been put upon what it means
            people have reached the point where ‘it’s the patriarchy’ is
            functionally equivalent to ‘the devil made me do it.’ A
            similar issue is in place for what is ‘masculine bullshit’.
            Good luck getting consensus on what does and what doesn’t fit
            within these scopes. The words are being used now specifically
            because they’re a catch all for the people using them.
            As far as the ‘deal’ women are getting that’s a rather
            subjective evaluation that loses a lot of persuasive power
            when the same people who shout about it ignore the cultures
            and societies which have the most harsh policy sets on that
            front. ‘Still getting’ is another fun one. For all intents and
            purposes the world sucked for ninety percent of the population
            of the world until the 20th Century and even for most of that.
            Fortunately a few of the currently demonized societies,
            economic movements, and political movements managed to
            culminate in a period of time that has seen an astronomical
            improvement in the quality of life for people all over the
            world.
            Unfortunately people who have spent their entire lives living
            in comfort and luxury have lost the sense of what actual
            suffering is. The truth is that for all of the ‘inequality’
            current times are the wealthiest, most comfortable, most
            luxurious, and fairest times that the world has ever seen. If
            you don’t believe that try putting yourself in the shoes of a
            middle ages peasant who could be killed by his local lord for
            almost any reason.
            Am I willing to be convinced that patriarchy exists? Sure, as
            soon as you provide a precise definition and a set of
            verifiable measurements to use to evaluate it. Until then I’ll
            store ‘Patriarchy Exists’ in the same mental file as ‘The
            Earth is Flat’.
               o
             X. Citoyen says
                    # November 26, 2018
                 I agree with you Stoic Realist, but I have to give Blip
                 credit for covering all the empty rhetorical postures in
                 so few words:
                 1. Pigeonhole with pejorative category: “JP fanboys”
                 2. Bald assertion without evidence: “patriarchy exist”
                 3. Characterize argumentation as motivated reasoning
                 based on identity: “whining about feminism undermining
                 your masculinity”
                 4. Impute a mental disorder: “deprogramming your head…”
                 5. Accuse the author of “not understanding” (often with
                 the imperative “educate yourself”)
                 6. Accuse the author of being callous: “the shit women
                 deal with.”
               o
             Bill says
                    # November 27, 2018
                 It’s sort of like when one is charged as a racist, or
                 —phobic. One cannot respond “that’s bs, I have friends”
                 or any other such defense as that defense becomes the
                 ah-ha moment proving your guilt. One cannot offer up any
                 defense, and when I challenge the accusers they say “you
                 shouldn’t have to, because if you were not it would be
                 obvious on it’s face.” There you have it, if it was
                 obvious on it’s face, you wouldn’t have made the
                 accusation. Since you did, it’s not obviously false and
                 any defense is proof. Figure that one out logically.
          +
        Craig Willms says
               o November 27, 2018
            @blip
            Whatever… We all deal with shit. If you think that the
            masculine is just a good ‘ol boy’s club where we plot to keep
            the women folk down you’ve got it totally wrong. Getting by in
            a ‘man’s world’ is just as hard on men, devastating to a weak
            man. He is useless to women and even more useless to other
            men. There is no one to cry for a weak man.
   22.
   AC says
          + November 26, 2018
       Men and women enter social pacts that allow them to further
       biologically specialize in order to produce extremely intelligent
       offspring. This specialization generally affords males greater
       physical strength and agility. When this power is used to benefit
       individual men in a way that is not in the best interest of their
       offspring then women push back. Look at the relative success of
       societies where women fail to successfully curtail cultural
       practices are harmful to their offspring. These are failed
       societies.
   23.
   Jezza says
          + November 26, 2018
       It seems to me that there is a conscious movement, in Australian
       society at least, to ‘de-masculate’, to diminish the contribution
       men make to the welfare of all. This entails restrictions on
       telling truth, allowing boys to be belittled and thwarted in
       school, or establishing government controlled ‘safe schools’
       grooming gangs to encourage young boys into buggery. The net effect
       is that we now live in world of pretense: men pretend to be women,
       women pretend to be men, and the rest of us have to pretend how
       wonderful it all is. Society cannot survive like this. Unless men
       are given their due, we will be swamped by Islam’s lopsided gender
       disparity. Then the feminists can go to the toilet together and
       complain (under their breath) how cruel the world is.
          +
        Peter from Oz says
               o November 27, 2018
            Jezza
            I could argue that you are exaggerating the problem for
            rhetorical effect. But that would be to miss the point. Your
            point is a valid one. The West is becoming far to precious and
            puritanical.
   24. Pingback: Open Thread, 11/26/2018 – Gene Expression
   25.
   B. Scott Michel says
          + November 27, 2018
       Is it really patriarchy/matriarchy power structure or is it mutual
       dependence with distinct roles, where some roles are relatively
       ranked to others? By today’s standards (and some of yesterday’s),
       some cultures have strange rituals when it comes to male and female
       organization, mate selection, etc. Ultimately, though, men and
       women have to make their relationships work; hence, mutual
       dependence.
   26.
   jukkaaakula says
          + November 27, 2018
       Interesting reading! Thank you!
       “My own impression, which I’ve noted elsewhere, is that people
       around the world really do tend to prefer pretty stable, monogamous
       pair-bonds across most societies.”
       Maybe you are too optimistic.
       Without the beta males co-operating against the alpha males – beta
       mates demonizing both alpha behavior of resource monopolization and
       female adultery – monogamy as institution becomes labile. War
       parties against enemies probably help men to keep those coalitions
       cohesive. Thus co evolution of monogamy and war (in-group morality)
       is probably a fact.
       https://www.santafe.edu/news-center/news/bowles-gintis-nytimes-warf
       are-cooperation
   27.
   Morgan says
          + November 27, 2018
       The early civilizations all had male domination, and the West, in
       particular, was built around it. It baffles me how these people
       imagine it was only a coincidence, that in a more egalitarian
       society we wouldn’t have just remained like those primitive tribes
       feminists like to use as an example. The most important thing said
       in this article is the fact that ‘control’ of female choice leads
       to more cooperation between males. THAT is what built the West.
       Monogamy does benefit women, of course, and so that was included.
       But men had to be in control. Most marriage had to be arraigned,
       because otherwise everything becomes about mating and competing
       over a mate. Men have to fight one another in order to display
       their fitness to other women. In arraigned marriage, they already
       have a wife. They don’t have to compete with anyone. It provides a
       social base from men, and women, to stand on, and therefore allows
       them to focus on more important things, like building civilization.
       As for women, it provides them with protection and stability for
       their children. They don’t have to compete either, and they are
       effectively allowed to always have a male of higher status than
       them (as all males are higher status), which satisfies their
       instincts, and perhaps more importantly they don’t drive men to
       fight with one another due to their so-called ‘freedom of choice’ –
       because their choices seem to invariably tends to high fitness, and
       not some romantic notions of compatibility. If you aren’t aware of
       your own instincts, you tend to follow those instincts and make
       excuses or fantastical stories to justify them.
   28.
   Cat says
          + December 1, 2018
       I am concerned by a number of incorrect statements in this article.
       1. Not all animals reproduce sexually with sperm and egg. To start
       the laundry list we have hydras, aphids, certain lizards, certain
       sharks, boa constrictors, rotifers, etc.
       2. The claim that placental mammals as a whole bear helpless young
       — there are numerous ungulate species that bear young that are up
       on their feet and able to outrun predators in hours. See also
       elephants and whales which birth extremely developed offspring. As
       well there are non-placental mammals that produce young that are no
       less helpless than your average placental mammal’s.
       3. I realize this is Hardy’s claim, but I feel the need to point
       out that the claim that monogamy is the ONLY primate sexual
       structure within which we find “equality between the sexes” wrt
       size and access to resources is dubious. There are heavily
       polygamous species (bonobos) with relatively minimal dimorphism and
       an altruistic social structure that favours females. Female bonobos
       are extremely promiscuous and also dominate socially.
       I will also point out that many primates previously thought to be
       more or less “monogamous” were later found to bear offspring
       outside of the pair bond.
       I question the validity of comparing humans to primates /as a
       whole/ at all. Look at the difference between a chipmunk and a
       guinea pig, socially. A Norway rat and a Syrian hamster. We learn
       nothing about the rat from observing the hamster beyond basic
       things shared by all rodents like ever-growing teeth and a
       propensity for grooming. We cannot look at animals in an order to
       say some broad thing about another, highly different animal in that
       order.
       I realize the article is more concerned with theory but you cannot
       start off an evolutionary psychology theory based on incorrect
       assumptions about evolution and biology.
          +
        Cat says
               o December 1, 2018
            I’m also just now realizing that my brain conflated equal
            sexes with “female-dominated”, which is… interesting.
          +
        William Buckner says
               o December 1, 2018
            Thanks for the comment, but on your first two points:
            1) All of those animals, as far as I am aware, also reproduce
            sexually even if they also have alternative means of
            reproducing. The fact that say, some species of aphids
            alternate between seasonal asexual and sexual reproduction
            does not conflict with what I said, in my view.
            2) I can see how the phrasing can be a bit confusing there,
            but I was only referring to humans specifically in that point,
            even though I was connecting the foundation to sex differences
            in reproduction that are ubiquitous among mammals (the general
            fact of female gestation with the particularly altricial
            infants of humans).
   29.
   Raymond Scupin says
          + December 1, 2018
       I liked your essay very much. However, the reference to Cai Hua’s
       research is questionable. As Clifford Geertz always expressed
       skepticism about any claims regarding human nature or human
       universals. He was constantly in search of ethnographic studies
       that demonstrated that particular societies were so culturally
       different in order to undermine any notion of human universals or
       aspects of a human nature. In his defense of cultural relativism
       Geertz made the claim that anthropologists are the ‘merchants of
       astonishment’ as they describe the exotic ways in which cultures
       differ (1984). For example, Geertz wrote a praiseworthy review of
       Chinese anthropologist Cai Hua’s ethnographic study by of the Na
       (Mosuo) of southern China that suggested that they were
       matrilineal, matriarchal, and had no fathers or husbands (2001; Cai
       Hua 2002). Cai Hua’s book has been thoroughly criticized by both
       Chinese and Western anthropologists as a distortion of Na society.
       The Na are patrilineal, patriarchal, and they have fathers,
       marriages, and families (Harrell, 2002).
       Geertz, C. (2001). The visit. New York Review of Books 48, (16)
       (October).
       Harrell, S. (2002). Review of Cai Hua A society without fathers or
       husbands: the Na of China. American Anthropologist 104 (3),
       982-983.

   Comments are closed.

   Previous PostI Am Not a Blank Page
   Next PostWhat We Talk About When We Talk About Immigration

Narrated

   Narrated, Top Stories

NARRATED: How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life

   Greg Ellis reads How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life, Stephen
   Elliott’s essay about being accused of rape on the Shitty Media Med
   list in 2017. It was published...

   October 3, 2019

Podcast

   Podcast, Top Stories

PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of Crowds

   Conservative intellectual Douglas Murray talks to Toby Young about the
   moral shortcomings of identity politics and the Marxist underpinnings
   of the Social Justice movement, both subjects of his new...

   October 3, 2019

Top Stories

     * The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
       The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
     * 'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
       'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
     * Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
       Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
     * From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
       From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
     * PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
       PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
     * 'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
       'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
     * Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
       Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
     * The Case for Black Optimism
       The Case for Black Optimism
     * Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America
       Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America

   [merchstoread.png]

Share

     * (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)

   Help free thought live

   Close and accept
   Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this
   website, you agree to their use.
   To find out more, including how to control cookies, see here: Cookie
   Policy

   Free Thought Lives

Follow Us

     * Menu Item
     * Menu Item

     * Copyright © 2019 Quillette Pty Ltd | All Rights Reserved

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.
   #Quillette » Feed Quillette » Comments Feed Quillette » The Case for
   Sustainable Meat Comments Feed alternate alternate

     * Home
     * About
     * Subscribe
     * Donate
     * Quillette Circle

Quillette

Free Thought Lives

   Menu

     * Features
     * Science / Tech
     * Politics
     * Review
     * Podcast
     * Narrated

   Close Menu

   Animal Rights, Environment
   Published on April 5, 2018

The Case for Sustainable Meat

   written by Keir Watson

   I. Lies, Damn Lies, and Statistics

   Meat, we are told, is bad for the planet. It causes global warming,
   destroys forests, diverts substantial proportions of the world’s grain
   for feed, all to produce meat which only wealthy Westerners can afford.
   The iniquity of the situation led George Monbiot to declare in 2002
   that “Veganism is the only ethical response to what is arguably the
   world’s most urgent social justice issue.” Monbiot later recanted but,
   since then, we are told with increasing regularity that to save the
   planet we must radically reduce our consumption of meat. In the face of
   what seems to be universal agreement on the sins of meat eating, is
   there really a green argument for meat? I think there is, and I think
   we should be talking about it. Not only is the public discourse heavily
   one-sided, but the anti-meat message risks destroying the very
   environment is claims to be protecting.

   Let’s start with one of the most repeated statistics used to argue for
   reduced meat consumption: the claim that 100,000 litres of water are
   required to produce each kilo of beef – which is a staggering 1000
   times more than what is needed to produce a single kilo of wheat. With
   magazines such as New Scientist uncritically quoting this figure, it is
   not surprising that it has circulated so widely. Taken at face value,
   this estimate is shocking and may on its own be responsible for
   switching tens of thousands of people away from eating meat.

   However, there are many different estimates for the amount of water
   required to produce a kilo of beef. They can’t all be correct. The
   figure of 100,000 litres – which is one of the largest – comes from
   agronomist David Pimental (to whom we will return), but many other
   authorities have attempted to calculate this figure, each starting from
   different assumptions and political positions. In his book Meat, A
   Benign Extravagance, author and one-time editor of The Ecologist, Simon
   Fairlie, painstakingly deconstructs these figures. He points out that a
   typical beef steer, reared for 500 days, produces 125 kilos of meat at
   slaughter. From Pimental’s total, we can calculate that such a cow uses
   over 12 million litres of water during its lifetime – equivalent to an
   acre of land under ten feet of water. But cows typically drink only 50
   litres of water per day, which leads to a figure of 200 litres per kilo
   or just 0.2 percent of Pimental’s value. How did the agronomist create
   such a monumentally inflated figure?

   Astonishingly, Pimental included all of the rain that fell on the land
   on which the beef was reared, ignoring the fact that that rain would
   have fallen whether cattle were there or not. To inflate his alarmist
   balloon even further, Pimental used the most extreme rainfall figure he
   could get away with – for ranch cattle which roam over much larger
   areas than typical European herds. After patiently dismantling many
   different authors’ statistics, Fairlie concludes that, “The amount of
   water consumed by a beef cow appears to be a function of your political
   position.”

   The story of how Simon Fairlie came to write his book tells us a lot
   about the politics behind the AMPAG (anti-meat-posing-as-green)
   ideology. Fairlie spent ten years living in a permaculture cooperative.
   They had 13 acres, only one of which was cultivated for crops. Everyone
   in the commune helped with this task, which provided them with most of
   their fresh vegetables and some of their fruit. The other 12 acres,
   however, were grassland, on which Fairlie almost single-handedly reared
   dairy cows and pigs. Due to the vegetarian predilection of the members
   of the commune, Fairlie found that although they would eagerly eat the
   cheese, yogurt, and milk he produced, they drew the line at the 350kg
   of meat, lard, and dripping that came from the livestock operation
   annually. So he had to sell it. This would not have been so bad, if not
   for the fact that the commune was spending £200 a week buying in
   alternative proteins and fats from halfway across the world: tahini,
   nuts, rice, lentils, peanut butter, soya. The irony was not lost on
   him.

   Another anti-meat statistic is some variation on the claim that it
   takes 20kg of grain to produce a kilo of beef. This notion hangs on the
   false assumption that all farms raise animals in feedlots. In the UK,
   however, cows and sheep spend most of their life on grass. In winter,
   when the grass isn’t growing, forage crops (such as beet tops) and
   agricultural waste (such as straw) are primarily used as winter feed.
   Grain is an infrequent addition and usually only for a few weeks for
   ‘finishing’ beef prior to slaughter. So, it turns out that the
   guilt-trip headline figure is only representative of the worst-case
   scenario – the confined feedlot system, an industrial farming approach
   that most UK consumers reject for a host of reasons unrelated to feed
   efficiency.

   David Pimentel, professor of ecology in Cornell University’s College of
   Agriculture and Life Sciences (who was also responsible for the
   distorted water statistic mentioned above) reported at the July 24-26
   meeting of the Canadian Society of Animal Science in Montreal that the
   “U.S. could feed 800 million people with grain that livestock eat.”

   It’s a superficially persuasive argument. Unfortunately, in addition to
   selecting the worst case scenario – feedlot cattle – Pimental also
   ignores the fact that virtually all the grain used for animal feed is
   grain deemed unfit for human consumption, either because it was spoiled
   or contaminated. Grain farmers rely on a market for animal feed to
   convert spoiled crops into cash. If we all stopped eating meat there
   would be a lot of spoiled grain going to waste forcing up food prices.
   So animal farming actually subsidises human grain production rather
   than competing with it as these misleading statistics imply.

   Most AMPAG campaigners also fail to mention livestock by-products. As
   well as providing meat for human consumption, cows, sheep and pigs
   produce leather, wool, grease, blood and bones in substantial
   quantities which are used for a huge number of industrial processes,
   including making fertilisers for organic farming and even – for a brief
   time at least – the new five-pound notes. Almost nothing goes to waste.

   Source: Farm Credit Knowledge Center

   II. Cows As Eco-Vandals

   One of the biggest controversies (and misconceptions) about meat
   production is its contribution to global warming, which reached media
   prominence following the publication of the 2006 UN report entitled
   “Livestock’s Long Shadow.” This document made the shocking claim that
   livestock accounts for 18 percent of all greenhouse gas emissions
   globally, placing it ahead of the transport sector. Now, call me naive,
   but I thought the cause of global warming was our predilection for
   burning fossil fuels. Does it seem likely that farming – an activity
   that took place for thousands of years before the industrial revolution
   – is likely to be the problem?

   For the last decade, “Livestock’s Long Shadow” has contributed to the
   near-religious dogma that to tackle global warming we all need to eat
   less meat. However, there are important caveats behind the UN figures
   that take much of the darkness out of the ‘long shadow.’

   Firstly, this is a global figure. It masks the fact that the
   preponderance of greenhouse gas (GHG) come from deforestation to create
   new beef pasture or animal feed crops. That is, most of the carbon
   emissions attributed to the beef are actually from the destruction of
   the carbon sinks (forests) that preceded them, rather than the ranching
   itself. Furthermore, this activity is chiefly happening in developing
   countries. Most developed countries, by contrast, have seen increasing
   forest cover for many decades. Consequently, when the US did its own
   analysis of carbon emissions, researchers found that the American
   livestock industry contributes only 2.8 percent to US GHG emissions.
   So, even if everyone in the US gave up meat entirely, it would barely
   put a dent in the country’s emission figures.

   Secondly, in many cases it is the value of the extracted timber which
   drives such deforestation, not the beef production that might follow in
   its wake. Even if beef production ceased tomorrow, the logging would
   still take place.

   Thirdly, the UN report didn’t consider alternative land use after the
   loggers had gone. Indeed, researchers have since identified that
   changing to grassland actually provides the most effective sink and
   store of soil carbon – far superior to farmland and, surprisingly, even
   better than replanting forest. Indeed, the Irish Government has
   identified restoration of grasslands and pasture around the world as a
   priority with significant potential to mitigate Global Warming. In
   their analysis, they found that for UK and Irish livestock farms, the
   greenhouse emissions were negligible. This is in large part because our
   animals feed primarily on grass for much of the year.

   Ploughing up grassland actually releases carbon from long-term soil
   stores, which makes the idea of switching from livestock to arable
   farming look decidedly un-green. Ploughing also increases soil erosion,
   runoff, and nutrient depletion – all factors that are ignored in the
   AMPAG narrative. Partly because of these environmental issues, the UK
   government has a target to increase the amount of permanent pasture in
   the UK as part of its greening agenda. “The principal aim of the new
   requirement,” says the Natural England Research Report NERR060, “is to
   ensure maintenance of grassland as one of the most important carbon
   sinks for climate change mitigation.”

   Then there is the issue of dairy. Although most anti-meat advocates
   won’t come out and say it, dairy production is considerably greener
   than beef production even by their own dubious calculations. Primarily
   this is because dairy farming provides protein in the form of milk all
   year round, not just at slaughter. Besides which, the oft-repeated
   rhetoric that we can feed the world more efficiently with grains than
   animal products has another serious flaw: its calculations are based on
   meeting human energy requirements only, completely overlooking human
   protein needs.

   There are other significant limitations on grain production: in
   temperate climates, grains produce just one harvest per season and to
   avoid nutrient depletion and disease build up they have to be rotated
   with other crops such as potatoes or oilseed rape. Taking into account
   the reality of the whole farm cycle as well as human protein needs, New
   Zealand researchers recently found that in temperate climates dairy
   farming is actually the most environmentally sound way to feed a
   population.

   So rather than seeing farm herbivores as the ultimate eco-vandals it
   might be time to start appreciating their virtues. Their ability to
   convert inedible grass into high quality protein as meat and milk
   should be seen as a gift – a bit of magic that traditional pastoralists
   recognised and revered.

   III. Pastoral Landscapes

   Pastoralism is responsible for shaping the countryside in ways that
   make it more beautiful, accessible, and biodiverse. Many of the most
   famous and beautiful landscapes of Britain depend on grazing to
   maintain their beauty: From the tangle of patchwork pastures that
   typify the Home Counties, to the sweeping fells of the Highlands or the
   complex ecosystem of the New Forest. Compare these intimate,
   wildlife-rich landscapes to the barren and uniform desert of wheat
   fields one sees in Cambridgeshire where there is nowhere to walk and
   nothing to look at or discover for miles in every direction. Our food
   choices shape the landscapes we love.

   In the heart of Sussex, where I grew up, one finds unimproved
   grasslands, water meadows, seasonally flooded pastures, and marshes
   teeming with species. Many of these sites are only suitable for cows as
   they are well adapted to such environments having been selected from
   the wild Aurochs that lived here before them. Reducing our dependence
   on meat threatens these landscapes, putting pressure on farmers to
   drain and ‘improve’ the land so that it can be ploughed for arable
   crops. Is that what we want?

   When we look at much of the unspoilt countryside in the UK, what we are
   seeing is a continuity of incremental changes going back to the
   mythical days of the wildwood. As Richard Maybe explains in The
   Flowering of Britain, there are few – if any – remnants of the original
   pre-human wildwoods left, but what we do have are hedges and copses
   where some species have been continuously present since that time.
   Likewise, the richest pastures in Britain are those that have not been
   ploughed since the iron age clearance of the forests. He tells of two
   adjacent pastures on the South Downs, one that had never been ploughed
   and the other ploughed briefly, hundreds of years ago. The difference
   in biodiversity is still evident. Some things cannot be undone.

   In contrast, a field of grain is uninviting and soulless, and what our
   senses detect with a certain visceral revulsion is born out in the
   ecology – such fields wipe-clean the last vestige of connection with
   the ancient wild-wood. Species diversity plummets. Soil mycorrhiza
   disappears forever. Carbon sequestering stops. Agrochemicals, farm
   machinery, and soil erosion follow. Yet this is the preference of
   short-sighted anti-meat environmental campaigners. This is the future
   they would have for our landscape and for us.

   It is increasingly recognised that herbivores are in fact an essential
   component of a biodiverse landscape. Take for example, the ancient
   herb-rich turf found on the Trundle – an iron-age hill fort close to
   Goodwood in West Sussex; to maintain the cowslips, orchids, salad
   burnet, thyme, and other plants that grow among the fine grass sward,
   it is essential that it be grazed by sheep. Mechanical cutting rarely
   succeeds in maintaining biodiversity as effectively as herbivores,
   whose dung, urine, hooves, and instincts cannot be replicated by
   machines.

   Landowners such as the National Trust have found herbivores to be more
   effective at maintaining complex natural ecologies than humans. Exmore
   ponies are employed to maintain the environment at the white cliffs of
   Dover with almost no human input. For over 20 years, they have had “A
   highly successful effect on the area’s biodiversity.”

   The New Forest, Sherwood, Epping, and other great British forests owe
   their diversity and unique beauty to the ancient practice of
   silvopastoralism – pastures in woodland. Such systems have much in
   common with the original pre-human landscape which is now thought to
   have been heavily shaped by wild herbivores. The UK Government
   recognises the important role such animals play and argues that the
   best way to re-wild the UK is to use modern farm herbivores as
   substitutes for the extinct British megafauna – the aurochs and elk. In
   this naturalistic farm system humans fulfil the role of the absent
   carnivores.

   The possibility of livestock farming being part of the solution rather
   than the problem is looking increasingly probable, logical, and
   exciting. But for it to succeed, consumers of all tendencies need to be
   aware of the issues and make choices about the kind of meat they buy
   and eat. It does not mean we all have to eat meat, but conversely, we
   should think twice before promoting vegetarianism as the default green
   option. By many counts, permanent pasture is greener than arable land
   and silvopastoralism is better still. Your choices as a consumer
   determine which we see in the future.


   Keir Watson is a Head of Physics at St Philip Howard Catholic High
   School. He runs two blogs: Rosemary Cottage Clinic where he researches
   and writes about nutritional science, and Herbidacious where he writes
   about gardening.

Share this:

     * Pocket
     * WhatsApp
     *
     * Email
     * Print
     *

Related

   Listen to this article
   [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1] [player_line.png?w=1023&#038;ssl=1]
   Voiced by Amazon Polly Voiced by Amazon Polly

   Filed under: Animal Rights, Environment

95 Comments

    1.
   Trent Charles says
          + April 5, 2018
       Such a great article! Thank you so much. I feel like this provides
       a much more balanced perspective on the debate.
          +
        Santoculto says
               o April 6, 2018
            Useless cheerleading comment as usual. There are two balance:
            UNIVERSAL and contextual. Universal mostly always wins the
            contextual and also because it’s always morally correct.
            Yes!!!
            Wrong or poorly drawed arguments to legitimate a social and
            relevant cause [one the most important of all] is always
            problematic to the cause itself but it’s don’t deslegitimate
            it in automatic way only when to the reader ”the meat is
            weak”.
            Kill billions and billions of non human,
            domesticated/fragilized animals [often in the most horrible
            and painful ways] to feed billions of humans, the same species
            who are destroying this world, and to enrich psychopathic
            individuals and associates via hyper-capitalism [and ALSO
            communism] is a central argument for vegetarianism/veganism
            and is enough at least for me.
               o
             Bill Milliot says
                    # April 7, 2018
                 I hope your actual salads are better than your word
                 salads. That being said for obvious reasons, shame on you
                 for not acknowledging the millions upon millions of
                 hectares of land taken from their natural place as
                 breeding grounds and homes to billions of species of
                 birds, mammals and insects so you can prance around
                 feeling superior in your vegan/veg ignorance and
                 cognitive dissonance. Personally, I feel fine knowing the
                 grass-fed beef I eat was at least part of a symbiotic and
                 healthy ecosystem prior to the swift and painless death
                 of the animal it came from.
                 Your vegetarian/vegan diet is responsible for ecological
                 genocide on regional scales for which you must take
                 responsibility before condemning others for their choice
                 of food. Sorry, your hands are not clean of the blood of
                 innocent creatures.
                    #
                  George Stewart says
                         @ April 12, 2018
                      Here is, as I see it, a bedrock-point of this
                      argument. If you make the case that it’s morally
                      right to for humans to kill and eat animals, then
                      you will be responsible for drawing a line somewhere
                      down the food-chain. The vegan and vegetarian
                      position is that this line is arbitrary and thus,
                      has no basis in logic, and is therefore, invalid.
                      The intellectually and morally honest outcome of
                      this position is to, at least, not eat meat.
                      The intellectually and morally honest position of
                      the meat-eater, must be that wherever this line of
                      the food-chain is drawn, it cannot be arbitrary.
                      However, the challenge for the honest meat-eater is
                      then to present the kind of argument structure that
                      will allow for the eating of particular kinds of
                      meat (animals), without being general enough to
                      provide cover for acts such as cannibalism.
                      However, if the honest meat-eater provides such an
                      argument structure, they then must make sure that
                      the same type of biologically rooted, moral
                      segregation cannot be extended or manipulated to
                      justify things like slavery other horrors. Eating
                      grass-fed beef is morally better than pumping cash
                      into the factory-faming business. But until one has
                      an argument that justifies the actual act of killing
                      particular animals for no other reason than to eat
                      there bodies, we must admit that this practice of
                      ‘DEFINITELY NOT MURDER’ is far from perfect.
                         @
                       Santoculto says
                              - April 12, 2018
                           ”Here is, as I see it, a bedrock-point of this
                           argument. If you make the case that it’s
                           morally right to for humans to kill and eat
                           animals, then you will be responsible for
                           drawing a line somewhere down the food-chain.
                           The vegan and vegetarian position is that this
                           line is arbitrary and thus, has no basis in
                           logic, and is therefore, invalid. The
                           intellectually and morally honest outcome of
                           this position is to, at least, not eat meat.
                           The intellectually and morally honest position
                           of the meat-eater, must be that wherever this
                           line of the food-chain is drawn, it cannot be
                           arbitrary.”
                           It’s not logically arbitrary, but it’s RATIONAL
                           arbitrary.
                           If we will r-evolve to animalistic way of life
                           so i can kill you without mercy, everyone will
                           behave as a total psychopath.
                           There are so many things that cannot be
                           teached, must be felt firstly and fundamentally
                           and the empathetic capacity, something prevent
                           people kill you by baseless reasons, are one of
                           them.
                           ALL imoral and amoral people are FAKE about
                           their supposed lack of morality
                           They are super concerned about it but only for
                           themselves… it’s their dirty secrets.
                           These people who have destroyed this world.
                         @
                       Bret Toliver says
                              - April 13, 2018
                           You can morally eat any non-human animal. The
                           only caveat would be endangered species, but
                           that is pragmatic function of humans wanting to
                           keep ecological diversity. I only eat meat that
                           I hunt, but there isn’t the only good argument
                           against not eating meat is to not extinct
                           various animals. The reason you can do this is
                           because animals don’t have moral agency. It is
                           immoral to kill other moral agents.
                    #
                  Santoculto says
                         @ April 12, 2018
                      First of all, it’s very impolite to talk about lack
                      of better ”english” for someone who have another
                      mother tongue. This is JUST the globalization little
                      BABY!! Most people no have time or patience to learn
                      your PRECIOUS slanguage as a english lord so, CALM
                      DOWN and pay attention to my arguments… I no have
                      patience for cognitive or even CULTURAL elitism.
                      Secondly BABY [white tra$$$h], learn how to behave
                      in the debates. How* Answer my points and don’t
                      creates a new useless debate with a retarded
                      ”bacon-luver” as yu.
                      Thirdly, most of your vomit here is just vomit by a
                      subhuman ”airyan mind”.
                      ”That being said for obvious reasons, shame on you
                      for not acknowledging the millions upon millions of
                      hectares of land taken from their natural place as
                      breeding grounds and homes to billions of species of
                      birds, mammals and insects so you can prance around
                      feeling superior in your vegan/veg ignorance and
                      cognitive dissonance.”
                      I no have more doubt
                      there are basically two types of WHITE TRA$H
                      idiotic pseudo intellectuals
                      idiotic right wiggish.
                      95% of so called SUPERIOR WHITE RACE can’t think
                      beyond binnary thinking…
                      Someone who feel himself superior about
                      skin color
                      eyes color
                      [supposed] intelligence [just like a robot]
                      is trying to teach me about to be humble
                      come one albino snake!!
                      It’s not a argument, it’s your stomach with hungry…
                      It’s IMPOSSIBLE try to teach objective morality for
                      IMORAL or AMORAL ones. It’s just try to teach
                      kindness or altruism for PSYCHOPATHS.
                      I will not repeat myself.
                      Answer my comment firstly, something you don’t, you
                      can’t like a coward…
                      eternal teenager idiot.
                    #
                  Santoculto says
                         @ April 12, 2018
                      Another thing SLAVE ANGLOOS must need to learn, of
                      course the basics of REAL INTELLIGENCE:
                      How i’m responsible for something i’m not
                      participating directly or even participating**
                      On other hand, stop to eat ”meat” is something
                      anyone can do and start for the moment you don’t
                      want even with all sort of videos showing how cruel
                      is all this, so it’s alarming about your REAL
                      inferiority…
          +
        dirk says
               o April 7, 2018
            Not a balanced, Trent, in what age are you living?? A differen
            perspective, O.K., but not a balanced one, that’s out, nobody
            these days seems to go for anything balanced. We are fond of
            identities and camps. That’s the time-table.
               o
             Santoculto says
                    # April 12, 2018
                 No have such thing ”balanced” when this reality is
                 already extreme… We are talking about the planet earth
                 being totally taken by humans, destroying nature, killing
                 billions and billions of lives by the price of
                 capitalism, socialism or any other idiotic invention…
                 No have a debate here because what we have is
                 people who stop to eat ”meat”, sometimes putting their
                 health in some risk, by the price of absolute kidness
                 [and it’s also can be described as INTELLIGENCE]. people
                 who sacrifice one of their possible well-being by the
                 well-being of others who are not even related at
                 species-level [even at the very end all lifes are the
                 same in essence]
                 and
                 people who are at least indifferent, at least, to all
                 type of enormous suffering ”our loved and bright species”
                 are perpetrating against docilized/hopeless resistless
                 lives.
    2.
   Tim M (@tjmedcalf) says
          + April 5, 2018
       This article is shamefully dishonest in it’s presentation of facts,
       the water usage of cattle is not only measuring what they drink, if
       they are grain fed, the copious amounts of crops they eat obviously
       need copious amounts of water, and if they are grass fed, the land
       is often supported by a serious
       amount of irrigation.
       With regards to the claim that “In the UK, however, cows and sheep
       spend most of their life on grass”, what about in the U.S? Ya’
       know, the much larger population where a heck of a lot of meat is
       produced, in the U.S alone there are 28.5 million total “farm
       units” on factory farms. And to claim that factory farming is less
       efficient is preposterous – it’s the industrialised form, it’s
       almost -by definition- the most/more efficient method.
       Furthermore, citing New Zealand researchers claims that dairy
       farming is the most environmentally sound way of feeding a
       population? I live in New Zealand, perhaps you’re unaware of the
       massive impact dairy farming is having on our lakes and rivers,
       many rivers are disappearing due to intense irrigation and many
       lakes are now poisonous swamps.
          +
        MyName says
               o April 5, 2018
            and doesn’t the article clearly say that most grain feed is
            spoiled that would have gone into the human food supply
            otherwise, so the water use there was already committed. and
            since when were grasslands especially irrigated? I have not
            seen any significant examples other than maybe modifications
            of the routes of existing springs.
          +
        Dan Muy Gallo (@DanAbuHorace) says
               o April 5, 2018
            I wonder what evidence you would have to see to make you
            change your mind? Have you ever considered another point of
            view?
          +
        Zachary Reichert says
               o April 5, 2018
            This comment says far more about the OP than it does about
            either the article or the issue behind the article.
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            Tim, your reply shows that you obviously don’t understand how
            water footprint numbers are derived. Per Mekonnen & Hoekstra
            2010, the consumption of water, whether they eat grains or
            not, is only 1.1% of a water footprint number . 98% of the
            water is the water needed to grow feed, forages or grasses
            that the cattle eat.
            Now you’re correct that the “green” and “blue” water amounts
            may vary whether that feed is irrigated or not. But in the
            case of irrigated forage, approx around 6 to 8% of the 98% is
            “blue” water (irrigation water) whereas in the case of grass
            finished ruminant less than 2% of that 98% is blue water. Blue
            water is what’s critical, not green water. So no, “copious”
            amounts of blue water aren’t needed under either scenario.
            Grasses and forbs typically are more drought resistant than
            crops, so they require less water than crops. Many grasses and
            forbs are perennials, so they have deeper root systems.
            Un-tilled, and diversely covered soils also have more soil
            diversity and microbial life below soil, so these soils
            sequester more carbon which increases the water holding
            capacity of soils significantly.
            Now as for the US, you really don’t have a clue how beef
            cattle production is done (there aren’t that many sheep). All
            cattle are born on cow/calf operations, where the calves live
            for 6 to 8 months. Then the calves go to stocker operations,
            where tey live to around 12 to 14 months, Finally these
            yearlings are then sent to feedlots where they are “finished”
            on roughages and then finally “concenrates” (grains)…Grain
            finishing is around 94% of production, though grass finishing
            is growing at around a 25 to 30% per year. So in terms of
            numbers, this means 66 out of 81 mill head of inventory are on
            cow/calf and stocker ranches. These ranches are grass fed
            operations. Plus also means beef cattle spend at least a 1/2
            but more often closer to 2/3’s of their lives on grass, before
            being “finished” in a feedlot .
            So, in other words, Tim you’re kind of clueless.
               o
             dirk says
                    # April 5, 2018
                 I really don’t see so many mistakes in Tim’s reactions
                 Chef. Cattle drink water, but also eat grass (needs a lot
                 of evaporating water, mostly from rain) and crops (maize,
                 sorghums,mostly irrigated), Pimentel was cherry picking,
                 without making any difference in blue and green water,
                 but Tim did not. Pimentel is an activist.
                    #
                  LA Chefs says
                         @ April 5, 2018
                      Dirk again, you don’t understand how water
                      footprints are now derived. Water footprints now do
                      clearly differentiate between blue, green and grey
                      water. Green water falls regardless, blue water is
                      what’s critical. Grasses/forbs can grow on land
                      using only green water, most crops can’t. Most crops
                      need blue water especially for higher yields. So
                      water utilization is largely an appropriateness of
                      land use issue. Most grazing occurs on non-arable
                      land.
                      Moreover, water evaporates when the ground isn’t
                      covered. There’s also evapotranspriation through
                      plant stomata, and that contributes to the
                      hydro-logical cycle. When grassland is maintained,
                      or covers are used in integrated systems, this
                      improves the hydrological cyle, as well as also
                      improves water retention, so any rain that does fall
                      is more effectively used.
                      So neither you or Tim has a clue. You both strike me
                      more as zealots trying to explain numbers you don’t
                      understand as to the water balance models from which
                      these footprints are derived or what the numbers
                      actually mean.
                         @
                       dirk says
                              - April 5, 2018
                           Spoken about zealots: you seem to be a good
                           example of one from the Hoekstra’s school. I
                           wonder why discussions on veganism always take
                           such a meandering fashion, to stay in
                           hydrological terms. There is no such a thing
                           like evapotranspiration through stomata, that’s
                           too much of the good stuff, but maybe too
                           technical on a blog like this, and not
                           necessary for the discussion (like my
                           evaporation maybe was too little). The point of
                           interest of Keir and Tim: almost anybody not
                           familiar with footprints will be amazed reading
                           about 100.000 lt (mostly you hear it is 150.000
                           lt) for just 1 kilo of meat, not realizing it
                           is mostly just the water transpired by the
                           growing grass and crops (so, not all the rain
                           fallen on the meadow is at stake). I just read
                           that cows in Israel and Arabia produce much
                           more milk than our famous Frisians, but this,
                           of course, is all from irrigated fodder and
                           crops, and none or almost none from rain. For
                           the discussion on vegetal vs animal food: our
                           province of Groningen once was a dairy and
                           cattle province, now mainly crops, and even old
                           grasslands are now often under maize and
                           potatoes, so, depending on the market,there is
                           much competition between land for feed and
                           food. Too often you hear from propagandists of
                           animal produce that grassland has no other use
                           (the cherrypicking at work). In the end, due to
                           the much larger areas needed for cattle (and
                           not because of lacking rain), I expect prices
                           of beef worldwide hiking soon, whereby people
                           necessarily will have to give up their steaks
                           and sirloins. Vegetarians score a minor
                           victory.
                         @
                       Bret Toliver says
                              - April 13, 2018
                           Doesn’t the article clarify that the grain
                           product is waste grain? It would be created
                           regardless of animals because it is meant for
                           humans, but has spoiled.
                    #
                  LA Chefs says
                         @ April 5, 2018
                      Funny, how it won’t let me reply to your last
                      comment, but nope not a zealot from any school. Just
                      noting how water footprint derivations are derived
                      as was explained to me by waterfootprint.org. Older
                      models didn’t differentiate between sources of
                      water, but newer models including those by Hoekstra.
                      These models are also always being further refined,
                      and are applied per GIS mapping. The numbers
                      bantered around all the time are global averages
                      that more often than not have zero meaning in
                      regards to environmental impact. The models make
                      large assumptions about soil type, synthetic
                      nitrogen use (only by country), type of irrigation
                      (e.g. currently the models don’t differentiate
                      between drip or flood irrigation), etc So the models
                      also have a number of other constraints. They’re far
                      from refined especially considering there’s a lot of
                      variability of land. This variability also may not
                      just be limited to edaphic and moisture conditions
                      but also by topography and other climatic variables,
                      so yes there’s a lot of land that can be grazed that
                      can’t be cropped. Grazing grasslands is also a
                      better solution from a climate perspective, because
                      tilling such land releases carbon….and using
                      non-tilled chemical farming methods also reduces the
                      soil biology and thus the carbon storage capacity of
                      the land.
                      Integrated systems with livestock are a different
                      solution. Here too, non-till, and no inputs for syn
                      NPK’s and pesticides (especially herbicides) also
                      drastically increases the soil biology which in turn
                      improves carbon sequestration, nitrogen cycling, P
                      cycling, methane oxidation, fertility, water
                      infiltration and retention, etc. Though obviously
                      most soil science is way over the heads of people
                      such as yourself, though I’ve also written about
                      that more in this article as well, if you wish to
                      edify yourself.
                      https://lachefnet.wordpress.com/2018/03/25/its-the-s
                      oil-biology-stupid/ Once one learns about soil
                      health, and the critical role animals plays in
                      regenerating soil, the vegan argument fails
                      miserably.
    3.
   Softclocks says
          + April 5, 2018
       Show us your math and I’ll show you where you went wrong with this
       article.
       What a dishonest piece of hackery.
          +
        Zachary Reichert says
               o April 5, 2018
            Yeah, no you won’t. You don’t have anything to present.
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            Here’s an article I wrote explaining how water footprints are
            derived. I wrote this article after a month long
            correspondence with waterfootprint.org –
            https://lachefnet.wordpress.com/2016/07/04/la-chef-editorial-u
            nderstanding-numbers/
            As for feed efficiency, the UN FAO just issued a report on
            feed (Mottet el al 2017). This report is open source, so click
            this link below to download a copy. This report clearly
            demonstrates that livestock are “up cyclers” meaning they up
            grade inedible food into very nutrient dense food and thus
            INCREASE food security. The feed efficiency argument
            repeatedly made by vegans and cell Ag companies is a stupid
            one.
            https://www.researchgate.net/publication/312201313_Livestock_O
            n_our_plates_or_eating_at_our_table_A_new_analysis_of_the_feed
            food_debate
               o
             John says
                    # April 5, 2018
                 Tsek jy PRAAT UIT JOU NAAT!!
               o
             Robert B. Doll, Jr., M.D. says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 The sentient suffering that is part and parcel to the
                 production of meat and dairy is indefeasible. I would
                 challenge all of you who are defending the consumption of
                 meat to be a party to the suffering of these animals. And
                 if you are deaf and blind to the suffering, you should
                 have your vision and hearing checked.
                 http://www.buddhanet.net/pdf_file/lifecherish.pdf
                 Further, the health benefits that accrue to consumption
                 of plant-based whole food unprocessed diets are
                 undeniable. Look at the literature. Try
                 nutritionfacts.org or pcrm.org for starters. There is no
                 human nutritional requirement for animal protein.
                 Finally, LA Chefs, your confirmation bias is obvious. You
                 will have to live with your karma and your health
                 problems that ensue from the consumption of meat. Good
                 luck!
                    #
                  Bill Milliot says
                         @ April 7, 2018
                      An M.D. talking in terms of karma, really? In any
                      case, when was the last time you drove through
                      California’s central valley for instance, to see
                      where the food for your plant-based diet comes from?
                      Denuded and sterilized pastures and fields that were
                      once vibrant grasslands, now devoid of the billions
                      so species of wild animals (and yes, the trillions
                      that once lived in the now dead soils) to supply
                      vegetables to the world’s tables, complimented by
                      the stench of the CAFO meat system I might add.
                      So, no sir, you don’t get to proselytize with
                      impunity simply because you avoid meat. You are as
                      much a part of the BigVegetableAg’s eco-genocide as
                      the rest of us that eat vegetables, whether it’s
                      with our meat or not.
                      On the other hand, provided I stay away from CAFO
                      meat, I can eat my grass-fed beef knowing full well
                      the animal that supplied it was once integrated in a
                      healthy ecosystem that assured the well-being of all
                      species living there; birds breeding, bees
                      pollinating, plants thriving, deer and cougar. So,
                      I’ll take my karma over yours any day. IMHO.
                      Enough with the holier-than-thou vegan superiority
                      nonsense already. Feeding humans is a deadly
                      business for all creatures. It’s just a matter of
                      which system can do it in a way that supports the
                      most life – grass-fed beef from a well-planned
                      grazing system. Now that’s good karma.
    4.
   Bozhidar Hristov says
          + April 5, 2018
       If you try hard enough, you can find an argument for anything. We
       can surely find a way to raise animals for meat in an
       environmentally friendly way, but if we decide to for veganism it’s
       a choice that comes from a higher consciousness. I don’t quite
       understand the point of this article.
          +
        dirk says
               o April 5, 2018
            Yes, indeed, veganism started long before the environmental
            and ecological concerns took up around the 1970s. For deeper
            consciousness and a healthier, pure, ascetic life mostly, in
            earlier times even because a belief in reincarnation (Buddists
            wear a cap on the mouth to avoid the inhaling of innocent
            insects). Muslims and Jews eat no pork, Hindu’s no cowmeat,
            for centuries, or even millennia now). But, there comes prof
            Pimentel ( after the worrying reports of the club of Rome,
            1972), from heaven (= Cornell) with his math (=cherry picking)
            on ecology: -it’s the environment, stupid-! I wonder what
            Ontario dairy farmer Chris has to say on all this!
          +
        Intrograted says
               o April 5, 2018
            That was the point of the article. It’s all well and good to
            choose veganism for animals’ sakes, but if you’re doing it for
            primarily environmental reasons you might want to look into
            things a little deeper.
          +
        Matt says
               o April 5, 2018
            Have fun with your dead vegan kids then!
            http://www.i-nhs.com/inhs/diet3.html
               o
             Robert B. Doll, Jr., M.D. says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 If one is stupid, Matt, any diet (including a plant-based
                 diet) can be dangerous. Beer and pretzels is technically
                 vegan, but hardly to be recommended. B vitamin, iodine,
                 calcium and omega 3 FA deficiencies can be easily
                 avoided.
                    #
                  Matt says
                         @ April 9, 2018
                      Robert, thanks for ignoring all the cases of early
                      infant deaths due to the diet you advocate. Really
                      sticking it to the man and pushing the boundaries of
                      knowledge by advocating for the government promoted
                      diet. Deficiencies easily avoided? While not
                      actually true due to the chemistry of supplements vs
                      real nutrients, this indicates that plant based
                      diets are unsustainable. They require industrial
                      processes not available in nature. You are anti
                      nature
          +
        Lee Kingston says
               o April 6, 2018
            Well said Bozhidar Hristov…..humane, intelligent, humble and
            succinct….thank you
    5.
   Dan Muy Gallo (@DanAbuHorace) says
          + April 5, 2018
       What an interesting article. Thanks. So good to hear something
       other than the vegan perspective.
    6.
   Truevo says
          + April 5, 2018
       As always, the catastrophic perspectives of environmentalism and
       the narrative of the misanthropic man who destroys the world are
       revealed to be essentially unfounded, the environmental problem
       (such as the pernicious global warming) is potentially solvable,
       and how it has always happened, science will indicate the path of
       progress. On this point I agree with Pinker’s analysis in
       Enlightenment Now.
       The postmodern narrative of oppressed vs oppressors in this case
       has been cleverly transformed into men vs. animals, practically a
       problem of social justice… I am glad that Quillette starts to frame
       the problem of vegan environmentalism in this interpretative
       quadrant.
       Veganism is a free ethical choice (which I would never do while
       maybe someone does), but it’s often based on statements and facts
       that are clearly false and/or appropriately misinterpreted.
    7.
   L Ron Sanders says
          + April 5, 2018
       Some good points here, but I agree with other commenters that this
       is a very partial presentation.
       The fact that “Grain is an infrequent addition… for ‘finishing’
       beef” doesn’t change the fact that it’s an inefficient method of
       food production compared to a vegetarian diet (exactly how
       inefficient depends on how you measure it
       http://articles.extension.org/pages/35850/on-average-how-many-pound
       s-of-corn-make-one-pound-of-beef-assuming-an-all-grain-diet-from-ba
       ckground). I suppose that from an environmental point of view,
       raising animals for food on waste plant produce is better than
       binning it, but to truly asses the impact we’d need to know the how
       much cattle is fed this way. There appears to be a huge European
       import market for soy cattle feed in Europe
       (https://www.eea.europa.eu/media/infographics/eu-animal-feed-import
       s-and-1/image/image_view_fullscreen), I suspect the same is true in
       North America. Moreover, we could also presumably use leftover
       plant material for for biofuel production, so it wouldn’t be wasted
       if animals weren’t fed on it. Incidentally, it’s worth a closer
       look at what (quoted ecologist) Pimentel has to say:
       http://news.cornell.edu/stories/1997/08/us-could-feed-800-million-p
       eople-grain-livestock-eat.
       “Does it seem likely that farming – an activity that took place for
       thousands of years before the industrial revolution – is likely to
       be the problem?”
       This is an argument from incredulity. Land use changes are still
       increasing atmospheric CO2 because its not just about the soil
       carbon, which is what the referenced study compares. Loss of
       forests is a loss of a huge carbon reservoir because it’s locked up
       in the wood (not to mention there is a loss of biodiversity). Also
       omitted is the significant production of methane by cattle (see
       https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/deforestation-and-global
       -warming/).
       “New Zealand researchers recently found that in temperate climates
       dairy farming is actually the most environmentally sound way to
       feed a population”
       According to the linked study, they found combined approach was.
       It’s fairly well accepted that using marginal land for grazing is
       efficient and relatively benign, environmentally speaking.
       “Ploughing up grassland actually releases carbon from long-term
       soil stores, which makes the idea of switching from livestock to
       arable farming look decidedly un-green” Only assuming same amount
       of land is required to produce the same amount of human food, which
       we know is not the case.
    8.
   Hutch says
          + April 5, 2018
       Interesting article just as the previous counter viewpoint article
       was.
       I’m still unsure as to the true greenhouse emissions produced by
       live stock during their cultivation. Aside from the nutritional
       requirements, decaying biomass of uneaten livestock and their
       flatulence has been credited with a substantial creation of
       greenhouse gasses.
       If this info graphic is to be believed (https://xkcd.com/1338/)
       then I would enjoying seeing studies of the various amounts of
       flatulence being measured for types of edible livestock. Just the
       testing and control methods would be entertaining enough.
       We could be living in a timeline where we are forced to pick less
       flatulent producing live-stock breeds or attempt to genetically
       modify existing breeds.
          +
        dirk says
               o April 5, 2018
            You are right here Hutch, also Keir indulges in cherrypicking,
            because that flatulence (methane, a CO2 equivalent much more
            damaging than the CO2 itself) was completely left out, whereas
            in the Netherlands accounts for some 10% of alle the CO2
            equivalents damage nationally. Also strange: the article did
            not refer at all to that former article here,- The convergent
            case for veganists-, 27/3, by a certain Jacy Reese, who did
            not talk at all (or almost not) on the environment, but on
            animal suffering, obnoxious farmdays, sentience, exploitative
            mega-bioindustry and the like. I think, this is a shortcoming
            of the editors here, in one and the same blog, you wouldn’t
            expect so much controversy and denying of the presence of
            authors of similar subjects.
               o
             LA Chefs says
                    # April 5, 2018
                 Dirk, sentient animals die in all forms of large scale
                 food production especially industrially crop production
                 as well as in tilled organic production. Whenever you
                 convert, cultivate, protect, and harvest land, you
                 displace and kill animals, insects and microbes. Whenever
                 you store or transport crops, you also kill animals. The
                 big difference is that you kill different animals and
                 these animals die and rot in the fields rather than be
                 consumed. Whether you consider microbes and insects as
                 sentient or not is up to you, but killing these creatures
                 also kills birds and small mammals, because microbes and
                 insects are at the base of the food webs. Insect
                 populations are crashing along with bird populations due
                 to pesticide (both organic and synthetic) use as well as
                 due to soil ecosystems being destroyed by tillage and
                 synthetic fertilizer use. So sorry, there’s no harm free
                 way to eat, unless you’re foraging all your food and
                 living in a cave. here’s something more I wrote about
                 this here:
                 https://lachefnet.wordpress.com/2018/03/31/a-tale-of-two-
                 expos/
          +
        Bill says
               o April 5, 2018
            Aren’t greenhouse gasses produced during the decay of
            unconsumed grain-products as well (the ones which are
            alternatively used as livestock feed)? Also, where does the
            line of reasoning end? If “animals” through their very
            existence negatively impact “global warming” then should we
            conduct a widespread extermination of animals in order to
            reduce all that decay and flatulence?
            Of course, let’s assume all ranching is ended, cows, pigs,
            sheep, and chickens are all made extinct. We’re now purely
            vegan farming. Last I checked, a whole lot of negatives come
            about from that as well. Pollution due to fertilizing and the
            anti-GMO crowd have been proclaiming that for years. Ignoring
            the conversion to farmland, the decay and decomposition of
            unused farm goods, the fossil fuels used in farming, and the
            shifting of water consumption as well. See, to get rid of the
            pollution from fertilizers and abandon GMO you need to put
            more acres of land into farming which then requires greater
            irrigation to generate the same output.
            You won’t convince me either way when you choose myopic
            arguments. You can’t argue just “farming is polluting” or “get
            rid of ranching” with superficial and incomplete assessment of
            the change to the other side. The
            anti-GMO/pesticide/herbicide/fertilizer folks go the route of
            just assuming that more farmland can be developed to make up
            for lower per-acre productivity. The anti-animal folks ignore
            the same in their equations.
               o
             Kristina E Caffrey says
                    # April 17, 2018
                 The massive nitrogen fertilization which supports grain
                 farming has huge consequences, but the answer to that
                 from vegans is always “organic farming,” as if organic
                 farming could support billions of people.
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            With methane, the issue isn’t flatulence. It’s belching
            (belched methane is known as enteric methane). Cattle have
            bacteria in their rumen called methanogens that produce
            methane via a process called methanogenesis. Some other life
            forms do this as well via their digestive systems like
            termites, arthropods, cockroaches, centipedes, clams, mussels,
            etc.
            The way enteric methane is measured for ruminants is via
            chambers, SF6 tracers, masks, so ruminants are basically
            treated like tail pipes. The problem with such measurements is
            that these measurements are out of context. This means that
            when counting emissions you have to also look at other trade
            offs for other greenhouse gases and indirect gases. So
            directly for methane, you have to account for soil,
            troposphere, and stratosphere sinks as well as soil carbon
            sequestration and emissions of carbon monoxide, nitrates and
            water vapor.
            Methane in soils is oxidized (turned to water and CH3+) by
            bacteria called methanotrophs. This is a small amount of
            methane that’s oxidized this way. Much more methane is
            oxidized in the troposphere (the first 30 meters or so of the
            atmosphere) by fast chemical reactions with hydroxyl free
            radicals. These radicals oxidize most of the earth’s methane
            from multiple sources. The amount of hydroxyl radicals
            available to oxidize methane is determined by how many are
            created by water vapor and nitrates as well as how many get
            used up carbon monoxide. When carbon monoxide reacts with a
            hydroxyl radical, more carbon dioxide is formed. So more
            carbon monoxide means that there are fewer radicals to oxide
            methane. When methane amounts exceed hydroxyl free radical
            amounts, the amount of methane is the atmosphere increases.
            That’s the current case. From 1998 to 2007, the radicals and
            methane were in balance, and there was no increase in methane
            emissions.
            So as you can see, the atmospheric science is actually a bit
            more involved than just simply counting the the amount of
            methane belched by ruminants and multiplying that number by
            the number of ruminants.
               o
             Hutch says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 Thank you for this
          +
        augustine says
               o April 7, 2018
            Your concern about uneaten and decaying biomass, and
            flatulence, is related to another problem: waste products. I
            read some years ago that the production of animal waste
            (excreta) of stock animals in the U.S. is something like
            80,000 gallons _per second_ (yes, 24hrs/day). Hurts the mind
            to think of it. It is an industry challenge to utilize or
            dispose of all this, plus the waste from slaughter (blood and
            tissue) and in spite of the uses depicted in the article
            graphic.
    9.
   Scott Sterling says
          + April 5, 2018
       The great prairies and pasturelands of the world were created by
       millions of hoofed animals grazing, breaking up the soil, peeing
       and pooping for hundreds of thousands of years. That’s where vegans
       need to start to straighten out their vast misinformation.
          +
        Softclocks says
               o April 5, 2018
            Look a bit closer at the numbers. Maybe then you’ll muster up
            something a bit more formidable than that trite nonsense of
            yours.
   10.
   dirk says
          + April 5, 2018
       What trite nonsense are you talking of Softlocks? Around 1850 (just
       before the railways were laid out there), about 50 million
       buffaloes were trampling the US prairies. If I am well informed,
       it,s now about 100 million cattle and dairy in the feedlots and
       stables now. Nevertheless, I read in Homo Deus of Yuval Harari, pg
       84, that nowadays there are 700 million tons of domesticated (and
       flatulating) animals on earth, against only 100 million tons of
       wild large animals (also flatulating, and even more so per ton than
       the domesticated type, but in absolute terms much less of course).
       I wonder what Keir, and professor Pimentel (or is it Pimental?)
       thinks about all that!
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            Um, your numbers are a bit off. Bison estimates range from 30
            to 70 millions and the range was a bit more extensive. Though
            you’re forgetting there were around 30 million elk in large
            herds as well as 20 to 35 mill pronghorn and another 25 to 35
            million deer. This was up to around the mid -1800’s. Currently
            in total there are around 100 mill domesticated ruminants this
            include dairy and beef cattle, goats and sheep. beef cattle
            are around 81 million head. So in other words, the number of
            wild ruminants exceeded the number of currently domesticated
            ruminants in the US. . It gets much harder to estimate numbers
            of ruminants outside of the US and Africa, since populations
            of stepped bison, auroch and bison in Europe and Asia went
            extinct (or nearly extinct as is the case of European bison) a
            long time ago. So any other global estimates bantered about,
            I’d take with a grain of salt.
            One other thing to note, when you go back further in times,
            the amount of megafauna including many species of larger
            bison, also had very extensive ranges in the US and Europe.
            These megafauna went extinct eight to ten thousand years ago.
            As to why, a umber of theories abound including over-hunting,
            climate change, climate change and over hunting, over hunting
            of predators, volcano eruptions and asteroids.
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            Oh, and bison didn’t “trample” prairies. Bison, pronghorn and
            large herds of elk by pooping and urinating plus constantly
            moving due to predatory pressure BUILT the fertile
            biologically alive top soil …that we’re now rapidly depleting.
   11.
   Edward says
          + April 5, 2018
       George Monbiot has since recanted again. In 2010, he bought into
       Simon Fairlie’s arguments. In 2013, he realized that “sustainable
       meat” is simply not feasible on a large scale. People would either
       be priced out of buying meat or everyone would have to drastically
       reduce their consumption of meat in any case. Monbiot once again
       advocates for veganism.
          +
        LA Chefs says
               o April 5, 2018
            Monbiot is a twit, he doesn’t know anything about how food is
            produced. His thing now is ‘rewilding” but he doesn’t
            understand how ecosystems evolved either with large
            megafauna/grazers ad fire controlling plant succession. Here’s
            a response I wrote regarding one of George’s rambling
            arguments: George Monbiot once again tilting at the wrong
            windmill.
            https://lachefnet.wordpress.com/2018/01/16/george-monbiot-once
            -again-tilting-at-the-wrong-windmill/
               o
             Chad says
                    # April 8, 2018
                 As this was your last input as of 6 April on the above
                 subjects, I will use this place to complement you on your
                 knowledge base, and to say it was a pleasure to read your
                 comments.
                 Vegans complain about the horrible murdering of animals.
                 Geez, only naive city slickers say that, because they
                 have never seen a wild animal killed by another wild
                 animal – now that is a horrible, painful, and prolonged
                 death, unlike that which happens at slaughter houses,
                 where the demise is swift and far less painful.
                 If vegans want to pursue their nutritional protocol, best
                 of health to them, but to attempt to maintain the high
                 moral ground on these issues is ridiculous.
   12.
   Joseph says
          + April 5, 2018
       A very nice and interesting piece. The vegan-environmentalist
       narrative has its own distortions and like all the narratives it
       comes to distort, at least partially, certain facts to propagate
       its own ideology.
       In any case, eating less meat would not hurt. As (almost) always,
       aurea mediocritas/moderation is the right way. On the contrary, the
       complete elimination of the consumption of meat in the world, as
       evidenced well by this article, could be extremely dangerous for
       the environment itself. Checkmate against vegans.
   13.
   Jan de Jong says
          + April 5, 2018
       I would suggest that there are no crises, that the end is not nigh,
       that “sustainable” is rarely sustainable and that man is a meat
       eater.
   14.
   benita canova (@benitacanova) says
          + April 5, 2018
       More prairies please. They’re good for migrating bees and
       butterflies.
          +
        dirk says
               o April 5, 2018
            In Hungary, a few square miles of prairies (called puszta
            there) are left, with nice and diverse vegetation, and a few
            primitive long horned grey cattle on it, chosen by the
            ecologists. But 90% of West European grasslands is under
            monocrop of 1 type of productive grass ,heavily fertilized, a
            pain in the ass of the ecologists and bird lovers, without
            insects and flowers. Our (Dutch) government thinks about it to
            force the farmers to get rid of them, the onslaught of
            greenhouse gasses is too heavy, the agreements of Paris at
            work.
   15.
   Kevin says
          + April 5, 2018
       ButcherBox!
   16.
   nicky says
          + April 5, 2018
       A bit on a tangent, there is -as mentioned in a link above- quite
       some evidence that a vegan diet is not really very healthy,
       especially for children. Something that -I’d think- should also be
       taken into account.
       I’m surprised that the Alan Savoury method of ‘holistic’ animal
       husbandry was not mentioned. It allows for quite high ‘yields’ in
       extensive (as opposed to intensive) animal husbandry, basically by
       trying to imitate nature: dense herds moving in space over time
       (that sounds weird, but it is literally that), allowing for a
       ‘balanced’ natural vegetation.
       And now I’m going to eat my ‘afval’ (tripes) with a clear
       conscience 🙂
          +
        dirk says
               o April 5, 2018
            I wonder how many Dutchmen are wandering around here (even
            without having Dutch names), is it because of the cows?
               o
             Wiebe van der Land says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 No I always read the Quilette from Groningen
               o
             nicky says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 From South Africa, the farmers here are quite interested
                 in Alan Savoury’s approach. ‘Afval’ is a local dish here,
                 particularly popular in the ‘coloured’ community.
   17.
   J.J. says
          + April 6, 2018
       All I see here are flesh eaters trying to justify mentally their
       complicit participation in the abuse, enslavement, torture, rape
       and slaughter of innocent sentient beings for you own pleasure and
       flesh addiction. That’s all. If you all slept next to a
       slaughterhouse and had to endure the death moans, the stench, and
       palpable fear in the air of innocent creatures you may think
       otherwise. The fact is you’re so far removed from the killing and
       need to be otherwise the guilt would overwhelm you. “Do unto others
       as you want done to you.” No, it’s Eyes wide shut to the darkness
       that is animal agriculture. And don’t give me “oh I’m for humane
       slaughter and killing.” Right sign up your children, your pets and
       your spouse then. It’s humane. So perfectly fine for everyone!!
       Fact is you could care less for creatures that you perceive as
       objects. Creatures you do not have to enslave, kill and eat.
       Creatures most of you do not hunt with your bare hands. Innocent
       lives. Justify all you want. 98% if the world gets their flesh from
       inhumane flesh factories of innocent lives. The blood is on all of
       our hands.
          +
        nicky says
               o April 6, 2018
            As a youngster I worked (during a holiday) in a rural
            butchery. We slaughtered the animals ourselves. We did not
            torture or rape them.
            My daughter is vegetarian though, she hates the idea of eating
            her ‘cousins’.
               o
             J.J. says
                    # April 6, 2018
                 You obviously didn’t read the post. 98% of the world get
                 their animal flesh from factory death houses. That’s
                 almost everyone. Who cares what you did as a youngster
                 for one semester? And I’m sure the animals thanked you so
                 much for slaughtering them and not torturing them. They
                 must’ve smiled at you as you slit their throats. I’m sure
                 women thank rapists for just raping them and not killing
                 them. Female cows are force r**ed about 4 times in their
                 life thru artificial insemination to make them produce a
                 calf so they produce milk that the farmer steals and then
                 3 out of the 4 calfs (1 is saved to replace her when she
                 gets old) are taken from her at birth and sold off in an
                 auction for veal and when she’s WORN out completely from
                 this horrendous cycle she gets a CULL mark on her,
                 marking her for death and then she’s murdered and cut up
                 so you guys can eat her corpse! It’s absolutely
                 disgusting. IMAGINE YOUR daughter you mentioned going
                 thru that Nicky. Chained up her whole life, r**ed with
                 artificial insemination, made to have babies over and
                 over that are all taken away from her, then she’s
                 “milked” for her breast milk, then killed when she’s worn
                 out. Just because a cow doesn’t look like you doesn’t
                 mean that she doesn’t have the same instincts, feelings
                 and nervous system capable of fear and pain. She DOES.
                 Know That. Look up Specisim, Carnism, and watch Lucent.
                 It might open your eyes.
          +
        dirk says
               o April 6, 2018
            Dear J.J: in Holland, we have a park of 5000 ha of wetland
            with about 4000 innocent deer, Konik horses and half wild
            cattle. It is now end winter, for about 5 months no new grass
            to feed the animals, and therefore widespread starving (more
            than 1000 animals)after a long period of suffering. People
            don’t take it any longer, because the slowly and (apparently)
            cruel dying process was filmed and shown as if they were
            tragic moovie stars. So, people start throwing feed (hay) in
            the park for the animals (they risk a fine for that), and are
            pushing for killing the feeblest animals, finally they agreed
            to do so, because originally it was thought that nature should
            not be interfered with. What would you suggest? I know the
            answer already: a park without large animals, only birds,
            insects and flowers.But this is not what’s going to happen
            there. My suggestion: just to shoot the animals before they
            are going to suffer (November, traditionally the
            slaughtermonth in Europe), and eat them.
               o
             dirk says
                    # April 15, 2018
                 As of now, the death toll is close to 3000, of which 90%
                 is shot, 10% died a “natural” death. Today, angry animal
                 lovers are demonstrating. What hell are we doing with our
                 closest friends in the animal kingdom, horrible!
   18.
   Gustavo Herrera says
          + April 6, 2018
       If you want to be vegan for the sake of animals, be my guest. I
       admire your commitment to animal welfare (no joke, I do). But good
       luck balancing your diet since we’ve evolved as meat-eaters plus
       foraging.
       If you want to care for the environment and be healthy, eat a
       balanced diet including meat but try to chose animal-friendly
       options (free range, grass feed, etc. ).
       http://radicalanthropologygroup.org/sites/default/files/pdf/class_t
       ext_066.pdf
       https://www.livescience.com/24875-meat-human-brain.html
   19.
   Zoe says
          + April 6, 2018
       This article debunks zip. It doesn’t even touch on the source of
       the problem, which is, to put it indelicately, farting cows. Yes
       farming has existed for a long time, but the volume makes all the
       difference. Methane gas produced by cows is largely driving global
       warming. How do I know? My brother has worked for 40 years at
       Princeton and for the US gov doing nothing but studying global
       warming, that’s how. If he’s wrong, then I really don’t know who’s
       right. There are few, if any, people with more knowledge on the
       matter.
   20.
   dirk says
          + April 6, 2018
       I fear you are right here Zoe, and I don,t trust LaChefs for a
       second, however much he might have published in scientific journals
       (I didn,t read all he stuff he advocated here, but wonder whether I
       am the only one, what he wrote here is already too much to digest).
       Apart of cattle and dairy, there are more sources of that horrible
       methane, ask your brother, expanding rice fields worldwide are one,
       defrosting taigas are another, very soon on this world theatre to
       come. I am glad that I am not a youngster any more, Jesus Christ,
       imagine you have to cope with all these disasters, a real
       apocalypse!!
   21.
   Fred says
          + April 6, 2018
       Regarding carbon sinks, grasslands vs forest, grassland soil may
       capture more than forest soil, but it seems to me that globally,
       the forest would capture more overall (including the trees). Both
       provided links are silent on this point. Any opinion?
   22.
   Scientist Person says
          + April 6, 2018
       An excellent article which has stimulated some good debate and
       stirred the wobble of one-eyed ostrich!
   23.
   Fran says
          + April 6, 2018
       This article raises many issues. An important one is that adequate
       nutrition without animal protein requires optimising an equation
       with over 40 variables, because animal protein sources supply a lot
       more than the essential amino acids in a balanced ratio. This is
       not really feasible even if the computational power was available –
       there is not enough detailed analytic information on all possible
       sources of nutrients to feed into the equation. At the very
       least,the amount of knowledge and effort required to even
       approximate a balanced diet as a vegan (assuming you are not just
       buying the prepared foods displayed in health food stores) requires
       more effort than I have left over after trying to make a
       constructive contribution to my family and community. Furthermore,
       we still do not know for sure what the ideal nutrient intake is –
       see all the books and blogs on miraculous novel diets. The
       meat/foraging diet we evolved eating would seem safest.
       I suppose it could be considered ethical to experiment on yourself,
       as Gandhi did, and numerous vegans do. University ethics committees
       are firmly against this, partly because it is impossible to escape
       subjective biases, such as those that lead to the hostile comments
       on an interesting discussion of the possible benefits of animal
       products. I do strongly object to anyone who carries out the
       experiments on children, be they their own or those of others.
       I grew up in India, where the effects of adding as little as 200 ml
       of milk to a child’s diet were more than obvious.
          +
        Chad says
               o April 8, 2018
            Thanks for your input here, Fran. It would be the height of
            human arrogance to assume we know all there is to know about
            nutrition, so I follow your motto, ” The meat/foraging diet we
            evolved eating would seem safest.”
            Decades ago, I tried a vegan diet and did not like the adverse
            effects on my health.
   24.
   Anton Coaker says
          + April 7, 2018
       Brilliant Kier, I salute you
   25.
   augustine says
          + April 7, 2018
       One argument vegans like to use to support their positions is that
       we can feed many more people per acre if we abandon meat
       production. I have not seen anyone refute this assertion. It is not
       so much about livestock areas converted to farming but feed crop
       farming converted to food for humans. Barring any drastic changes
       in population trajectories, I have little doubt that we would not
       hesitate to exploit that potential so long as resources hold out.
       So what are the metrics involved? Some commenters love stats and
       calculations so, if there is an interest, I will rely on their
       kindness to tell us how many people might be supported on this
       planet by such an agricultural conversion. 20B? 40B? The same
       environmentally concerned folks who decry habitat destruction and
       loss of biodiversity would do well to keep in mind the effects of a
       much larger, exclusively vegan human population. I’m not saying
       meat-eating is a direct conservation strategy but veganism per se
       is no solution to our basic tendency to combat and subdue nature.
   26.
   dirk says
          + April 9, 2018
       The figure of 40 B. has been calculated once by a professor in
       theoretical ,potential food production , professor C.T de Wit. This
       figure was not purely a vegetal diet, but for a diet with minimal
       animal input to satisfy dietary needs (see Fran,s reation above).
       Recently, the Netherlands official Food Institute came with kind of
       more sensible food guidelines, because of our debts to the Paris
       agreements, we shoul eat less meat and more vegetarian proteins
       (legumes mostly). Of course, this is not going to happen, unless it
       is forced by heavy meat taxes. Beans and peas is a poor man;s food,
       and our chldren are enchanted by all the luxuries they have learned
       from their parents, they will not give up their luxury salmon,
       caviar and entrecote diets, neither their vacations(4x a year with
       the plane somewhere far away, to drink a beer and to swim in the
       Canary islands or on Bali Island). This simply is the horrible
       inconvenient truth! Vegans will always stay a minority of 2% or
       less in some Western countries
   27. Pingback: Rural round-up | Homepaddock
   28.
   Alexander says
          + April 13, 2018
       Interesting article. You re right in highlighting misleading claims
       – which is what Simon Fairlie’s book is all about. But your
       argumentation is rather shallow. I’m not shocked that a popular
       statistic about the water footprint is actually a bit misleading-
       welcome to the real world. The point is: compared to a plant-based
       diet, a meat-based diet has a much higher water footprint. I don’t
       think your figure of 200 liters per kilo makes sense, the highest
       contribution to the water footprint is from the food, not what a
       cow drinks.
       About a small permaculture/organic farm: yes, there is an argument
       for small-scale keeping of livestock, which contributes to organic
       matter on the arable side of the farm and is relatively friendly
       for the animals involved. The big picture is however that if you
       walk into a random supermarket, most of the meat comes from
       industry-farmed animals. In Western Europe we have so many animals
       that the nutrients that would in a small mixed farming system
       benefit agricultural land, are causing pollution. Long story short:
       in theory yes! And there are some inspiring examples, yes, good!
       But this has nothing to do (unfortunately) with how the majority of
       supermarket meat is produced.
       The argument about by-products and ‘spoiled grain’ is misleading-
       the market would adapt itself quickly and produce grain that is fit
       for human consumption.
       In the second section, none of the arguments are convincing in my
       opinion. The big picture is that we are 7 billion people, soon to
       be 10 billion. The least land and water intensive way to feed these
       people is with a plant-based diet. We use our farmland for all
       sorts of things, but food is not high on the agenda. We use it to
       grow malting barley for whiskey (Scotland) or corn for biofuel
       (US), or soybeen for cattle (brazil). Small-scale farmers in
       south-east asia and Africa are the chunk of farmers who actually
       grow food (and yes, often with some livestock).
       The third part is all based on the assumption that current pastoral
       systems would need to be converted to arable land in case we all
       went vegan (which is something he doesn’t need to worry about!).
       That is an interesting question to unpack- globally speaking you
       need less land for a vegan diet, which would give more space for
       ‘rewilding’ proper.
       Your picture of arable farming as biodiversity poor compared to
       permanent pasture is also questionable- especially diverse and
       small-scale farmland with hedges, margins, rotations etc is
       essential for a lot of biodiversity.
   29. Pingback: The Case for Sustainable Meat – Rosemary Cottage Clinic
       Blog
   30.
   dirk says
          + April 13, 2018
       After all these reactions, and having calculated a little bit on it
       (it,s my profession after all), here something I would like to hear
       reactions on (e.g., from LaChefs or Ontario Chris)
       For a diet with the necessary, small animal input for dietal
       balanced food you need 150% of a purey vegetal menu (50% extra
       area). See also Fran above.
       For a diet with 50% animal proteins (not really necessary) it will
       come to about 200% ( so, 100% extra above the vegetal one).
       For a diet as normal now in the wealthy, carnivore world of Europe,
       US and Japan (fisheaters) it’s close to 200% extra.
       But, diets are completely unimportant where it comes to footprint
       and area needed. For total area needed (graveyards, sport, nature,
       space to clear rubbish, entertainment etc etc) you need roughly 5x
       more than for food. So, this little bit (50-200%) extra in case of
       vegetarian, flex, or carnivore doesn’t mean too much! Take care: it
       all depends very much on the standards of agriculture, whether you
       use fertilizers and so on. Without fertilizer, the area needed is
       beyond what is available on this planet.
   31.
   Joaquim C says
          + April 14, 2018
       ”The Ecologist, Simon Fairlie, painstakingly deconstructs these
       figures. He points out that a typical beef steer, reared for 500
       days, produces 125 kilos of meat at slaughter.”
       Oh my!; more about 400 kg of meat or more.
       P.S. I’m a Rancher.
          +
        dirk says
               o April 15, 2018
            I think you are talking about carcass weight Joaquim, and
            Simon about boneless meat,and probably the prime steaks and
            ribs without any bone and fat. Everybody, rancher, housewife,
            butcher, ecologist, painter, vegetarian, vegan, agronomist has
            its own typical way to look at a (slaugthered) steer.
               o
             Joaquim C says
                    # April 15, 2018
                 Yes I am, and Simon is a pessimist…
                 ———————————-
                 https://extension.tennessee.edu/publications/Documents/PB
                 1822.pdf
                 Summary
                 The amount of meat that is cut and wrapped for
                 consumption will be much less than the live animal
                 weight. A 1200-pound beef animal will yield a hot
                 carcass weight of approximately 750 pounds. Once
                 cooled, the carcass weight will be approximately
                 730 pounds. When de-boned and trimmed, there will
                 be approximately 500 pounds of trimmed and deboned
                 meat for wrapping and freezing.
                 —————————-
                 check page nine…
                 500 pounds are about 230kg..
                 Albeit I’m not from Tennesee (I’m from Portugal) a 500
                 days bovine (raised for beef) that is about some 1200
                 pounds makes sense here too, could be more, could be
                 less.
                 Anyway here we also eat the liver, heart, tail. and lots
                 of the trimmed parts goes into burgers and meatballs..
                 One thing I can tell you; when I see my herd I think that
                 if not me those living interacting animals would not
                 exist. That’s a good felling!
               o
             dirk says
                    # April 16, 2018
                 Painters: Rembrandt and Chaim Soutine, splendid views on
                 the slaughtered carcass! And none of them knew the term
                 vegan!
   32.
   dirk says
          + April 15, 2018
       We are going down already a little bit, maybe Simon detracted also
       the lean trim, for ground parts ?(I did not read the original). I
       was in Vila Real, and saw some marvelous Barroso steers there, with
       impressive horns, kept in small herds by local farmers. Absolutely
       fabulous, so I can imagine your enthousiasm for the local brands
       and their performance. Greetings from Utrecht.
   33.
   Joaquim C says
          + April 15, 2018
       Small world! My farm is a bit more south, Idanha-a-Nova
       municipality, cattle area. Greetings from Lisbon where I’m!
       Back on topic.. If the world goes vegan..I’ll be busted, my herd
       will obviously naturally die or gonna be culled, and that’s it;
       more space for trees rabbits boars… etc.. that all of them will die
       too… most of them in more ‘inhuman’ ways…
   34.
   dirk says
          + April 15, 2018
       Now you are the pessimist J.C. Our newspapers just the day before
       yesterday came with the news that even 1 glas of wine or beer daily
       is bad for your health and shortens your life. I think very few
       people will change their drinking habits because of this alarming
       news. As also they will not do with their meat consumption (though
       a little bit more pulses instead of chicken and pork would not be
       bad for people and planet alike. And now I am going to sleep, it’s
       late, good night!
          +
        Joaquim C says
               o April 17, 2018
            Not at all! that everything that lives dies is good old common
            sense…
   35. Pingback: Shaving carrots – Looking back in sadness
   36.
   Kristina E Caffrey says
          + April 17, 2018
       One point I did not see made in the article–comparing 1 kg of beef
       to 1 kg of wheat is apples to oranges. The macronutrient value and
       micronutrient value of 1 kg of beef is wildly different, and likely
       wildly higher, than the 1 kg of wheat. Beef is incredibly nutrient
       dense, so it’s not just about “feeding” a population, but getting
       the most nutritional bang for your buck.
   37.
   dirk says
          + April 17, 2018
       It would have been better maybe to compare the proteins or the
       calories that wheat or beef contain. One kg of wheat contains about
       3x the calories of 1 kg of meat, but only about 1/2 the (valuable)
       proteins. More importantly, the price of meat = 100x that of wheat
       per kg.
       And that’s why poor people (and some idealistic ones) eat a
       vegetarian diet (much more calories ,to keep you alive, for your
       (little) money), but,cattle need a lot of space (ask Joaquim C.)
       and thus more planet and resources.
          +
        Joaquim C says
               o April 17, 2018
            I probaly have more faith in humanity, and that people that
            are not in State payroll but acctually doing things will try
            to do them the best way possible. 😉
   38.
   Joaquim C says
          + April 17, 2018
       The price of meat, ok …: lets put it this way; as a thumb rule in
       the buisness, a calf needs 7kg of grain( wheat,corn soybeans etc,
       mix ) to put 1kg of live weight. Assuming a conversion of 500p meat
       / 1200p live weight = 0,416 meat to live weight ratio (Tennesse Uni
       see link above) we need 7/0,416 kg of cereal to get 1kg of lean
       meat, so 16,8 kg of cereal to get 1kg of meat. Cattle finishing
       food is about 280€ a ton here so the cost in grains to get 1kg of
       meat is 0,28×16.8 = 4,7€. so i’d say that the cost ratio is between
       1,5 to 8 of grains used.
       Cattle needs space.. yes my farm needs about 2ha per head.. but
       it’s hilly terrain and lots of trees I don’t have grain lands. I’m
       into an organic program and since my basic education is in
       engineering I think it’s a smart/efficient way to use the resourses
       i got.
   39.
   dirk says
          + April 17, 2018
       I was talking of the market prices of grain (for bread) and beef
       meat in the super, to buy as human food, and was amazed to see how
       tremendously more food calories per kg you get for 1 euro from
       grains (rice, wheat, maize). About the trees, if that are oaks and
       cork-oaks (as I saw around Badajos and Cáceres), why not start also
       with pigs?, the fine types for the special hams, they eat something
       unedible for men (bellotas in spanish), and produce delicious
       jamon. Good luck!
   40.
   Joaquim C says
          + April 17, 2018
       yep oaks and cork-oaks here too.
       ok, btw grain for human consumption is top notch.. the rejected
       stuff goes to the Cattle, Pigs and Chicken feed lots… no cattle..
       bread goes up! … Have faith in world! we (Utilities, Commodities,
       Farmers, Fishermans,Builders.. people etc) are doing our best for
       our standards of living continue to be like now or better.. ‘do
       your job well and everything can be fine’
       The West is my team!

   Comments are closed.

   Previous PostThe Philosophical Case Against Scientism
   Next PostIn Social Research Fields, Conservatives Are the Most
   Underrepresented Group

Narrated

   Narrated, Top Stories

NARRATED: How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life

   Greg Ellis reads How An Anonymous Accusation Derailed My Life, Stephen
   Elliott’s essay about being accused of rape on the Shitty Media Med
   list in 2017. It was published...

   October 3, 2019

Podcast

   Podcast, Top Stories

PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of Crowds

   Conservative intellectual Douglas Murray talks to Toby Young about the
   moral shortcomings of identity politics and the Marxist underpinnings
   of the Social Justice movement, both subjects of his new...

   October 3, 2019

Top Stories

     * The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
       The Dangerous Life of an Anthropologist
     * 'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
       'Oikophobia': Our Western Self-Hatred
     * Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
       Channelling the Malthusian Roots of Climate Extremism
     * From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
       From Homophobia to Anti-Bigotry: How Did Christians Become the New
       Pariahs?
     * PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
       PODCAST 56: Douglas Murray talks about his new book The Madness of
       Crowds
     * 'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
       'I Basically Just Made It Up': Confessions of a Social
       Constructionist
     * Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
       Understanding the Propaganda Campaign Against So-called ‘TERFs’
     * The Case for Black Optimism
       The Case for Black Optimism
     * Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America
       Gilead Resembles an Islamic Theocracy, not Trump’s America

   [merchstoread.png]

Share

     * (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)

   Help free thought live

   Close and accept
   Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies. By continuing to use this
   website, you agree to their use.
   To find out more, including how to control cookies, see here: Cookie
   Policy

   Free Thought Lives

Follow Us

     * Menu Item
     * Menu Item

     * Copyright © 2019 Quillette Pty Ltd | All Rights Reserved

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.
